tutored by his mother on the fundamentals of Islam. He then attended a government school in Lanao from 1921 to 1931 for his primary and secondary education. He earned his Fellowship in Arts, BA, and Doctorate in Law at the University of the Philippines in Manila, where he was also a member of the Upsilon Sigma Phi fraternity. He passed the Bar Examination in 1938. 
His siblings - Hadja Naima Alonto; Abdul Ghafur Madki Alonto; Masiding Alonto, Sr.; Tarhata Alonto-Lucman, and Madrigal Alonto - were all prominent leaders in Lanao during the latter half of the 20th century. Abdul Ghafur Madki Alonto served as Governor and Ambassador, and Tarhata Alonto served as Governor. His Brother-in-Law, Bae Tarhata's husband Rashid Lucman also served as Congressman. 
Alonto started working as a classroom teacher in Lanao del Sur. He then became a confidential writer for the National Information Board and the Department of Interior. At the onset of World War II, he was commissioned as a First Lieutenant in the Philippine Army, 81st Division, United States Armed Forces in the Far East (USAFFE). 
While serving under the Japanese government, Alonto secretly supported the underground resistance movement against the Japanese. The Japanese authorities did not harbor any suspicion towards him since he occupied key positions in their government. It was during this time that he was able to have a broader grasp of the state of Maranao society in general. 
After the war, he was appointed as Presidential Assistant and Adviser to the Office of the President of the Republic of the Philippines from 1947 to 1948. 
Alonto also authored the law (enacted as Republic Act No. 2228) dividing the old Lanao Province into Lanao del Norte and Lanao del Sur. Each province was provided with congressional representatives. 
As a legislator, he advocated for the understanding between Muslim Filipinos and their Christian brothers and preached for non-violence and peaceful coexistence. He was also a strong advocate for the passage of nationalization laws and co-authored the Retail Nationalization Law, subsequently defending it from repeal until incontrovertible proof was shown that the law was adverse to the national interest. 
The conclusion reached by the Special Committee paved the way for the creation of the Commission on National Integration (CNI); Mindanao Development Authority (MDA); and Mindanao State University (MSU). 
In 1955, a meeting of non-aligned nations who refused to partake in the Cold War was held in Bandung, Indonesia. Along with Foreign Secretary Carlos P. Romulo, Domocao Alonto was the only Muslim delegate from the Philippines. It was in this meeting that he met Gamal Abdel Nasser of Egypt, Sukarno of Indonesia, and Tungku Abdul Rahman of Malaysia. 
His participation in the conference enabled him to establish linkages and contacts in the Middle East. The Muslim world was made aware of the presence of Muslims in the islands of Mindanao and Sulu. As a result, he got scholarships for Muslim Filipinos coming from Mindanao and Sulu at the Cairo Military Academy, Al Azhar University in Egypt. Among these students was the young Salamat Hashim who would, later on, establish the Moro Islamic Liberation Front (MILF). 
Alonto was also instrumental in bringing the issue about the plight of Muslim-Filipinos to the world stage. His extensive network with other Muslim countries would eventually lay foundations for the involvement of the Organization of Islamic Conference (OIC) in the Mindanao peace process. 
Alonto then served as Assistant Floor Leader for the 1987 Constitutional Commission. He proposed the addition of the Autonomous Region in Muslim Mindanao (ARMM) in the 1987 Constitution of the Philippines. 
In both conventions, he advocated for the accommodation of the Muslim-Filipinos in the larger nation-building program of the national government. While he believed in the argument of the Moro secessionist movements that there are legitimate injustices committed against the Muslims, he favored the exhaustion of all the available legitimate means to resolve the conflict. He championed meaningful autonomy for Muslim Mindanao and Sulu as a remedy to resolving the Mindanao problem. 
Dr. Domocao Alonto died on December 11, 2002, in his home in Marawi City after a brief bout with cancer. 
Alonto is known for his contributions to the spread and development of Islamic thought in the Philippines. He founded the Mindanao Islamic University which provides education for both Muslims and Christians. He also founded the Mindanao Mosque and Islamic Center in Marawi City, the largest of its kind in the Philippines, and the Rajah Solaiman Mosque (Masjid Solaymaniah) located in Binangonan, Rizal. 
He was a founding member of the Makkah-based World Muslim League, the Executive Council of the World Islamic Congress and the Central Council of the International Organization of Islamic Universities, and other Islamic organization based in the Philippines. He is the only Filipino to receive the King Faisal Foundation Award for Service to Islam. 
It was his advocacy for Muslim recognition that inspired activists to form the Moro National Liberation Front (MNLF) and later on the Moro Islamic Liberation Front (MILF). 
The frenulum of labia minora (fourchette or posterior commissure of the labia minora) is a frenulum where the labia minora meet posteriorly. 
The fourchette may also be torn in acts of violence wherein forced entry occurs such as rape. When the fourchette is torn, the bleeding which ensues sometimes requires surgical suturing for containment. 
The fourchette is named with the French word for "fork" or "wishbone", owing to its shape. (See frenulum for its etymology.) 
 Streetcar was the largest carsharing/car club company in the United Kingdom, established in 2004, which merged with the American company Zipcar in 2010, following a period of investment by Smedvig Capital. 
Streetcar vehicles were parked in a dense network of dedicated spaces primarily in London, but also across a total of 10 UK cities including Brighton, Bristol, Cambridge, Edinburgh, Glasgow, Oxford, Guildford, Maidstone and Southampton. Members could book vehicles from 30 minutes up to six months, online or by phone. A smartcard was used to pick up and return the car at any time. 
The Streetcar fleet consisted of VW Golfs, VW Polos, VW Transporter vans and VW Tourans. From January 2010, Streetcar also introduced the BMW 1 Series and BMW 3 Series to their fleet. The BMW models Streetcar chose, the 116d, 118d and 318d 
In June 2009, Streetcar became the first UK car club to provide an electric car (Toyota Prius) to its members, as part of a trial with Camden Council. 
In January 2010, the company launched their own iPhone application, allowing members across the UK to locate, book and unlock a car using their iPhone or iPod touch. 
Streetcar had over 1,200 locations across 10 UK cities including; London, Edinburgh, Glasgow, Bristol, Cambridge, Oxford, Brighton, Southampton, Guildford, and Maidstone. 
In early 1923, several members left Union to found SV West Eimsbuettel. Shortly after that, in 1925, what would become a very successful handball department was added to the club. Following the adoption of the Greater Hamburg Act (1937) that expanded the city boundaries to include the town of Altona, the club was rechristened SC Union 03 Hamburg. 
Union was briefly again part of first division football in the aftermath of World War II from 1945 to 1947. They failed to qualify for the new Oberliga Nord (I) and were part of second division competition until 1963. During the club's heyday in the 1920s, it had some 2,000 members and qualified for the North German championship round nine times. By the turn of the millennium it included only 400 members and they entered into merger talks with Altona FC 1893, which ultimately failed. 
After relegation to the tier nine Kreisklasse in 2012 the club won promotion back to the Kreisliga the season after where it plays today. 
The 2001 Bulldogs RLFC season was the 67th in the club's history. Coached by Steve Folkes and captained by Darren Britt, they competed in the National Rugby League's 2001 Telstra Premiership, finishing the regular season 2nd. The team went on to the Semi-Finals after losing the semi-final game 10-52 against the Cronulla Sharks at the Sydney Football Stadium. 
A multiple barrel firearm is any type of firearm with more than one gun barrel, usually to increase the rate of fire or hit probability and to reduce barrel erosion/overheating.  
Multiple barrel firearms date back to the 14th century, when the first primitive volley guns were developed. They are made with several single-shot barrels assembled together for firing a large number of shots, either simultaneously or in quick succession. These firearms were limited in firepower by the number of barrels bundled, and needed to be manually prepared, ignited and reloaded for each firing. 
In practice the large volley guns were not particularly more useful than a cannon firing canister shot or grapeshot. Since they were still mounted on a carriage, they could be as hard to aim and move around as a heavy cannon, and the many barrels took as long (if not longer) to reload. They also tended to be relatively expensive since they were structurally more complex than a cannon, due to all the barrels and ignition fuses, and each barrel had to be individually maintained and cleaned. 
In the 15th century, there were design attempts to have several single-shot barrels attached to a stock, being fired individually by means of a match.  Around 1790, pepperboxes were built on the basis of flintlock systems, notably by Nock in England and "Segallas" in Belgium. These weapons building on the success of the earlier two-barrel turnover pistols, were fitted with three, four or seven barrels. These early pepperboxes were manually rotated. 
Samuel Colt owned a revolving three-barrel matchlock musket from British India, and an eight-barrel pepperbox shotgun was designed in 1967 but never went into production. 
The Sharps Derringers were four-barrel derringers with a revolving firing pin (often called the "Sharps Pepperbox" despite not of a revolving-barrel design) first patented in 1849, but were not made until 1859 until Christian Sharps patented a more practical design.  When loading and reloading, the four barrels slide forward open the breech.  Production of these came to an end with the death of Christian Sharps in 1874. 
The .45 ACP DoubleTap derringers double-barreled (over-under), double-action hammerless derringers introduced by DoubleTap Defense in 2012.  The name comes from the double tap shooting technique, in which two consecutive shots are quickly fired at the same target before engaging the next one.  These derringers also hold two extra rounds of cartridge in the grip, allegedly drawing inspiration from the FP-45 Liberator pistol. 
During the 19th century, shotguns were mainly employed by cavalry units, as mounted units favored its moving target effectiveness, and devastating close-range firepower. Both sides of the American Civil War employed shotguns, and the U.S. Cavalry used them extensively during the Indian Wars.  Shotguns also remained popular with citizen militias, guards (e.g. the shotgun messengers) and lawmen as a self-defense weapon, and became one of the many symbols of the American Old West. 
In 1909, Boss & Co. introduced the over-and-under shotgun, which has remained the more popular configuration for double-barreled shotguns.  Nowadays the pump-action and semi-automatic shotguns have taken over most roles in civilian home defense, law enforcement and military usages, though the over-and-under shotguns still remain popular for waterfowl/upland hunting and clay pigeon shooting. 
He abruptly died of lung cancer aged 44. Among his friends and contemporary authors, Romain Gary shared a special relationship with Kalisky, as he viewed them, as recalled by their published correspondence. An abundant published correspondence with Antoine Vitez likewise showed how close they had become. 
The "surtexte" technique that he forged along his short career has been studied by numerous directors and authors as defined by Encyclopedia Universalis. That new concept could be related to "Brecht's "distancing effect" ("Verfremdungseffekt"), which aims to break the theatrical illusion to awaken the critical sense of the audience by giving it to see the artificial nature of representation, and thus making everyone aware of his position as a spectator" 
The GRU's first predecessor in Russia formed on October 21, 1918 under the sponsorship of Leon Trotsky, then the civilian leader of the Red Army; it was originally known as the Registration Directorate (Registrupravlenie, or RU). Semyon Aralov was its first head. In his history of the early years of the GRU, Raymond W. Leonard writes: 
 The GRU had the task of handling all military intelligence, particularly the collection of intelligence of military or political significance from sources outside the Soviet Union. It operated residencies all over the world, along with the SIGINT (signals intelligence) station in Lourdes, Cuba, and throughout the former Soviet-bloc countries, especially in Lithuania, Latvia, and Estonia. 
The first head of the 4th Directorate was Yan Karlovich Berzin, a Latvian Communist and former member of the Cheka, who served until 1935 and again in 1937. He was arrested (May 1938) and subsequently murdered (July 1938) during the so-called "Latvian Operation" of Joseph Stalin's Great Purge. 
The GRU was known in the Soviet government for its fierce independence from the rival "internal intelligence organizations", such as the Main Directorate of State Security (GUGB), State Political Directorate (GPU), MGB, OGPU, NKVD, NKGB, KGB and the First Chief Directorate (PGU). At the time of the GRU's creation, Lenin infuriated the Cheka (the predecessor of the KGB) by ordering it not to interfere with the GRU's operations. 
Nonetheless, the Cheka infiltrated the GRU in 1919. That worsened a fierce rivalry between the two agencies, which were both engaged in espionage. The rivalry became even more intense than that between the Federal Bureau of Investigation and Central Intelligence Agency in the US. 
During the Cold War, the Sixth Directorate was responsible for monitoring Intelsat communication satellites traffic. 
GRU Sixth Directorate officers reportedly visited North Korea following the capture (January 1968) of the USS Pueblo, inspecting the vessel and receiving some of the captured equipment. 
CSSC Carnival Cruise Shipping (Carnival China) is a Chinese-British-American cruise line that was scheduled to begin operation in 2020, but was delayed due to covid-19 pandemic. 
CSSC Carnival will begin operations with two ships purchased from Costa Cruises, Costa Atlantica in 2020 and Costa Mediterranea in 2021. 
The first Chinese-built vessel, to be constructed off of the Vista-class design, is expected to be delivered in 2023, with the sister ship following in 2024. If all four options are exercised, a new ship will be delivered annually through 2028. 
A referendum on the use of nuclear power was held in Austria on 5 November 1978. Voters were asked whether they approve a law allowing the peaceful use of nuclear power, particularly relating to the start-up of the Zwentendorf Nuclear Power Plant. Voters narrowly rejected it, with 50.5% voting against. As a result, although the Power Plant was finished, it was never operated and has since been dismantled. 
Goolgumbla, New South Wales is a rural locality and civil parish of County of Landsborough located near the town of Louth, New South Wales. The parish is in Bourke Shire. 
The traditional owners of the area are the Paruntiji, meaning people belonging to the Paroo. Aboriginal people are known to have lived along the Paroo for at least 14,000 years (Robins, 1999). 
The Burke and Wills expedition were the first Europeans to the area, passing a few miles to the west. 
Erythrus sabahanus is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae found in Asia in countries such as Malaysia. 
In the early years of his playing career, he carefully concealed the fact that he had type 1 diabetes. He feared that if this information were to be known, he would be forced into retirement. Because the methods of regulating diabetes in the 1960s and 1970s were not as advanced as they are today, Santo gauged his blood sugar levels based on his moods. If he felt his blood sugar was low, he would snack on a candy bar in the clubhouse. 
As part of the publicity surrounding "Ron Santo Day" at Wrigley Field on August 28, 1971, he revealed his struggle with diabetes. He was diagnosed with this disease at the age of 18, and was given a life expectancy of 25 years. Santo had both his legs amputated below the knee as a result of his diabetes: the right in 2001 and the left in 2002. 
In 2004 Santo and his battle against diabetes were the subject of a documentary, This Old Cub. The film was written, co-produced and directed by Santo's son Jeff. 
Santo shared a bond in this respect with 2008 Cubs rookie Sam Fuld, who also suffers from type 1 diabetes. 
On August 10, 2011, Santo was memorialized and "immortalized" at Wrigley Field with the presentation of a statue in his likeness.  The statue is a portrayal of a young Santo playing defense at third base, leaning to his right while throwing a ball. 
Following revamped voting procedures for the Veterans Committee, which had elected players retired for over 20 years to the Hall of Fame, Santo finished third in 2003, tied for first in 2005, and again finished first in voting for the 2007 and 2009 inductions, but fell short of the required number of votes each year. 
Santo's next opportunity for admission to the Hall of Fame following a further major change to the voting structure and process announced in 2010, came during the voting in 2011 by the new 16-member Golden Era Committee which considers every three years, ten candidates identified by the Historical Overview Committee from the 1947 to 1972 era. 
Santo also fell short of such traditional standards of Hall election as 3,000 hits and 500 home runs; however, by the time his career ended, only two third basemen (Brooks Robinson and Lave Cross) had even collected 2,500 hits, and only one (Eddie Mathews) had reached the 500-home run plateau. Bill James, a notable statistical guru who has ranked Santo among the 100 greatest players of all time (sixth among third basemen), believed his election to the Hall of Fame was long overdue. 
While Santo initially received little support for induction into the Hall of Fame, his standing among baseball enthusiasts and sabermetricians gradually increased over time, culminating with his induction to the Hall of Fame two years after his death. 
He won the NL Player of the Month award three times: June 1963 (.384, 6 HR, 22 RBI); July 1964 (.395, 7 HR, 27 RBI); and June 1969 (.400, 6 HR, 34 RBI). 
Shortly after his death in 2010, Bleacher Report released a ranking of the 50 most beloved announcers in baseball history, in which Santo was placed 16th. On his entry, Sam Westmoreland wrote about Santo that "he made his share of errors, but that just made him all the more lovable and beloved. He passed as an icon, and deserves a spot in the Baseball Hall of Fame." 
 Dr. Noor Jehan Panezai served as the Deputy Chairman of the Senate of Pakistan from 21 March 1991 to 20 March 1994. She was the first woman to hold the office. 
Since 2017, he has been producing content on various YouTube channels, including "Budabi", "BaBaLa TV" and "Onedio". In 2020, he presented the first season of Exathlon Turkey, which was released on Netflix. 
Burns Arena is a multi-purpose arena in St. George, Utah.  It is the home of the Dixie State University Trailblazers basketball teams.  The capacity of the arena is 5,000 people.  It is located near Bruce Hurst Field and Greater Zion Stadium.  There are 4,779 permanent seats at Burns Arena in 14 sections.  It was built in 1987 as the Dixie Center.  By the time the current incarnation of Dixie Center opened in 1998, the arena took its present name. It is named after M. Anthony Burns. 
It is also the site of the Buck-A-Thon and the World Senior Games. Many concerts, high school tournaments, and boxing matches also take place in this facility. 
During the 2020 -2021 pandemic, the University of New Mexico's mens basketball team temporarily relocated to the Burns Arena in January 2021 due to pandemic restrictions in New Mexico. The Lobos played three games in Burns Arena, beating Dixie State 72-63, and then splitting a pair of game with San Jose State.  
In 2006, UNLV played a home game against Northern Arizona in the Burns Arena. The Rebels won 93-53.  
On October 13, 1988, the Utah Jazz defeated the Indiana Pacers, 104-95, in a pre-season game played at the Burns Arena. Karl Malone scored 27 points and John Stockton added 18 points and 11 assists to lead the Jazz. Chuck Person had 22 points for the Pacers.  
In 1918 Mykhailyk worked in the Ministry of Land Melioration of the Ukrainian State. During that time he was a member of the left-wing Ukrainian Party of Socialist Revolutionaries (before adaptation of Communist-Borotbists). 
From 1933 to 1935 he was its Prosecutor General. He was tried by a court chaired by Vasiliy Ulrikh and shot in 1937, but he was rehabilitated in September 1956. 
This biographical article about a Ukrainian politician is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
HMS Melville was a 74-gun third rate ship of the line of the Royal Navy, launched on 17 February 1817 at Bombay Dockyard. 
From 19 January 1836 until August 1837 she served in North America and the West Indies as the flagship of Vice-Admiral Peter Halkett and was commanded by Captain Peter John Douglas.  From 1 September 1837 to 1841 she was the flagship of Rear-Admiral George Elliot and was captained by Richard Saunders Dundas, during this time she served at the Cape of Good Hope and in the East Indies and was present during the First Opium War with China. 
During the Opium War 32 officers, 351 sailors and 75 Royal Marines served aboard her of whom 16 sailors and four marines would be killed in action at the capture of Bocca Tigris on 7 January 1841 and the subsequent campaign along the Pearl River to Canton. 
She was converted to serve as a hospital ship in 1857, and was sold out of the navy in 1873. Her sale in Hong Kong raised HK$35,000 which was used to purchase the Royal Naval Hospital at Mount Shadwell. 
This article about a ship of the line of the United Kingdom is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Julien Anziani (born 23 June 1999) is a French professional footballer who plays as a midfielder for Championnat National club US Avranches. 
William Henry Horne (born 1880) was an English professional golfer. He finished in the top 10 in the Open Championship in 1909 and 1920 and was South African Open champion in 1919. He was a well-travelled professional and was also renowned for his long hitting. 
Later in 1912 he travelled to New York and worked for a stunt as a "masked golfer" at the public golf course in Van Cortlandt Park, New York. In early 1914 he became professional at Durban Golf Club in South Africa. In 1919 he won the South African Open by 9 strokes. 
He returned to England in late 1919 and played in a few tournaments in 1919 and 1920. In 1922 he became professional at Rye Country Club in New York. 
At the North Berwick Tournament in 1909 Horne set a record for the longest drive in a competition at 388 yards. At the 13th hole, played to a temporary green, Horne reached the green on the downhill sloping hole 12 yards short of the pin. There were initial reports that the drive was as much as 469 yards, but this seems to have been due to confusion about the tee used or the use of the temporary green. The distance was later measured. 
Horne was married to Hilda Barker, who was born on Guernsey. She left England in 1923 to join her husband. William and Hilda are both recorded in the 1940 US census living in Harrison, New York. 
CDK12 cyclin-dependent kinase 12 is a protein kinase that in humans is encoded by the CDK12 gene. This enzyme is a member of cyclin-dependent kinase protein family. 
Robinson's speed was noticed after winning a footrace and playing football with a cousin in his freshman year of high school, who introduced him to track and field. 
Robinson set a new Boy's World Youth Best of 44.84 seconds over 400 metres on June 8, 2019. It was the fastest 400-meter time for an American high schooler since Darrell Robinson in 1982. 
He graduated from Hazelwood West High School in Hazelwood, Missouri in May 2020. He signed a letter of intent to attend Arizona State University. 
Pygospila yuennanensis is a moth in the family Crambidae. It was described by Aristide Caradja in 1937. It is found in Yunnan, China. 
Driscoll's first year with Cannondale/Cyclocrossworld.com brought a wealth of good results, including the overall victory in the Verge New England Cyclocross Championship Series, winning seven of the series' nine races. On the road, Driscoll also won the third stage of the American Eagle Tour of Pennsylvania. 
Driscoll won his first US Cyclocross National Championship as a junior in 2003, in Portland Oregon, one year after finishing in second place. In 2006, Driscoll grabbed his second National Championships, this time in the Collegiate Men's category, while riding for the University of Vermont, a feat which he repeated in 2007. Also in 2007, Driscoll was narrowly bested by Bjorn Selander in a two-up sprint for the Espoirs title. 
Toetie Selbach (born 11 April 1934) is a Dutch gymnast. She competed in seven events at the 1952 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article related to Dutch artistic gymnastics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He directed the Maly Trostinek camp in Belarus, created on May 7, 1942 and closed on January 10, 1943, where an estimated 206,000 prisoners died. 
Nothing was known about his whereabouts until his indictment in 1970. Streibel was put on trial in Hamburg for his wartime activities, and in 1976 acquitted of any wrongdoing and set free. German prosecutor Helge Grabitz believed his word, but also granted him partial memory impairment. Streibel was declared innocent of inciting violence; without prosecution right of appeal. Further accounts of his life appear missing. 
Haverthwaite is a small village and civil parish in the Furness region of Cumbria, England. It is also within the boundaries of the Lake District National Park. It is located several miles east of Ulverston and is near the southern end of Windermere. In the 2001 census the parish had a population of 728, increasing at the 2011 census to 797. 
The village gets part of its name from the Old Norse word thwaite which usually refers to a clearing or settlement in the forest. 
The village was originally a Viking settlement, but it has been suggested that there may have been a settlement of sorts there before the Vikings arrived. 
In the 18th century there were two iron furnaces near the village, one at Backbarrow and the other at Low Wood. The furnace at Backbarrow was supplied from 1711 with iron ore from Low Furness which would have arrived at the quays in Haverthwaite and been transported to Backbarrow by horse and cart. In 1860 the Furness Railway opened its branch line that ran from Ulverston to Lakeside and almost overnight the quays fell into disuse. 
In 1798 Low Wood gunpowder works was established and continued production until 1935. The nearby River Leven was used to transport the finished product. 
The vicarage was demolished in the 1970s to make way for the new route of the A590.[citation needed] 
St Anne's Church was originally a chapel under Colton; it was consecrated in 1825 and extended in 1838. When it was built, it received a grant on condition that 200 sittings were to be 'free and unappropriated for ever'. It appears in the music video of Never Went to Church by The Streets. 
The village is the starting point of the preserved Lakeside & Haverthwaite Railway, a popular tourist attraction providing connections to Windermere. 
He died at Hanley Road, Hornsey, on 26 July 1854 and is buried on the west side of Highgate Cemetery. 
He is notable for winning four Inter Dominion Championships, the premier trotting series of races between Australia and New Zealand. Not surprisingly, he is also an inductee in the Inter Dominion Hall of Fame. Doody also won two Auckland Trotting Cups and the New Zealand Trotting Cup. These are the two top races in New Zealand. 
In 1936, Anderson was added to the botany faculty at Duke University to specialize cytology, and he was given the responsibility of curating the moss herbarium. Anderson's research then began to shift from cellular cytology to the ecology and classification of mosses. He, with the help of his colleague Ruth Margery Addoms, built the institution's first general botany course. 
Throughout his career, Anderson was assisted by his wife, Pat, whom he met while she was a nursing student at Duke.  They married in 1941 and after having 5 children between 1942 and 1947, she accompanied him on field trips, marking topography maps with collection sites and managing specimen packets.  She also helped prepare and distribute "The Bryologist", journal of The American Bryological Society.    
Anderson frequently collaborated with Howard A. Crum, and in 1981, the two published a two-volume flora on the mosses of eastern North America. Anderson continued to expand the bryophyte herbarium at Duke, and he helped to develop a graduate program in bryology. He retired from Duke in 1982. 
The moss genus Bryoandersonia was named after him by Harold E. Robinson. Some species, including Bryocrumia andersonii, also bear his name.  
In 1998, the bryophyte herbarium at Duke University was officially named the L.E. Anderson Bryophyte Herbarium. It holds approximately 260,000 specimens. 
I Can See Your Voice is a Philippine television mystery music game show series on Kapamilya Channel and A2Z. It is based on the South Korean program of the same name. 
There are six individuals or groups of mystery singers standing on a platform to keep identities concealed until the "stage of truth" performance. 
The guest artist is given some time to observe and examine each mystery singer based on their appearance. Afterward, a muted video of each mystery singer reveals only 0.3 seconds of their singing voice as an additional hint.[a][b] 
Each mystery singer performs a lip sync to a song. Good singers are miming to own voices while bad singers are miming to other's voices.[a][b] 
Each mystery singer performs a lip sync from a non-lyrical part of a song (i.e. screams, whistles, interjections, etc.).[a] 
Separated into two groups, each group of mystery singers participate in a short lip sync performance for one song each.[c] 
A proof of each mystery singer's singing ability (i.e. photo, video, certificates, etc.) is shown on the screen.[a] 
Three random panelists must wear headphones to listen to the mystery singer's real voice for 15 seconds. Afterward, the panelist must defend the mystery singer and convince the guest artist to choose him/her as the final mystery singer.[a][b][c] 
ABS-CBN first announced the development of the series in a collaboration with Endemol Shine Group in August 2017. Produced by ABS-CBN Entertainment, the staff team is managed by executive producer Rose Casala, director Jon Raymond Moll, and creative director Stiffany Adanza. 
Episode tapings took place at the ABS-CBN Broadcasting Center, Brgy. South Triangle, Diliman, Quezon City. Production was halted during the second season from March to October 2020 due to the COVID-19 pandemic. Later, the second indefinite network shutdown and franchise denial took place. Since the third season, it was taped with enhanced health and safety protocols being implemented. 
ICSYVPH debuted on September 16, 2017, replacing Lethal Weapon's timeslot. The second season premiered on August 10, 2019 but it was prematurely ended on March 14, 2020 because of halting productions. The third season premiered on October 24, 2020, coinciding with the debut broadcast of TV5's rival program Masked Singer Pilipinas, another Philippine adaptation of the South Korean reality competition series. 
The program was aired on ABS-CBN for two seasons, and then switched to A2Z and Kapamilya Channel for third season. It also simulcasts on YouTube and Facebook Live through Kapamilya Online Live streaming. Outside of the Philippines, it is aired on The Filipino Channel through international transmissions. They are available for streaming on iWantTFC through video on demand. 
The Rufescent prinia (Prinia rufescens) is a species of bird in the family Cisticolidae. It is found in Southeast Asia, the Indian subcontinent (mainly in the northeast) and southern Yunnan. Its natural habitat is subtropical or tropical dry forest. 
Barley malt syrup is an unrefined sweetener processed by extraction from sprouted, i.e., malted, barley, containing approximately 65 percent maltose, 30 percent complex carbohydrate, 3% protein. Malt syrup is dark brown, thick and sticky, and possesses a strong distinctive flavor described as "malty". It is about half as sweet as refined white sugar. Barley malt syrup is sometimes used in combination with other natural sweeteners to lend a malt flavor. 
Also called 'barley malt extract' (or just malt syrup), barley malt syrup is purely from malted barley though there are instances of mislabeling where merchants use other grains or corn syrup in production. It can also be sold in powdered form, and is used in the bread and baked good industry for browning and flavoring, and in cereal manufacture to add malt flavor. Adding barley malt syrup to yeast dough increases fermentation due to the malt enzymes, quickening the proofing process. 
Barley malt syrup has a long history, and was one of the primary sweetener in China from 1000 BCE to 1000 CE (along with honey). A classical 6th century Chinese text, Qimin Yaoshu, contains notes on the extraction of malt syrup and maltose from common household grains. It continued to be used in traditional Chinese sweets, such as dragon's beard candy. 
Sugar rationing in the US led to the first commercial malt syrup production in the 1920s, to deal with sugar shortages. 
FC Arsenal Kharkiv is a football club based in Kharkiv, Ukraine. Arsenal Kharkiv currently plays in the regional competitions of Kharkiv city. In 2005 on the base of the club was formed another club FC Kharkiv. FC Arsenal has a well established infrastructure with series of stadiums and sport schools. 
The club has a possession of two stadiums Arsenal-Spartak Stadium (former Spartak) and Arsenal-Bavaria Stadium (former stadium of local rope factory). Also the club has a complex of four fields with a synthetic surface called Arsenal-OPEN. Arsenal-Spartak has capacity of 1500 people, but it's planned to enlarge it to 8000 by 2010; Arsenal-Bavaria has a capacity to accommodate 2300 spectators. In July 2010 Arsenal-Bavaria was given away to FC Helios Kharkiv and was renamed into Helios Arena. 
The Ashville Formation is a geological formation in Saskatchewan and Manitoba whose strata date back to the Late Cretaceous. Dinosaur remains are among the fossils that have been recovered from the formation. 
It is geochronologically equivalent to the Lower Colorado Group and the Viking Formation in central Alberta. 
The 1999 Spanish motorcycle Grand Prix was the third round of the 1999 Grand Prix motorcycle racing season. It took place on 9 May 1999 at the Circuito Permanente de Jerez. The event is notable for being the last round that 5-time 500cc and reigning World Champion Mick Doohan participated in. Doohan did not start the race due to crashing in the wet qualifying session, resulting in career-ending leg injuries. 
The university enrolls approximately 17,000 students each year. Approximately 1,500 students are international. 
Since 2015, NTNU has been ranked within 350 in the QS World University Rankings (No. 331 in the world in 2020 and No. 61 in Asia). NTNU has been ranked among the top 50 in the world in the three disciplines of education, linguistics, and library and information management systems.  
This makes National Taiwan Normal University a well-known university with international influence and visibility. The affiliated senior high school of National Taiwan Normal University is also one of the top high schools in Taiwan. 
The university also runs the Affiliated Senior High School of National Taiwan Normal University, a daughter institution for secondary-school students in Taiwan. 
Other international highlights recently at NTNU include the International Chemistry Olympiad hosted by the university in 2005 and the merger of NTNU with the University Preparatory School for Overseas Chinese Students in 2006. NTNU also participates in the Biodiversity Program of the Taiwan International Graduate Program of Academia Sinica. A new dormitory for NTNU international students is slated to open in 2024. 
The standard abbreviated reference to National Taiwan Normal University in English is the acronym NTNU. The standard abbreviated form in Mandarin Chinese is the portmanteau Shi1da4. Romanized as "Shida", this form appears transliterated in place names associated with the campus: Shida Road, Shida Night Market, Shida Bookstore, and the like. 
The word normal in the school's name perpetuates an English usage of the term that, if archaic in some countries, remains common in Asia. A "normal school" trains future teachers in educational norms. 
He was born in Sliven in 1799. Later, he took the name of this town as his surname. His early school years were spent in a Greek school in Sliven. His secondary education was in Kidonia. He traveled in Europe. 
Seliminski returned to Sliven in 1825. He opened a school in which he taught physics. His school became one of the first Bulgarian lower-level secondary schools. 
The stanitsa is located in the steppe zone, 12 km southeast of Giaginskaya (the district's administrative centre) by road. 
The engine's severe undersquare design was addressed for the 1957 Flaminia version. This lasted in production through 1970. 
Later Lancias were powered by V6 engines designed by other manufacturers, with the Ferrari Dino V6 powering the Stratos, the PRV V6 powering early Themas, the Alfa Romeo Busso V6 powering later versions of the Thema, and versions of the Kappa and Thesis and the Chrysler Pentastar V6 in the badge-engineered 300C-based Thema. 
He had previously played for many seasons with FK Inter Bratislava, except between 2008 and 2010 when he was with NK Primorje. With Primorje he played the 2008-09 season in the Slovenian First League having played 15 league matches, scoring once, but at the end of that season the club was relegated so he played the 2009-10 season in the Slovenian Second League. 
This biographical article related to a defender from Slovakia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 15th San Francisco Film Critics Circle Awards, honoring the best in film for 2016, were given on December 11, 2016. 
Gulf Park Estates is an unincorporated community and census-designated place (CDP) located south of Ocean Springs in Jackson County, Mississippi, United States. It is part of the Pascagoula Metropolitan Statistical Area. The population was 5,719 at the 2010 census, up from 4,272 at the 2000 census. 
There were 1,537 households, out of which 44.4% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 62.6% were married couples living together, 10.5% had a female householder with no husband present, and 22.7% were non-families. 17.0% of all households were made up of individuals, and 2.7% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.78 and the average family size was 3.14. 
In the CDP, the population was spread out, with 30.2% under the age of 18, 8.0% from 18 to 24, 36.4% from 25 to 44, 19.7% from 45 to 64, and 5.8% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 34 years. For every 100 females, there were 98.6 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 97.1 males. 
The median income for a household in the CDP was $47,647, and the median income for a family was $49,211. Males had a median income of $32,138 versus $26,503 for females. The per capita income for the CDP was $17,978. About 6.0% of families and 6.7% of the population were below the poverty line, including 10.0% of those under age 18 and 3.2% of those age 65 or over. 
The Men's time trial at the 2006 UCI Road World Championships took place on September 21, 2006, in the Austrian city of Salzburg. The race was part of the UCI Road World Championships. Swiss rider Fabian Cancellara won the gold medal and the rainbow jersey as the 2006 World Time Trial Champion. 
Each National Federation was allowed to enter 2 riders. In the end 53 riders were selected for the race, with Polish rider Piotr Mazur not starting, 52 riders effectively took part. 
El Adobe de Capistrano, or El Adobe, is a restaurant located in at 31891 Camino Capistrano in San Juan Capistrano, California. It has been operated since 1948 and is in a building composed of two historic adobes near Mission San Juan Capistrano.  It is also notable for being frequented by and being a favorite of U.S. President Richard Nixon who lived in nearby San Clemente. Now El Adobe is a California historical landmark.   
In 1910, Harry and Georgia Mott Vander Leck bought the two properties, combining them together and adding sunken wings to both buildings, for use as their home and store. 
In 1946, Clarence Brown bought the property, and established the El Adobe restaurant, opening it on July 8, 1948 for the wedding and reception of the First Commandant of Camp Pendleton Marine Corps Base, General Fegan.  The restaurant was bought by the Fred Harvey Company in 1955. 
While in office, former President Richard Nixon whose nearby San Clemente home was known as the Western White House, visited the restaurant many times.  The restaurant was originally continental cuisine, but after comments by Nixon, it gained attention for its Mexican fare and changed the menu. 
St. Xavier's School was the first institute in Nepal to be affiliated with Cambridge University. In 1957 it offered the first GCE exams in Nepal and again in 1984 when the school resumed General Certificate of Education O levels. The early 1950s found Nepal isolated and little exposed to the outside world. St. Xavier's, run mostly by American Jesuits, introduced a new standard of excellence for education in Nepal. 
While the mission statement of the school speaks of "formation of our students, their parents and each other, educational excellence, spiritual growth and social justice, active service of god, Nepal and the human society, its impact on the country is equally noticeable in the improvement of English taught at schools. 
An all-boys school from 1951 until 2000, St. Xavier's began admitting girls starting with the academic session of 2000/01. 
St. Xavier's School, established at Godawari on the outskirts of Kathmandu in 1951, added a branch at Jawalakhel within the city in 1954. Until 1999 the two branches operated as a single unit with students at Godawari transferring to Jawalakhel after grade six. The Jawalakhel branch on the other hand ran classes from grade one through grade ten. Started in 1999, the Godawari branch extended its offerings beyond middle school to grade ten and both school draws students nationwide. 
The school follows the national standard Secondary Education Examination (S.E.E.) curriculum for grade ten and National Examination Board (N.E.B) for grade 12. The performance in the S.E.E. examinations by the students of St. Xavier's School has over the years been exceptional: failures in any given year are rare and well over half of all candidates score within the highest division (above an aggregate score of 60%). 
The barracks were built in 1853 and were enlarged in 1911. The old barracks were completely demolished in 1988 and new barracks were built between 1989 and 1993. The barracks remain the place from where troops set off to change the guard at Windsor Castle. The sole garrisoned unit, the 1st Battalion, Coldstream Guards is a light infantry battalion operating since 2019 as part of the 11th Infantry Brigade and Headquarters South East. 
Yatinder Singh is an Indian bodybuilder, entrepreneur and fitness icon. His most recent accomplishments include the Silver medal in 7th World Body Building and Physique Championship 2015 and Mr. India 2016. 
Singh was born and raised in a Panwar(Khubbad) Gurjar family and hails from Village Jandhera situated in district Saharanpur, UP. 
The year 2001 marked the beginning of Singh's bodybuilding career. After winning his first championship in 2002, he took part in several bodybuilding and fitness competitions in India and later internationally.  
Singh had started preparing for Mr. Asia 2005. One evening while working out, he was seriously injured due to the negligence of a helping boy. Singh's lower back vertebrae had ruptured causing nerve injuries. His right hand and leg about 30 percent paralyzed. As a result, he was bedridden for months. 
Singh had to stay away from bodybuilding for the next three years. To become financially independent, he soon started working as a personal trainer in a gym in Meerut, Uttar Pradesh. In 2008, he moved to Gurgaon to pursue his career as a businessman. 
Marcello Giuria (born 2 October 1891, date of death unknown) was an Italian wrestler. He competed in the Greco-Roman heavyweight event at the 1924 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to an Italian sport wrestler or wrestling coach is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
After they went on tour with Element of Crime and again AnnenMayKantereit in early 2016., they released their debut album Grande on July 15, 2016, which was followed by a tour in September and October of the same year. They also played at several music festivals in 2016, such as the Appletree Garden Festival, the Kosmonaut Festival, Rocken am Brocken and the Fusion Festival. In 2018, they performed at the Campus Festival in Bielefeld as well as at the Deichbrand in Nordholz. 
Characteristic for their musical style are instruments such as an electronic Casio-Keyboard or a Steel Drum, which the band has partly borrowed or bought from an opera house. 
The Voice Kids is a Polish reality music talent show for aspiring singers aged 8 to 15, airing on TVP2. The third season premiered on New Year's Day 2020. Tomson & Baron, Dawid Kwiatkowski and Cleo returned as coaches. Tomasz Kammel returned as host, with Ida Nowakowska-Herndon as the new host, replacing Barbara Kurdej-Szatan. 
Thliptoceras stygiale is a moth in the family Crambidae. It was described by George Hampson in 1896. It is found in India's Naga Hills. 
 As Blue Water is located on the eastern shore of Lake Huron this has impacted the climate of the region, having an influence of rain and snow in the community close to the shores.
As a small community Bayfield has many yearly traditions which include the Bayfield Fair in August, and Christmas in Bayfield, which takes place the  weekend after Remembrance Day and includes the lighting of the trees in Clan Gregor Square as well as an annual Christmas Parade. Other annual events include the Fireman's Breakfast, Pioneer Park 5k Run, Santa Run, Halloween Witches Walk, and Corvette Fest and Volks Fest.[citation needed] 
The Bayfield Historical Society operates a heritage centre containing historic artifacts, newspapers, and photographs. Tours are available. 
The 1987 Can-Am Teams season was the twentieth and final running of the Sports Car Club of America's Can Am Series and the eleventh and final running of the revived series. For 1987, the series added March 85Cs from CART, although some continued to use the old prototypes. Bill Tempero was declared champion. The Marches acted as a "single seat Can Am" group, replacing the old Formula 5000 cars. 
Brian Leonel Blando (born 1 April 1995) is an Argentine professional footballer who plays as a forward for Agropecuario. 
The Committee for Plundered Ministers was appointed by the Long Parliament, then under the influence of the Presbyterians, after the start of the English Civil War in August 1643 for the purpose of replacing and effectively silencing those clergy who were loyal to the King Charles I. 
The committee would hear evidence, often from local parishioners, of the errors in doctrine of the parish priest. If the allegations were proved, the rector was replaced and his property forcibly sequestered, so that he could only recover it by buying it back. Local parishioners sometimes used the committee's activities as an opportunity to get rid of clergy they did not like. 
The committee also acted as trustee, allocating money collected from rent of rectory lands to support priests in their roles throughout Britain. 
These sequestrated clergy were described as "scandalous", which meant that either they supported the Royalist cause, or their theological attitudes were high Anglican, or both. Often the two went hand in hand because, in a religious age, some of the political differences about how the country should be governed were over the laws on how church affairs should be organised and the details of how services should be conducted. 
Abbott graduated from Longmeadow High School. Abbott earned a B.A. from Brown University in 1970 and a M.E.d. from Keene State College in 1986. 
Abbott worked as principal of Hinsdale High School in New Hampshire from 1985 to 2000. On November 4, 2014, Abbott was elected to the New Hampshire House of Representatives where he represents the Cheshire 1 district. Abbott assumed office on December 3, 2014. Abbott is a Democrat. 
Abbott resides in Hinsdale, New Hampshire and has since 1970. Abbott is married to Sharon and has one child. 
WrestleMania 23 was the 23rd annual WrestleMania professional wrestling pay-per-view (PPV) event produced by World Wrestling Entertainment (WWE). It took place on April 1, 2007, at Ford Field in Detroit, Michigan. The event was the first WrestleMania at Ford Field and the second to take place in the Detroit metropolitan area (following WrestleMania III, which was held at the Pontiac Silverdome, in Pontiac, Michigan). 
WrestleMania 23 featured professional wrestling matches involving wrestlers from existing scripted feuds and storylines played out on WWE's television programs. Wrestlers portrayed faces (heroes) or heels (villains) as they followed a series of events that built tension and culminated in a match or a series of matches. 
I will have your back until WrestleMania. I've turned against all my partners and more importantly, I've stabbed all my friends in the back. But with you, John, it's different.
After Michaels defeated Orton, Cena ran-down to the ring and saved Michaels from an attack by Edge and Orton. On the final Raw before WrestleMania, Cena, and Michaels would team up to face Batista and Undertaker in a rematch from their match at No Way Out. Cena and Michaels looked set to win after performing a synchronized Five Knuckle Shuffle, but Michaels turned on Cena and superkicked him, which allowed Batista and Undertaker to win the match. 
The event officially began with Aretha Franklin singing a rendition of "America the Beautiful", reprising her role from twenty years earlier at WrestleMania III. 
The next match was Melina against Ashley in a Lumberjill Match for the WWE Women's Championship. The match was short, as Melina Bridge pinned Ashley to retain the title. After the match, the lumberjills began brawling in the ring. 
The main event was John Cena against Shawn Michaels for the WWE Championship. After a back and forth match, the longest of the night, Cena applied the STF on Michaels, Michaels submitted and Cena retained the title. 
John Cena and Shawn Michaels continued their feud, with Michaels betraying Cena the night after WrestleMania on Raw. During the second of two battle royals, Michaels eliminated himself and Cena, resulting in The Hardys winning the World Tag Team Championship. On the Raw before Backlash, Cena and Michaels wrestled an almost hour long non-title match, which Michaels won. 
Rockford-Montgomery Labs, through their brand 360 OTC, was named as the official sponsor of the event. On January 19, 2008, WWE filed a lawsuit against the company alleging non-payment of the sponsorship funds. A similar lawsuit was also filed by NASCAR Cup Series team Bill Davis Racing, which had run WWE and WrestleMania 23 sponsorship as part of their sponsorship deal with 360 OTC. 
This Spanish road or road transport-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Palaquium microphyllum is a tree in the family Sapotaceae. The specific epithet microphyllum means "small leaves". 
Palaquium microphyllum is native to Sumatra, Peninsular Malaysia, Singapore and Borneo. Its habitat is swamps, mixed dipterocarp and kerangas forests. 
Palaquium microphyllum has been assessed as near threatened on the IUCN Red List. The species is threatened by logging and conversion of land for palm oil plantations. 
A paperback, also known as a softcover or softback, is a type of book characterized by a thick paper or paperboard cover, and often held together with glue rather than stitches or staples. In contrast, hardcover or hardback books are bound with cardboard covered with cloth, plastic, or leather. The pages on the inside of a paperback are made of paper. 
Inexpensive books bound in paper have existed since at least the 19th century in such forms as pamphlets, yellowbacks, dime novels, and airport novels. Modern paperbacks can be differentiated by size. In the U.S., there are "mass-market paperbacks" and larger, more durable "trade paperbacks". In the U.K., there are A-format, B-format, and the largest C-format sizes. 
Since paperbacks tend to have a smaller profit margin, many publishers try to balance the profit to be made by selling fewer hardcovers against the potential profit to be made by selling more paperbacks with a smaller profit per unit. First editions of many modern books, especially genre fiction, are issued in paperback. Best-selling books, on the other hand, may maintain sales in hardcover for an extended period to reap the greater profits that the hardcovers provide.[citation needed] 
The German-language market also supported examples of cheap paper-bound books:  Bernhard Tauchnitz started the Collection of British and American Authors in 1841. These inexpensive, paperbound editions, a direct precursor to mass-market paperbacks, eventually ran to over 5,000 volumes. Reclam published Shakespeare in this format from October 1857 and went on to pioneer the mass-market paper-bound Universal-Bibliothek series from 10 November 1867. 
In the United States, many companies entered the paperback publishing field in the years after Pocket Books' inception, including Ace, Dell, Bantam, Avon and dozens of other smaller publishers. At first, paperbacks consisted entirely of reprints, but in 1950, Fawcett Publications' Gold Medal Books began publishing original works in paperback. 
U.S. paperbacks quickly entered the Canadian market. Canadian mass-market paperback initiatives in the 1940s included White Circle Books, a subsidiary of Collins (U.K.); it was fairly successful but was soon outstripped by the success of Harlequin which began in 1949 and, after a few years of publishing undistinguished novels, focused on the romance genre and became one of the world's largest publishers. 
McClelland and Stewart entered the Canadian mass-market book trade in the early 1960s, with its "Canadian best seller library" series, at a time when Canadian literary culture was beginning to be popularized, and a call for a Canadian author identity was discussed by the Canadian people. 
In 1982, romance novels accounted for at least 25% of all paperback sales. In 2013, 51% of paperback sales were romance. Many titles, especially in genre fiction, have their first editions in paperback and never receive a hardcover printing. This is particularly true of first novels by new authors. 
The mass-market paperbacks sold in airport newsstands have given rise to the vaguely defined literary genre of the "airport novel", bought by travelers to read during their potentially long hours of sitting and waiting. Mass-market paperbacks also have offered collections of comic strips and magazine cartoon series, such as Ernie Bushmiller's Nancy and Chon Day's Brother Sebastian. 
The bishop has no restrictions in distance for each move, but is limited to diagonal movement. Bishops, like all other pieces except the knight, cannot jump over other pieces. A bishop captures by occupying the square on which an enemy piece sits. 
The bishops may be differentiated according to which wing they begin on, e.g. the king's bishop and queen's bishop. As a consequence of its diagonal movement, each bishop always remains on either the white or black squares, and so it is also common to refer to them as light-squared or dark-squared bishops. 
Both knights and bishops are worth about 3 pawns. This means bishops are approximately equal in strength to knights, but depending on the game situation either may have a distinct advantage. 
Less experienced players tend to underrate the bishop compared to the knight because the knight can reach all squares and is more adept at forking. More experienced players understand the power of the bishop(Mednis 1990:2). 
Two bishops on opposite-colored squares and king can force checkmate against a lone king, whereas two knights cannot. A bishop and knight can force mate, but with far greater difficulty than two bishops. 
In certain positions a bishop can by itself lose a move (see triangulation and tempo), while a knight can never do so. The bishop is capable of skewering or pinning a piece, while the knight can do neither. A bishop can in some situations hinder a knight from moving. In these situations, the bishop is said to be "dominating" the knight. 
In the middlegame, a player with only one bishop should generally place friendly pawns on squares of the color that the bishop cannot move to. This allows the player to control squares of both colors, allows the bishop to move freely among the pawns, and helps fix enemy pawns on squares on which they can be attacked by the bishop. Such a bishop is often referred to as a "good" bishop. 
Endgames in which each player has only one bishop (and no other pieces besides the king) and the bishops are on opposite colors are often drawn, even when one side has an extra pawn or two. Many of these positions would be a win if the bishops were on the same color. 
In an endgame with a bishop, in some cases the bishop is the "wrong bishop", meaning that it is on the wrong color of square for some purpose (usually promoting a pawn). For example, with just a bishop and a rook pawn, if the bishop cannot control the promotion square of the pawn, it is said to be the "wrong bishop" or the pawn is said to be the wrong rook pawn. This results in some positions being drawn (by setting up a fortress) which otherwise would be won. 
On 23 June 2016, Wague signed with Kazakhstan Premier League side FC Zhetysu until the end of the 2016 season. 
On 10 February 2021, he left Cypriot Professionnal League in order to sign in Malaysia Super League club Sri Pahang F.C.. 
This biographical article related to association football in France, about a defender born in the 1990s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Lynda Kinkade is an Australian journalist and a CNN anchor currently based at CNN's World Headquarters located in Atlanta, Georgia. Since August 2014 she has anchored the weekend editions of CNN International's CNN Newsroom and continues to anchor several weekday programs filling in on the European primetime show The World Right Now, the Middle East prime time show Connect the World and the Asia breakfast show CNN Today. 
Kinkade began her broadcasting career in 2002 when she joined the Seven Network in her second year of university as a political researcher. She worked on the 2003 New South Wales state election coverage. Her research on each electorate in New South Wales was published and used during the election coverage by the anchors, reporters and producers. 
Following the election Kinkade was hired by Sunrise and worked the graveyard shifts as junior producer throughout her final year of university. 
After completing her degree at the University of Technology Sydney with a distinction average, Lynda Kinkade moved to the country to gain field experience working as a roving reporter for NBN Television in Newcastle, New South Wales, Tweed Heads, New South Wales, Lismore, New South Wales. 
Lynda Kinkade joined the Nine Network twelve months later in December 2004 as an assistant Chief of Staff, going on to become a producer and reporter on Today, Nine Afternoon News, Nightline and Nine News Sydney. She also presented the weekend edition of the Qantas Inflight News. During her four years at the network Kinkade worked on coverage which included 2005 Nias Island Sea King crash, the death of Pope John Paul II, the 2004 Indian Ocean earthquake and tsunami  and 2005 Cronulla riots. 
In December 2013, Lynda Kinkade resigned from Seven Network and moved to New York City to work as a freelance foreign correspondent. She covered breaking news and filed reports for Sunrise, Seven News and Today Tonight. She also wrote for The Courier-Mail and The Daily Telegraph. Her stories including 2014 East Harlem gas explosion, the Ebola virus disease outbreak, and the downing of Malaysia Airlines Flight 17 and the Early 2014 North American cold wave known as the 'Polar Vortex.' 
Kinkade began commuting from New York City to Atlanta in August 2014 to anchor for the weekend editions of CNN Newsroom (CNNI). After several months freelancing CNN signed Lynda Kinkade full-time in January 2015 as an anchor and correspondent. 
All songs written by Randy Stonehill, except "Fire", written by Randy Stonehill and Jimmy Abegg; "Sleeping", written by Randy Stonehill and Phil Madeira; and "Little Rose", and "Everything You Know (Is Incorrect)" written by Randy Stonehill and David Edwards. 
Margarida Conte (born 2 September 1966) is a Brazilian handball player. She competed in the women's tournament at the 2000 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article related to Brazilian handball is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In computing, an office suite is a collection of productivity software usually containing at least a word processor, spreadsheet and a presentation program. There are many different brands and types of office suites. Popular office suites include Microsoft Office, Google Workspace and LibreOffice. 
Office suites for Android, BlackBerry, iPhone, Chrome OS, iOS, Symbian, Windows Mobile, Windows Phone, and others. Used in smartphones, tablets and other mobile devices. 
In October 1995 the airport was re-inaugurated as an international airport. To support this expansion of operations, the pavement on the runway was redone and special landing lights were installed. Also a firefighter station was added to comply with FAA and international regulations. Initial response from commercial airlines to the expansion was timid; however, after one year the airport went from having only one weekly charter flight to one almost every day. 
^1  United flies to Houston-Intercontinental Airport, and Southwest flies to Houston-Hobby Airport. The data here is for traffic between LIR and all airports in Houston. 
In 1920, he was part of the American boat, which won the silver medal in the coxed fours event. Eight years later, he won his second silver medal, this time in the single sculls competition. In 1932, he won the gold medal with his partner William Gilmore in the double sculls event. 
This article about a rowing Olympic medalist of the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Another example is in a surface-mount technology board assembly line with several pieces of equipment aligned. Usually the common sense strategy is to set up and shift the bottleneck element towards the end of the process, inducing the better and faster machines to always keep the printed circuit board (PCB) supply flowing up, never allowing the slower ones to fully stop; a strategy that could result in a deleterious (or damaging) and significant, overall drawback in the process. 
When input comes in faster than the speed of the process, accumulation starts to occur. This means that the machine either does not have enough capacity, is not being fully utilized (inefficient in use) or has an under-qualified operator. This method is not effective at identifying bottlenecks where the queues are at several process steps, as there are multiple processes with accumulation. 
Since the production line is directly linked to the output of the machines, it allows for the identifying of the main bottleneck in the manufacturing process. In changing each machines throughput, it will be possible to assess which machine affects the overall output the most, and hence determine the bottleneck in the chain of processes. 
By using the utilization percentage of each production unit, it is possible to determine the machine which uses the highest percentage of its capacity. This machine is bottlenecking the other machines by 'forcing' them to operate at a lower capacity. However, if all machines in the chain of processes are running at a similar capacity level, increasing the capacity of the lowest machine will not create a significant improvement to the total output. 
In the case where several production units are already running at full capacity, tracking the down time of machines will allow you to identify which machine is being bottlenecked. Usually the machine prior the machine with the highest wait or down time in the chain of processes is a bottleneck. The result of this is a machine being under utilized. 
A fishbone diagram is a graphical means for finding possible problems in a chain of processes. By collecting the different data related to the problem, and inputting them into the diagram, it becomes easier to analyze the data in the order it is used, and hence determine the root of the problem. This is commonly used to find the bottleneck in a chain of processes due to being able to pinpoint the machine precisely responsible for the delay in production. 
The consequences of having bottlenecks in production are possible stalls in production, supply overstock, fall in employee morale, and loss of customers. Bottlenecks can result in the overloading of a machine. Overloading a machine can lead to the machinery getting damaged or worn out, and the result of this would be potential stretches of downtime in the long term. 
A stall in production would be the result of one machine slowing down the entire chain of processes and consistently leaving the other machines unable to continue while it accumulates a large queue. This inefficiency significantly slows down production as many resources such as time, people, and machines are being paid to wait. 
In the event of accumulation in the long-term, the capacity at which the bottlenecked machine is running could be so slow that the accumulated resources that are in the queue need to be stored. The cost of storing resources is significant as it takes resources to transport the materials back and forth as well as requiring space, another potential cost. 
The result of bottlenecks could require more work from employees as well as longer hours. In addition, there's the factor of stress and frustration with the bottlenecked machine and its operator. This could result in loss of efficiency as employees may not be very motivated to work. 
In removing all non-value activities, you reduce the amount of redundant tasks performed by the bottlenecked machine and hence maximize efficiency. Removing the waste operations results in a shorter cycle time hence allowing the machine to complete each process in less time. 
In order to optimise the usage of the machine, the machine should be kept running for as long as possible and hence should never have to wait for materials or stock, to increase productivity. This can be achieved by putting a buffer stock in place, so that the machine always has some task it can be doing. The down side to this strategy is that inventory space will be needed to store the buffer stock, for when the machine before it in the chain of processes, is working. 
Establishment of standardized exchanged protocols, can minimise the potential for future bottlenecks to occur through minimising down time. This increases efficiency by reducing any potential confusion between different sectors and hence reduces the possibility for delays of the arrival of raw materials. 
Step 1) Re-evaluate the maximum load of every machine, process or work center when accepting a new order. 
Through following these steps, the order production will be completed in the shortest possible time frame. 
Installing hydroxyl groups into organic compounds can be effected by various metal catalysts.  Many such catalysts are biomimetic, i.e. they are inspired by or intended to mimic enzymes such as cytochrome P450. 
Whereas many hydroxylations insert O atoms into C-H bonds, some reactions add OH groups to unsaturated substrates.  The Sharpless dihydroxylation is such a reaction: it converts alkenes into diols. The hydroxy groups are provided by hydrogen peroxide, which adds across the double bond of alkenes. 
In biochemistry, hydroxylation reactions are often facilitated by enzymes called hydroxylases. A C-H bond is converted to an alcohol by insertion of an oxygen atom into a C-H bond. Typical stoichiometries for the hydroxylation of a generic hydrocarbon are these: 
Since O2 itself is a slow and unselective hydroxylating agent, catalysts are required to accelerate the pace of the process and to introduce selectivity. 
Hydroxylation is often the first step in the degradation of organic compounds in air.  Hydroxylation is important in detoxification since it converts lipophilic compounds into water-soluble (hydrophilic) products that are more readily removed by the kidneys or liver and excreted.  Some drugs (for example, steroids) are activated or deactivated by hydroxylation. 
The principal hydroxylation agent in nature is cytochrome P-450, hundreds of variations of which are known. Other hydroxylating agents include flavins, alpha-ketoglutarate-dependent hydroxylases, and some diiron hydroxylases. 
Marysburg is a hamlet in Saskatchewan located along Highway 756.  The hamlet is an un-incorporated place within the Rural Municipality of Humboldt.  It is located 16 k (10 miles) north of Humboldt. 
The hamlet is home to one municipal heritage property, the Marysburg Assumption Church, originally built in 1921 the brick-clad church is of a Romanesque Revival style featuring two towers. The church can hold nearly 400 people and makes extensive use of stained glass. Thirty two paintings by the artist Berthold Imhoff were purchased in 1948 to decorate the church. The church building hosts the Marysburg Summer Festival of the Arts.  A program to restore the historic church is in progress. 
NCBL Pennant Winners - 1979, 1982, 1984, 1985, 1986, 1988, 1989, 1991, 1992, 1993, 1994, 1997, 1998, 1999, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003 NCBL Champions - 1966, 1968, 1984, 1985, 1986, 1988, 1989, 1991, 1992, 1993, 1994, 1996, 1997, 1998, 1999, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003 
Saskatoon Senior Baseball League Pennant Winners - 2009, 2010, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2018, 2019, 2020 
Jealous of his personal ascendancy over Louis XVI, he intrigued against Turgot, whose disgrace in 1776 was followed after six months of disorder by the appointment of Jacques Necker. In 1781 Maurepas deserted Necker as he had done Turgot, and he died at Versailles on 21 November 1781. 
The Muslim 100: The Lives, Thoughts and Achievements of the Most Influential Muslims in History is a 2008 book, written by Muhammad Mojlum Khan and published by Kube Publishing, listing the biographies of the 100 most influential Muslims in history. 
The Muslim 100 is an attempt to explore Islamic history through the lives, thoughts and achievements of a selection of the most influential Muslims. 
By exploring the ideas, thoughts and achievements of the lives of 100 most influential Muslim rulers and conquerors, religious scholars and philosophers, writers and literary figures, scientists and explorers, military generals and freedom fighters, reformers and educationalists, this book goes through Islamic thought, history, culture and civilization. 
The Cola Wars refer to the long-time rivalry between soft drink producers The Coca-Cola Company and PepsiCo, who have engaged in mutually-targeted marketing campaigns for the direct competition between each company's product lines, especially their flagship colas, Coca-Cola and Pepsi. Beginning in the late 1970s and into the 1980s, the competition escalated, which gave this cultural phenomenon its current moniker of Cola Wars. 
Coca-Cola advertising has historically focused on wholesomeness and nostalgia. Coca-Cola advertising is often characterized as "family-friendly" and often relies on "cute" characters (e.g., the Coca-Cola polar bear mascot and Santa Claus around Christmas). 
Pepsi advertising is heavily supported by strategic sponsorships and online marketing. Pepsi's logo utilizes the red, white and blue colors of the Flag of the United States, drawing on a strong sense of patriotism throughout its branding. 
In 1975, Pepsi began showing advertisements based on the Pepsi Challenge, in which ordinary people were asked which product they preferred in blind taste tests. The study revealed that, when it came down to taste alone, consumers preferred Pepsi over Coca-Cola. This prompted Coca-Cola's creation of "Diet Coke," and later on, "New Coke," both of which led to a major shifting point in the Cola Wars. 
Coca-Cola first introduced their "Share a Coke" campaign in Australia in 2011 changing the traditional design of their products to display "Share a Coke with:" and have names printed on each bottle or can. The idea behind the campaign was to create a more personal relationship with their customers. 
Many of the brands available from the three largest soda producers, The Coca-Cola Company, PepsiCo and Keurig Dr Pepper, are intended as direct, equivalent competitors. The following chart lists these competitors by type or flavor of drink. 
Eliecer Montes de Oca Fleitas (born March 28, 1971, in Villa Clara, Cuba) is a Cuban baseball player and Olympic gold medalist. 
Eliecer Montes de Oca is a one time Gold medalist for baseball, winning at the 1996 Summer Olympics. 
This Cuban biographical article relating to baseball is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Vitale De Stefano (1889-1959) was an Italian actor and film director of the silent era. He played the role of Masinissa in Giovanni Pastrone's epic Cabiria in 1914. 
This biographical article related to film in Italy is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The draw for the preliminary single-legged round was held on 20 July 2017 in Zagreb. The matches were played on 23 August 2017. 
* Match played on 24 October. ** Match played on 31 October. *** Match played on 7 November. **** Match played on 14 November. 
The semi-final was originally scheduled for 28 February 2018 but was later postponed due to unfavourable weather conditions. 
The American Time Use Survey (ATUS), sponsored by the Bureau of Labor Statistics (BLS) and conducted by the United States Census Bureau (USCB), is a time-use survey which provides measures of the amounts of time people spend on various activities, including working, leisure, childcare, and household activities. The survey has been conducted annually since 2003. 
ATUS data is used by the Bureau of Economic Analysis (BEA) to account for the value of household production, the Bureau of Transportation Statistics (BTS) in their Passenger Travel: Facts and Figures report, and the Economic Research Service (ERS) to examine how time use patterns of eating affect health. 
ATUS data has also been used to help research worker productivity, social isolation, and how working parents balance the activities in their lives. 
Ronald Oneil Spence, Jr. was born in Camden, New Jersey, on September 14, 1992, and grew up in Woodbury, New Jersey. Growing up, he used to play drums in nursery, which got him interested in music. Ronny attended Rowan College at Gloucester County while still living in New Jersey where he met fellow Rose boy Corte$4Prez. He was also into arts and architecture before pursuing his music career. He moved to Miami, where he became part of Denzel Curry's group, C9 and Raider Klan. 
In May 2017, Ronny J signed a deal with Independently Popular and Atlantic Records. On February 23, 2018, he released his first mixtape under Atlantic, OMGRONNY. On August 14, 2020, he released his debut studio album, Jupiter. 
The Fearless Lover is a 1925 American silent drama film directed by Scott R. Dunlap and Henry MacRae and starring William Fairbanks, Eva Novak and Tom Kennedy. 
This article about a silent drama film from the 1920s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ros's orisha in the yoruba religion was Oggun. He would later become the Akpwon Mayor, and an Oriate. 
Jackson, also known as Jackson Station, is an unincorporated community in Cicero Township, Tipton County, in the U.S. state of Indiana. 
A post office was established under the name Jackson Station in 1863, was renamed Jackson in 1882, and operated until it was discontinued in 1905. 
Boggs lured a drunk 32-year-old Ellis Henry Greene into his office in Glendale, California and disabled him with a stun gun, then suffocated him with the help of co-conspirator Melvin Eugene "Gene" Hanson on April 16, 1988. 
The case was officially closed, and the body was quickly cremated at the behest of Hawkins, who collected the $1 million life insurance policy he had taken out on Hanson, cleaned out his bank accounts, and disappeared. Hanson also went into hiding, adopting an identity as Wolfgang Von Snowden.[citation needed] 
In Hanson's knapsack, the Customs agents found $14,000 of undeclared cash, several stolen or forged identification cards (including the California state driver's license of Ellis Greene), and a Dade County library book How To Create a New Identity. The Customs agents contacted the FBI in Columbus, and after confirming an outstanding arrest warrant, placed Hanson under arrest. Boggs was arrested the same week at his office.  
Hawkins managed to leave the United States despite a flurry of media exposure. His case was profiled on America's Most Wanted and The Oprah Winfrey Show, and reported around the world before Hawkins was captured off Sardinia by Italian police in 1991. While awaiting extradition to the U.S., Hawkins attempted to escape from prison, but this was thwarted by alert guards.  
Boggs and Hanson were both convicted of Greene's murder and multiple counts of fraud and were sentenced to life imprisonment plus nine years without parole, and Hawkins was convicted of conspiracy to murder and fraud and was sentenced to 34 years to life. Hawkins received a lighter sentence as he had not been involved in the actual murder; he was paroled in 2010. 
Richard Boggs died of a heart attack at the age of 69 on March 6, 2003 while serving his sentence at Corcoran State Prison. At the time of his death, Boggs had been HIV positive for over ten years, and had also been diagnosed with terminal pancreatic cancer. 
This biographical article related to a goalkeeper from Egypt is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Hey Everyone! is the debut album by Glasgow-based rock band Dananananaykroyd, released on 6 April 2009 on the Best Before Records label. The album debuted on the UK Albums Chart at number 154 in its week of release. 
Initial critical reception was generally positive, ClashMusic.com commenting: "Dananananaykroyd have made a debut album as unforgettable as their name is unwieldy, and it is a magnificent achievement." This Is Fake DIY also reviewed the album positively, saying "this is an album that's both satisfyingly violent, subtly tuneful and, dare we say it, not so hard to swallow that it has to stay an underground concern." 
An NME review criticised the track order of the album, claiming that the three singles "Black Wax", "Totally Bone" and "Pink Sabbath" being grouped together was an unwise choice. 
The record was recorded in the Machine Shop in Hoboken, New Jersey in July and August 2008. The music was recorded almost completely live in one room, John Baillie Jnr's vocals were recorded with Machine while Calum Gunn's were recorded separately in Southern Studios in London. While recording,  the band's guitarist David Roy made home movies which are now on Vimeo. 
Deep-ocean Assessment and Reporting of Tsunamis (DART) is a component of an enhanced tsunami warning system. 
By logging changes in seafloor temperature and pressure, and transmitting the data via a surface buoy to a ground station by satellite, DART enables instant, accurate tsunami forecasts. In Standard Mode, the system logs the data at 15-minute intervals, and in Event Mode, every 15 seconds. A 2-way communication system allows the ground station to switch DART into Event Mode whenever detailed reports are needed.  
When on-board software identifies a possible tsunami, the station leaves standard mode and begins transmitting in event mode. In standard mode, the station reports water temperature and pressure (which are converted to sea-surface height, not unlike a depth gauge or a pressure tide gauge) every 15 minutes. At the start of event mode, the buoy reports measurements every 15 seconds for several minutes, followed by 1-minute averages for 4 hours. 
The first-generation DART I stations had one-way communication ability, and relied solely on the software's ability to detect a tsunami to trigger event mode and rapid data transmission. In order to avoid false positives, the detection threshold was set relatively high, presenting the possibility that a tsunami with a low amplitude could fail to trigger the station. 
The second-generation DART II is equipped for two-way communication, allowing tsunami forecasters to place the station in event mode in anticipation of a tsunami's arrival. 
In the wake of the 2004 Indian Ocean earthquake and its subsequent tsunamis, plans were announced to deploy an additional 32 DART II buoys around the world. These would include stations in the Caribbean and Atlantic Ocean for the first time. 
The United States' array was completed in 2008 totaling 39 stations in the Pacific Ocean, Atlantic Ocean, and Caribbean Sea.  The international community has also taken an interest in DART buoys and as of 2009 Australia, Chile, Indonesia and Thailand have deployed DART buoys to use as part of each country's tsunami warning system. 
In the 2018 budget justification for NOAA, the Trump administration proposed eliminating the DART system as part of a 56% cut to the tsunami warning program. 
The data sent from the anchored bottom pressure recorder to the surface buoy consists of the temperature and pressure of the surrounding sea water. It retrieves and releases data every 15 seconds to get an average reading of the current weather conditions. 
A very stable, long lived, very high resolution pressure sensor is a critical enabling technology for DART's bottom pressure recorder. It is a resonant quartz crystal strain gauge with a bourdon tube force collector. When compensated for temperature, this sensor has a pressure resolution of approximately 1mm of water when measuring pressure at a depth of several kilometers. 
where 1 is the multiplicative identity. The set of units U(R) of a ring forms a group under multiplication. 
Less commonly, the term unit is also used to refer to the element 1 of the ring, in expressions like ring with a unit or unit ring, and also e.g. 'unit' matrix. For this reason, some authors call 1 "unity" or "identity", and say that R is a "ring with unity" or a "ring with identity" rather than a "ring with a unit". 
In fact, Dirichlet's unit theorem describes the structure of U(R) precisely: it is isomorphic to a group of the form 
where      r  1   ,  r  2     {\displaystyle r_{1},r_{2}}   are the numbers of real embeddings and the number of pairs of complex embeddings of F, respectively. 
This recovers the above example: the unit group of (the ring of integers of) a real quadratic field is infinite of rank 1, since      r  1   = 2 ,  r  2   = 0   {\displaystyle r_{1}=2,r_{2}=0}  . 
In the ring Z/nZ of integers modulo n, the units are the congruence classes (mod n) represented by integers coprime to n. They constitute the multiplicative group of integers modulo n. 
The formulation of the group of units defines a functor U from the category of rings to the category of groups: 
Associatedness can also be described in terms of the action of U(R) on R via multiplication: Two elements of R are associate if they are in the same U(R)-orbit. 
In an integral domain, the set of associates of a given nonzero element has the same cardinality as U(R). 
Bhupesh Chaubey is an Indian politician and a member of 17th Legislative Assembly of Milak, Uttar Pradesh of India. He represents the Robertsganj constituency of Uttar Pradesh. He is a member of the Bharatiya Janata Party. 
Chaubey has been a member of the 17th Legislative Assembly of Uttar Pradesh. Since 2017, he has represented the Robertsganj constituency and is a member of the BJP. 
This article about a Bharatiya Janata Party politician from Uttar Pradesh is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Pierrette Perrin (died 1794), was a French industrialist.  After the death of her husband Claude Perrin in 1748, she developed his company in to one of the biggest faience-factories in France in Marseilles, with export internationally to both the Middle East, the West Indies and Latin America. 
The MPI CPfS conducts research on modern solid state chemistry and physics. Key open questions include "understanding the interplay of topology and symmetry in modern materials, maximising the level of control in material synthesis, understanding the nature of the chemical bond in intermetallic compounds and studying giant response functions at the borderline of standard metallic and superconducting behaviour". 
On 8 September 1944, days before Belgrade was taken by the Red Army, on the attack from the East, Metropolitan Anastasius (Gribanovsky), along with his office and the other bishops, left Serbia for Vienna. A few months later, they moved to Munich; finally, in November 1950, they immigrated to the United States, together with numerous other Russian Orthodox refugees in the postwar period. 
On the other hand, the ROCOR, by 1950 headquartered in New York, the United States, rejected both the Communist regime in the Soviet Union and the Moscow Patriarchate. Its leaders condemned the Moscow Patriarchate as a Soviet Church run by the secret police. 
Until well after World War II, most of the Orthodox Church properties in Palestine were controlled by leaders opposed to both the Soviet rule and the Moscow Patriarchate, i.e. mainly within the ROCOR. 
Historically, ROCOR has always affirmed that it was an inseparable part of the Russian Church, and that its autonomous status was only temporary, based upon Ukaz 362, until such time as the domination of the Soviet government over the affairs of the Church should cease: 
In 1997 Patriarch of Moscow Alexei II attempted to visit a ROCOR-held monastery in Hebron with Yasser Arafat. "The Moscow-based church has enjoyed a close relationship with Arafat since his guerrilla fighter days." The ROCOR clergy refused to allow Arafat and the patriarch to enter the church, holding that Alexei had no legitimate authority. Two weeks later police officers of the Palestinian Authority arrived; they evicted the ROCOR clergy and turned the property over to the ROC. 
At the jubilee Council of Bishops in 2000, the Russian Orthodox Church canonized Tsar Nicholas and his family, along with more than 1,000 martyrs and confessors. This Council also enacted a document on relations between the Church and the secular authorities, censoring servility and complaisance. They also rejected the idea of any connection between E. Orthodoxy and Catholicism. 
The episcopate of the ROCOR asserted that Metropolitan Vitaly was being held hostage by schismatics who took advantage of his failing health and used his name to produce a schism. They claimed that Metropolitan Vitaly's entourage forged his signature on epistles and documents. One of the churches which splintered from the ROCOR(V) is the Russian True Orthodox Church which was formed in 2002.  
In 2003 President Vladimir Putin of Russia met with Metropolitan Laurus in New York. Patriarch Alexy II of the ROC later hailed this event as an important step, saying that it showed the ROCOR that "not a fighter against God, but an Orthodox Christian is at the country's helm." 
In May 2004, Metropolitan Laurus, the Primate of the ROCOR, visited Russia participating in several joint services. In June 2004, a contingent of ROCOR clergy met with Patriarch Alexey II. Both parties agreed to set up committees to begin dialogue towards rapprochement. Both sides set up joint commissions, and determined the range of issues to be discussed at the All-Diaspora Council, which met for the first time since 1974. 
After a series of six reconciliation meetings, the ROCOR and the Patriarchate of Moscow, on June 21, 2005, simultaneously announced that rapprochement talks were leading toward the resumption of full relations between the ROCOR and the Patriarchate of Moscow. They said that the ROCOR would be given autonomous status. In this arrangement, the ROCOR was announced to  
"join the Moscow Patriarchate as a self-governed branch, similar to the Ukrainian Orthodox Church. It will retain its autonomy in terms of pastoral, educational, administrative, economic, property and secular issues." 
On May 12, 2006, the general congress of the ROCOR confirmed its willingness to reunite with the Russian Orthodox Church. The latter hailed this resolution as: 
"an important step toward restoring full unity between the Moscow Patriarchate and the part of the Russian emigration that was isolated from it as a result of the revolution, the civil war in Russia, and the ensuing impious persecution against the Orthodox Church."
On December 28, 2006, the leaders officially announced that the Act of Canonical Communion would be signed.  The signing took place on May 17, 2007, followed immediately by a full restoration of communion with the Moscow Patriarchate. It was celebrated by a Divine Liturgy at the Cathedral of Christ the Savior in Moscow, at which the Patriarch of Moscow and All Russia Alexius II and the First-Hierarch of ROCOR concelebrated for the first time in history. 
Present at all of this was Russian President Vladimir Putin, who was thanked by Patriarch Alexey for helping to facilitate the reconciliation. Putin addressed the audience of Orthodox Christians, visitors, clergy, and press, saying,  
"The split in the church was caused by an extremely deep political split within Russian society itself. We have realized that national revival and development in Russia are impossible without reliance on the historical and spiritual experience of our people. We understand well, and value, the power of pastoral words which unite the people of Russia. That is why restoring the unity of the church serves our common goals."
The Hierarchs of the Russian Church Abroad served again with the Patriarch on 19 May, in the consecration of the Church of the New Martyrs in Butovo firing range. They had laid the cornerstone of the church in 2004 during their initial visit. 
ROCOR oversees and owns properties of the Russian Ecclesiastical Mission in Jerusalem, which acts as caretaker to three holy sites in East Jerusalem and Palestine, all of which are monasteries. 
The main source of income for the ROCOR central authority is lease of a part of the building that houses the headquarters of the ROCOR's Synod of Bishops situated at the intersection of East 93rd Street and Park Avenue to a private school, estimated in 2016 to generate about USD 500,000; the ROCOR was said not to make any monetary contributions towards the ROC's budget. 
In 2011, the ROCOR declared all of its Western Rite parishes to be a "vicariate", parallel to the Antiochian Western Rite Vicariate, and established a website. 
On 10 July 2013, an extraordinary session of the Synod of Bishops of ROCOR removed Bishop Jerome of Manhattan and Fr Anthony Bondi from their positions in the vicariate; ordered a halt to all ordinations and a review of those recently conferred by Bishop Jerome; and decreed preparations be made for the assimilation of existing Western Rite communities to mainstream ROCOR liturgical practice. 
Another composer of Josquin's generation who was important in the development of the paraphrase mass was Pierre de La Rue.  Like Josquin, he began with the cantus firmus technique, and continued to use it for most of his life; but he began to elaborate the source material, eventually integrating it into multiple voices of a polyphonic texture where all the voices had equal weight. 
Paraphrase masses were written relatively infrequently in England and Germany, especially after the Protestant Reformation.  Composers of masses in those regions developed styles independently, and in both areas tended to use variations of the cantus firmus technique. 
Umberto was in the process of restoring Fiat's fortunes, following a period in which the company's balance sheet, market share and share value had all been in decline, when he suddenly died of lung cancer after barely 18 months in control. Despite this, Forbes magazine estimated he was the world's 68th richest man with an approximate net worth of US$5.5 billion. He was a member of the Steering Committee of the Bilderberg Group. 
Agnelli was born in Lausanne, Switzerland, the youngest of seven children. His life was beset by an unusual amount of tragedy and bereavement. His father Edoardo Agnelli perished in an air crash when he was one year old, and his mother Virginia died in a car accident ten years later when he was just 11 years old. 
In 1959 Agnelli married the heiress Donna Antonella Bechi Piaggio, from the well-known business-family of Piaggio. They had three sons but their first, twin boys, died shortly after birth. The third son, Giovanni Alberto Agnelli, grew up to be the head of the maternal family-firm Piaggio, and was being groomed to succeed at Fiat, but died of cancer at the age of 33 in 1997. 
Umberto and Antonella Agnelli later divorced, and in 1974 Umberto married Donna Allegra Caracciolo di Castagneto. Allegra is the first cousin of Umberto's sister in law Marella Caracciolo di Castagneto, the wife of his brother Giovanni (Gianni). The ladies come from the old Neapolitan noble family that has, among other, the titles of nobility of Prince of Castagneto and Duke of Melito. 
Umberto and Allegra had two children: Andrea (born 1975) and Anna (born 1977). Andrea later followed in his father's footsteps by becoming chairman of Juventus, in 2010. 
This rail line will link cities of Nayagarh, Phulbani, Boudh and Sonepur with Bhubaneswar and Bolangir. Smaller towns like Daspalla, Banigochha and Mahipur will also be linked by this rail line. Work at Bolangir side of this project is completed up till Bichhupali and Bhainsapali. 
This will connect Nayagarh, Phulbani, Boudh, Sonepur and Balangir which are economically backward districts in the state. 
The 41.5-km railway line between Khurda Road and Rajsunakhala has already been commissioned and two pairs of trains are running along the stretch. 
On 20 March 2017, Mr Suresh Prabhu flag off the extension of Khurda Road-Rajsunakhala passenger train up to newly built Bolagarh Road station. 
7.https://m.timesofindia.com/city/bhubaneswar/odisha-year-on-bichhupali-station-inaugurated-by-pm-gets-two-passengers-a-day/amp_articleshow/73263728.cms
 As of December 17th 2020, the location of Andong Station has changed from downtown (adjacent to the Nakdong River) to near the edge of town (next to Andong Bus Terminal). 
This article about a railway station in South Korea is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Waldhauer was born on December 6, 1927, and grew up in Brooklyn, New York, United States. He received his bachelor's degree in electrical engineering from Cornell University and his master's degree in electrical engineering from Columbia University. 
Much of Waldhauer's career was focused on telephony and digital transmission, including work on T1 carrier systems. From 1948 to 1956, he was at RCA. From 1956 to 1987, he was a member of technical staff at Bell Telephone Laboratories in Holmdel. He published numerous technical and scientific papers on feedback and high-speed digital transmission, as well as writing a book on feedback theory, and early transistor design. He holds more than 14 patents[citation needed]. 
Waldhauer became a Fellow of the IEEE in 1977, and was a longtime member of the Audio Engineering Society. In addition to his professional memberships, Mr Waldhauer was a professional engineer in the state of New Jersey and a patent attorney. 
In Waldhauer's latter years, at Bell Laboratories, his efforts focused on advanced hearing aid design and technology. 
After retiring from Bell Laboratories, Waldhauer continuing work on hearing aid designs at what became Resound (acquired in October 2006 by GN (Great Northern) corporation). Waldhauer's work on programmable multi-band compression at Bell Laboratories, and later at  Resound, represented a fundamental shift in hearing aid design that still exists today. 
Lady Cecilia's first marriage was to Sir George Buggin, in May 1815. The marriage produced no children and Sir George died on 12 April 1825. 
As the marriage was not considered lawful, Lady Cecilia could not take the style and title Her Royal Highness The Duchess of Sussex. Instead she assumed the name "Underwood", her mother's maiden name, by Royal Licence and was known as Lady Cecilia Underwood. The couple resided at the Duke's apartments in Kensington Palace. 
The Duke of Sussex died in April 1843 at Kensington Palace and was buried at Kensal Green Cemetery. The Duchess of Inverness continued to reside at Kensington Palace until her death thirty years later in August 1873. She was buried next to her second husband. 
In 1972, Bacht continued his studies at the University of Heidelberg. His main interests there were European as well as East Asian fine art and architecture, and his key academic teachers were Peter Anselm Riedl and Dietrich Seckel. His formative encounter with Fritz Wotruba, whose work he cataloged as a doctoral student, also occurred during this period and incited him to pursue studies in fine art at the University of Mainz from 1974 to 1979. 
In 1973, Bacht married the judge Brigitte Holzinger from Freiburg, with whom he raised five children. 
The building was constructed in 1892, and housed one of the best known Chinese charity medical centres in Singapore. Traditional Chinese doctors or sinsehs used to dispense free treatment and medicine to patients of all races in Singapore. Today, it is used as a commercial building for the Singapore office for Forever Living Products. 
In 1867, two Chinese merchants got together to set up Singapore's first traditional Chinese medical institution for the poor. These compassionate men saw an urgent need for a charitable organisation that provided medical advice and assistance to those who could not afford to pay for it. 
Thong Chai dispensed free medical consultation, treatment and herbal medicines to the poor, regardless of race or religion. Its sincere efforts were appreciated and recognised and more benefactors joined its ranks. They came from all Chinese communities: Cantonese, Hoklo (Hokkien), Teochew, Hainanese and Hakka. 
Initially, Thong Chai operated out of a small rented shophouse on Upper Pickering Street, then known as Upper Macao Street. It was then called Tong Chay Ee Say. In 1892, it bought the building at 50 Eu Tong Sen Street, with which it has become most strongly associated, and changed its name to Thong Chai Medical Institution. 
Thong Chai Medical Institution is now located in a ten-storey building in Chin Swee Road, carrying on the Thong Chai tradition much in the way of its predecessors. They celebrated 150 years of operations in 2017. 
The late 1990s saw the building first becoming a nightclub and later a number of restaurants. In 2000, the building was acquired by Tung Lok Group and the building became a restaurant known as Jing. Not long after its opening, the group revamped its concept and named it Asian. Both restaurants proved to be unpopular, and it closed down in 2003 due to SARS outbreak. The building was unused for around two years and it was converted into its current use in 2005. 
The building is currently owned by Forever Living Products Intl, a multi-level marketing company selling aloe vera products. The company bought the building from the government in 2005 for S$7 million. The furnishing and such cost the company an additional $3 million as they imported the antique furnitures from Malaysia and China. 
The typically southern Chinese building on Eu Tong Sen Street comprises three main halls aligned on a central axis and separated by courtyards and an air well. The building was designed in a traditional Cantonese architectural style. 
In keeping with the social principles of southern Chinese architecture, the importance of the halls in the hierarchy of the building is reflected in the height of their ceilings. 
105 Mile Post 2 (2006 population 5) is an Indian reserve in the Thompson Country of the Interior of British Columbia, Canada, just west of the town of Ashcroft.  The reserve is administered by the Ashcroft Indian Band of the Nlaka'pamux people. 
This Indian Reserve should not be confused with 105 Mile House, which is a locality near 100 Mile House farther north. 
This article about a location in the Cariboo Regional District, Canada is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about an Indian reserve in British Columbia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
On December 26, 2019, Disney and ACIR announced they were mutually ending their relationship, which had covered twelve Mexican cities. Ten of the twelve Radio Disney stations, including XHPQ, were transitioned to ACIR's replacement pop format, Match. 
Year 1106 (MCVI) was a common year starting on Monday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar. 
Richard Holmes (born 7 November 1980) is a former footballer who played in The Football League for Notts County. He also had a loan spell at Hereford United in the Conference National. Holmes grew up in Bottesford, Leicestershire. 
This biographical article related to association football in England, about a defender born in the 1980s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Vivek Hallegere Murthy (born July 10, 1977) is an American physician and a vice admiral in the United States Public Health Service Commissioned Corps who has served as the 19th and 21st Surgeon General of the United States under President Obama and President Biden. Murthy is the first surgeon general of Indian descent, and, during his first term as surgeon general, he was the youngest active duty flag officer in federal uniformed service. 
Murthy was born in Huddersfield, Yorkshire to immigrants from Karnataka, India. He is the grandson of the late H C Narayana Murthy, the former director of Mysore Sugar Company, and son of Florida-based Dr H N Lakshminarasimha Murthy and Myetraie Murthy. In 1978, the family crossed the Atlantic to Newfoundland, where his father worked as a district medical officer. When he was three years old, the family relocated to Miami, and his parents established their medical practice. 
While a Harvard freshman in 1995, Murthy co-founded VISIONS Worldwide, which he led for eight years. The nonprofit organization focused on HIV/AIDS education in the U.S. and India. In 1997, he co-founded the Swasthya Community Health Partnership to train women as community health workers and educators in rural India. 
Murthy completed his internal medicine residency at Brigham and Women's Hospital and Harvard Medical School. As an attending physician at Brigham and Women's Hospital, Murthy cared for thousands of patients while assisting in the education of hundreds of undergraduates, medical students, and residents. 
In 2011, Murthy was appointed by Barack Obama to serve on the Presidential Advisory Council on Prevention, Health Promotion, and Integrative and Public Health within the Department of Health and Human Services. The group advises the National Prevention Council on developing strategies and partnerships to advance the nation's health through prevention. In 2012, Murthy worked as co-chair of Obama's health care advisory committee during his re-election campaign. 
Murthy is also the co-founder and chairman of TrialNetworks, a cloud-based Clinical Trial Optimization System for pharmaceutical and biotechnology trials that improves the quality and efficiency of clinical trials to bring new drugs to market faster and more safely. He founded the company as Epernicus in 2008, originally, to be a collaborative networking web platform for scientists to boost research productivity. 
In November 2013, Murthy was nominated by President Obama for the post of United States surgeon general. His nomination met resistance in the Senate by some Democrats, Republicans, and the National Rifle Association regarding previous comments Murthy made declaring gun violence as a threat to public health. 
Before his Senate confirmation, Murthy disclosed a total of 1.7 million dollars in consulting for Netflix ($547,500), Airbnb ($410,000), Carnival Cruise Line ($400,000), Estee Lauder ($292,500). He also disclosed hundreds of thousands of dollars in speaking fees from dozens of organizations, for example "$30,000 from Duke University Kenan Institute for Ethics for a speech I gave in January 2021." 
Murthy is married to Alice Chen, an internist who trained at Yale, Cornell and UCLA, and was the executive director of Doctors for America. They have two children. 
South Sudan was set to compete at the 2015 World Championships in Athletics in Beijing, China, from 22 to 30 August 2015. However, their only athlete did not show up in Beijing. 
World Wheelchair Rugby (WWR) is the international governing body for the sport of wheelchair rugby.  
WWR is a volunteer-run organization that supervises the international competitions and development of wheelchair rugby.  
It was created in 1993 as a sport section of the International Stoke Mandeville Wheelchair Sports Federation (ISMWSF). (The ISMWSF is known as the International Wheelchair and Amputee Sports Federation (IWAS) since 2005). WWR became an independent sport federation on 1 January 2010. 
A Pretty Mess by This One Band is an EP by American indie rock band Grandaddy, released in April 1996 through record label Will. It includes several songs taken from the band's earlier cassette-only release Complex Party Come Along Theories. 
Joe Palatsides (born 7 July 1965 in Melbourne, Australia) is a Greek Australian football (soccer) manager and ex-Defender. He is currently the technical director of the Football Association of Singapore. 
At 29, and with a wealth of senior football experience in Australia behind him, he tried his luck abroad in the country of his origin, firstly with Apollon Kalamarias in the Greek Super League. where he scored 3 goals in 12 appearances. 
On 2 May 2019, the Football Association of Singapore unveiled Joe Palatsides as its new technical director. 
Yang was born in Anqiu, Shandong Province in March 1957. After graduating from high school, he participated in the Down to the Countryside Movement launched by Mao Zedong.  Yang was sent to Liaocheng, then he worked in Jinan Military Region as a factory worker for an air force production plant. After the resumption of National College Entrance Examination, he entered Southwest University of Political Science & Law, where he majored in criminal investigation. 
In 1983, Yang was assigned to work at the Ministry of Public Security, where he served in a series of roles in the criminal investigation department. During this time he was sent to Harbin to serve as deputy police chief for a year, ostensibly to train him for larger assignments. In 1996, he was promoted to become the assistant of Minister of Public Security (department-level), a position he held until 2001. 
On 14 October 2015, Yang became the director of State Administration of Work Safety, replacing Yang Dongliang, who was investigated for corruption. 
Yang was an alternate member of the 17th Central Committee of the Communist Party of China and a full member of the 18th Central Committee. 
The U.S. state of Wyoming first required its residents to register their motor vehicles and display license plates in 1913. As of 2021[update], plates are issued and regulated by the Wyoming Department of Transportation through its Motor Vehicle Services division. 
Wyoming state law usually requires front and rear license plates. However, on July 1, 2015, a new law took effect that allowed custom and antique vehicles to display only rear plates, as well as vehicles that were originally manufactured without a plate bracket on the front. 
This is a list of electoral results for the Division of Angas in Australian federal elections from the division's creation in 1949 until its abolition in 1977. 
This article about a South Korean institution of tertiary education is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Accreditation Commission on Colleges of Medicine (ACCM) is an international medical review and accreditation agency service for medical schools. 
The National Committee on Foreign Medical Education and Accreditation (NCFMEA),   part of the United States Department of Education,  has listed ACCM as  "found to use standards to accredit their medical schools that are comparable to the standards used to accredit medical schools in the United States." 
The ACCM works on behalf of the governments in relation to medical school standards in the following Caribbean countries and one middle Eastern country and according to its site there is only one ACCM accredited medical school in each of the countries:. 
As of 2020, various schools (Aureus University School of Medicine in Aruba, Arabian Gulf University (AGU) in Bahrain and Jordan University of Science & Technology in Jordan) were pending onsite full accreditation inspection which would be schedule after travel restrictions associated with the COVID-19 global pandemic were removed. 
This article about a university or other higher education institution is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Teaching and research are based on a law library with more than 200,000 documents, which receives subscriptions of several hundred legal periodicals from Quebec, Canada, and internationally. 
The Laval Law School has educated many prominent Canadians. Many alumni have distinguished themselves in English and French Canada, most notably, in the fields of the civil service, politics, the judiciary, and business. 
Numerous public figures, including Prime Ministers of Canada, Premiers of Quebec, Supreme Court Justices, federal Cabinet Ministers, Senators, and Lieutenant-Governors attended the Laval Faculty of Law. 
Protoecotrausites is an extinct genus from a well-known class of fossil cephalopods, the ammonites. It lived during the Middle Jurassic. 
The Porcupine Provincial Forest is a boreal forest that covers the Porcupine Hills on the border of Saskatchewan and Manitoba. 
In 1930, the Saskatchewan Natural Resources Act was passed, which transferred control of Saskatchewan Forests (and other natural resources) from the Federal Government to the Saskatchewan Government. Once Saskatchewan officially received ownership of their natural resources, they created a Department of Natural Resources (DNR) to manage them. The rangers that had previously worked for the Dominion Forest Service now worked for the Saskatchewan DNR. 
GAC began the construction of facilities to produce vehicles for a new own-brand automotive marque in 2008. The first Trumpchi model to go into production, the Trumpchi GA5 sedan, a four-door mid-size saloon car model based on the platform of the Alfa Romeo 166, went into mass production in September 2010. The first 500 Trumpchi sedans produced were delivered to the organizing committee of the 2010 Asian Games in October 2010. 
The Trumpchi Sedan was formally unveiled to the public at Auto Guangzhou in December 2010, and public sales of the vehicles began in the same month. The Trumpchi GS5, a sport utility vehicle based on the same platform as the Trumpchi Sedan, was launched in March 2012. 
The production version of the Trumpchi GA3 compact sedan was unveiled at the Shanghai Auto Show in April 2013. 
In 2011, 17,000 Trumpchi vehicles were sold in China, the only market in which they were then available. A total of around 32,000 Trumpchi vehicles were sold in 2012. 
In September 2012, GAC announced that exports of Trumpchi cars to markets including Eastern Europe, the Middle East, South America and Southeast Asia would begin in 2013. 
This is a list of the 77 cases reported in volume 68 (1 Wall.) of United States Reports, decided by the Supreme Court of the United States from December 1863 to April 1864. 
Starting with the 66th volume of U.S. Reports, the Reporter of Decisions of the Supreme Court of the United States was John William Wallace. Wallace was Reporter of Decisions from 1863 to 1874, covering volumes 68 through 90 of United States Reports which correspond to volumes 1 through 23 of his Wallace's Reports. As such, the dual form of citation to, for example, Gregg v. Von Phul is 68 U.S. (1 Wall.) 274 (1864).   
Wallace's Reports were the final nominative reports for the US Supreme Court; starting with volume 91, cases were identified simply as "(volume #) U.S. (page #) (year)". 
When the cases in 68 U.S. (1 Wall.) were decided the Court comprised these ten members (this was due to the Tenth Circuit Act of 1863, expanding the Court's membership from nine to ten justices, to date the largest number of active justices in its history): 
Sporadic political violence would evolve into outright urban warfare after a series of violent outbursts. The Henry rebellion, the Coral Gardens incident, the anti-Chinese riots of 1965, the state of emergency of 1966-67, and finally the Rodney riots. These events were the beginnings of an ethnic nationalist element to Jamaican politics and a further normalisation of political violence in general in Jamaican society 
Political violence had become commonplace in Jamaica. Political parties began paying off crime bosses for local gang support. Assassination threats and attempts also starting becoming more frequent. By 1974 the PNP openly avowed their support for the principles of democratic socialism. PNP candidate Michael Manley began public praise of Fidel Castro. The JLP emerged as a right wing counter to this new emerging leftism. The Central Intelligence Agency began supplying weapons to JLP vigilantes. 
After international pressure the Jamaican government agreed to arrest extradite famed gang leader Christopher Coke. Some in the Jamaican media speculated that the long time it took to arrest Coke came from Prime Minister Bruce Golding's political assistance he received from Coke. During the raids and attempts to arrest Coke violent gunfights would break out throughout Kingston by his allies to prevent his capture. 
Despite many peace accords it is still common for political parties to pay off criminals for support and encourage paramilitary garrisons. 
The comic strip was about a girl who looked and acted like a boy, hence the name.  The plots mainly centred on typical problems which young boys would possibly find themselves in, only the twist was that it centred on a girl and not a boy. 
Christopher James Dijak (born April 23, 1987) is an American professional wrestler. He is currently signed to WWE, where he performs on the Raw brand under the ring name T-Bar (often stylised in all-caps as T-BAR). 
On December 19 (aired January 13, 2016), he was banned from Truth Martini's stable, initially turning face in the process. At the February 27 ROH TV tapings, Dijak came out with Prince Nana and attacked Truth Martini, turning heel again and making a rare double-turn with Jay Lethal and becoming Prince Nana's latest crown jewel in the Embassy stable. Dijak announced his departure from ROH via Twitter on February 12, 2017. 
In January 2017, WWE pulled a contract offer from Dijak, following a legal threat from ROH, who still had him under contract. The following month, Dijak opted not to re-sign with ROH, essentially putting his career on hold, waiting for another contract offer from WWE. On July 20, it was reported that Dijak was finishing up his independent bookings ahead of joining WWE. Dijak reported to the WWE Performance Center on August 21. His signing was announced by the company on September 5. 
As part of the 2021 Draft, Mace was drafted to the SmackDown brand while T-Bar remained on the Raw brand, thus disbanding the team. On the October 25th episode of Raw, T-Bar got himself disqualified in a match against WWE United States Champion Damian Priest after throwing an office chair at the champion. On the November 1 episode of Raw, He lost to Priest in a no disqualification match in which Priest retained the US title. 
Megachile paucipunctulata is a species of bee in the family Megachilidae. It was described by W. F. Kirby in 1900. 
Atacira is a genus of moths of the family Euteliidae. The genus was described by Charles Swinhoe in 1900. 
Rumas was appointed Prime Minister by Alexander Lukashenko on August 18, 2018. The decree had a clause on the subsequent approval of Rumas's appointment in the House of Representatives, but the Constitution prescribes an opposite procedure. According to Radio Free Europe/Radio Liberty, his predecessor Andrey Kobyakov was appointed in the same way. 
Rumas also heads the Football Federation of Belarus and the Organising Committee of the 2019 European Games in Minsk. 
On 16 August 2020, an Instagram account belonging to Rumas issued a message of support to anti-Lukashenko protesters and asked for those responsible for abuse against protesters to be held to account. Rumas's wife also published a photograph of herself and Rumas on the roof of a building overlooking the protests, together with a message of support. 
He is married with four sons, having been married since childhood. He is fond of hunting, fishing, and football. 
This article about a Tamil-language film of the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Lucian Cojocaru (born 21 December 1952) is a Romanian former sports shooter. He competed in the skeet event at the 1972 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to sport shooting in Romania is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Martin Falkeborn (born 8 January 1993) is a Swedish footballer who plays as a right back for IF Brommapojkarna. 
This biographical article related to an association football defender from Sweden is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The association offers its members with the opportunity to participate in numerous academic competitions, professional development programs, athletic programs and legislative tracking services as well. 
In addition to the opportunities to participate in academic competitions, professional development and athletics, the AISA also maintains an accreditation partnership with AdvancED and offers member schools the opportunity for dual accreditation through AISA & AdvancED. This partnership was formed in 2012 after the long history of accreditation being offered through the AISA. 
Red Marauder and Smarty had the race to themselves for much of the second circuit before the former surged clear of his tired rival from two out to record a distance victory. It was the slowest time recorded for a Grand National for one hundred and eighteen years. 
The Grand National win was a first for Sunderland-based horse owner Norman Mason who had entered Red Marauder in the previous year's race where he fell. 
Trainer Richard Guest was also the jockey that day and was in possession of the retired horse until the latter's death at the age of 26 on 22 November 2016. 
The London & South East Intermediate Cup involves a knock-out competition with 1st round, 2nd round, 3rd round, semi-finals and final.   The winners of the London & South East Intermediate Cup then go on to the national Intermediate Cup semi-finals where they face the winners of the South West Intermediate Cup.  There are 25 teams involved in the London & South East Intermediate Cup, all of which are 1st XV sides, coming from the following unions and level 7 leagues. 
The winners of the London & South East Intermediate Cup final would advance to the national semi-finals. 
The Midlands Intermediate Cup is a direct knockout cup with a 1st round, 2nd round, 3rd round, quarter-finals, semi-finals and final  The winner of the final goes forward to the National Intermediate Cup semi-finals where they face the winners of the Northern section. The competition involves 41 clubs from the following unions and level 7 leagues: 
The winners of the Midlands Intermediate Cup would advance to the National Intermediate Cup semi-finals. 
The winners of the Pool 1 (West) and Pool 2 (East) would meet in the Northern Intermediate Cup final.  The winners of this final would then advanced to the National Intermediate Cup semi-finals. 
The South West Intermediate Cup involves 19 clubs (1st XV only) from the following unions and level 7 leagues: 
9 clubs were involved in the Dorset & Wilts RFU Intermediate Cup qualification.  The winners would advanced to the Southern Counties semi-finals. 
7 teams were involved in the Gloucestershire RFU Intermediate Cup qualification tournament.  The winners of the competition would go through to the South West Counties final. 
The winners of the Dorset & Wilts Intermediate Cup would join representatives from the Berkshire, Buckinghamshire and Oxfordshire unions in the Southern Counties knock-out stage.  The winners would advance to play the South West Counties winners in the south-west regional final. 
The winners of the Gloucestershire Intermediate Cup would meet the representatives from the Somerset RFU in the semi-final, while the representatives from the Cornwall RFU would face the representatives from the Devon RFU.  The winners would advance to play the Southern Counties winners in the south-west regional final. 
The winners of the Southern Counties and South West Counties final would meet in the south-west regional final.  The winners of this final would then advanced to the national semi-finals. 
The Midlands winners would face the North winners in the first semi-final, while the London & South East winners would face the South-West winners in the other, with the winners of each semi-final meeting in the Twickenham final.  Home advantage in the semi-finals will be decided by a draw. 
Frederick Porter Hitz (born 14 October 1939) is an author and former Inspector General of the Central Intelligence Agency (CIA). 
Hitz entered the CIA in 1967 as an operations officer.  In 1973 Hitz was moved to the State Department, the Department of Defense, and Department of Energy, and then returned to the CIA in 1978.  President George H. W. Bush appointed Hitz the first statutory Inspector General of the CIA in 1990. 
Hitz played a role in the investigation into  CIA involvement in Contra cocaine trafficking during the Reagan administration. 
Hitz retired from the CIA in 1998 and took a position as Distinguished Practitioner in Residence in the Woodrow Wilson School of Public and International Affairs at Princeton University.  He is also a lecturer at the University of Virginia School of Law, Frank Batten School of Leadership and Public Policy, and Politics Department, specializing in intelligence and anti-terrorism law. 
This biography of a person who has held a non-elected position in the federal government of the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Lewis Llewelyn Dillwyn, uncle of the first Baronet, represented Swansea in Parliament from 1885 until his death in 1892. 
USNS Titan (T-AGOS-15) was a Stalwart-class modified tactical auxiliary general ocean surveillance ship in service in the United States Navy from 1989 to 1993. From 1996 to 2014, she was in commission in the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) fleet as the oceanographic research ship NOAAS Ka'imimoana (R 333). 
The U.S. Navy ordered Titan from VT Halter Marine, Inc., on June 30, 1986. VT Halter Marine laid her down at Moss Point, Mississippi, on October 30, 1986, launched her on June 18, 1988, and delivered her to the U.S. Navy on March 8, 1989. 
On the day of her delivery, the U.S. Navy placed the ship in non-commissioned service in the Military Sealift Command as USNS Titan (T-AGOS-15). Like the other Stalwart-class ships, she was designed to collect underwater acoustical data in support of Cold War anti-submarine warfare operations against Soviet Navy submarines using Surveillance Towed Array Sensor System (SURTASS) sonar equipment. She operated with a mixed crew of U.S. Navy personnel and civilian merchant mariners. 
After the Cold War ended with the collapse of the Soviet Union in late December 1991, the requirement for SURTASS collection declined. The Navy took Titan out of service on August 31, 1993 and struck her from the Naval Vessel Register and transferred to the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) the same day. 
The conversion of Titan into an oceanographic research ship began in May 1995 at the shipyard of Maritime Contractors, Inc., at Bellingham, Washington. Delivered to NOAA in April 1996 after completion of the conversion, the ship was commissioned into NOAA service as NOAAS Ka'imimoana (R 333) on April 25, 1996. 
Ka'imimoana has berthing for 33 people in 21 single staterooms and six double staterooms providing her with the capacity to carry up to 12 scientists. She can seat 24 people at a time in two crew's mess rooms, eight in the forward room and 16 in the aft room. She has a medical treatment room with one bunk, overseen by a United States Public Health Service Health Programs Officer. 
Ka'imimoana was home-ported at Pearl Harbor, Hawaii, and was the only NOAA ship dedicated solely to climate research. She supported NOAA's Tropical Atmosphere Ocean project, which is designed to improve understanding of the role of the tropical ocean in modifying the world's climate. 
Synclera danalis is a moth in the family Crambidae found in Sri Lanka. It was described by George Hampson in 1893. 
Uganik is a community in the Kodiak Island Borough of the U.S. state of Alaska. Other variations of the name that have been reported are Oohanick in 1805, Ooganok in the 1880 Census (population 73), and Uganak in the 1890 Census (population 31). 
The community is served by the San Juan (Uganik) Seaplane Base, which has scheduled passenger service subsidized by the U.S. Essential Air Service program. 
This article about a location in the Kodiak Island Borough, Alaska is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The ASSR did not exist in its original state very long. Already on 1 September 1921, Kabardin Okrug was split from the ASSR as separate Kabardin Autonomous Okrug, subordinated directly to the RSFSR. Next came Karachay Okrug, which was transformed into Karachay Autonomous Okrug on 12 January 1922; Balkar Okrug, which was transformed into Balkar Autonomous Okrug on 16 January 1922; and Chechen Okrug, which was transformed into the Chechen Autonomous Oblast on 30 November 1922. 
By the Decree of the VTsIK of 7 July 1924, the remaining territory of the ASSR was partitioned into the North Ossetian Autonomous Oblast and the Ingush Autonomous Oblast. The Sunzha Cossack Okrug and the city of Vladikavkaz were directly subordinated to the VTsIK until 17 October 1924, when North Caucasus Krai was formed and integrated all of the former ASSR in addition to those two units. 
Wild Opera is No-Man's third studio album which displays art rock, trip hop and dub influences that were developed from improvisatory writing sessions. 
In 1996, No-Man announced their return on a new label, 3rd Stone Ltd., home of Spacemen 3 and Bark Psychosis. This was led by the Housewives Hooked on Heroin single (a Hot Press "Single of the Fortnight"), a taster for the Wild Opera album which followed that autumn. 
Most of the album had emerged from a series of semi-spontaneous improvisations recorded over a few hours, rather than planned-out attempts at songwriting.[citation needed] The raw results of three such sessions appeared on the album. 
One of the Wild Opera tracks -"Dry Cleaning Ray"- was released as a single in 1997. It also spawned the Dry Cleaning Ray mini-album. Dry Cleaning Ray presented reworked Wild Opera material, Gainsbourg covers, remixes (such as "Punished For Being Born", Muslimgauze's version of "Housewives Hooked on Heroin"), and instrumental moments. It also offered new songs such as "Sicknote." 
This article about a location in Ritchie County, West Virginia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Jacques Dietrichstein was an Austrian ice hockey player. He competed in the men's tournament at the 1928 Winter Olympics. 
This Austrian biographical article relating to ice hockey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Forest Park is a suburb of Bracknell, in Berkshire, England. It and Crown Wood are in Crown Wood ward and named after the Crown Estate of Swinley Forest. It was built in the late 1980s as the town continued to expand. 
Facilities include a shopping centre, community centre , The Woodcutters public house and a Tesco Express. Savernake Pond offers walking and a play area . 
The first outing of the competition caused some newspapers to claim that "Nationalism marred contest" citing the fact that Quebec was painted on the backdrop to the competition deliberately separate from Canada and grouped with France. Despite this, there was noted by the same newspaper an impressive camaraderie amongst the athletes. 
Babacar Niang (born March 31, 1991 in Montbrison, France) is a French basketball player who played for French Pro A league club Le Mans during the 2009-2010 season. 
The Huis aan de Drie Grachten or Huis op de Drie Grachten ("House on Three Canals") is a 17th-century canal house in Amsterdam, at the southeastern end of the Wallen district. The name is a reference to the fact that the building faces three different Amsterdam canals. The south facade faces Grimburgwal, the west facade faces Oudezijds Voorburgwal and the east facade faces Oudezijds Achterburgwal. The address is Oudezijds Voorburgwal 249.  
The Huis aan de Drie Grachten is a double house in Dutch Renaissance style. A stepped gable crowns each of the three facades. The current structure dates to around 1610, although archeological study has shown that the oldest elements of the house date to the second quartile of the 16th century. The building has rijksmonument (national monument) status.  
There are two large 17th-century mantelplaces within the house. However, it is not known whether these were added during the 1909 renovations, or whether these are original elements of the house.  
The building remained in use as a bookstore until 2002.  The publishing house Uitgeverij Huis aan de Drie Grachten held office in the building for decades. The publisher focused mainly on literary and linguistic studies. Over Multatuli, a journal dedicated to the Dutch writer Multatuli, was also published here from 1978.  
Mwinilunga District is a district of Zambia, located in North-Western Province. The capital lies at Mwinilunga. As of the 2000 Zambian Census, the district had a population of 117,505 people. 
Longview is an unincorporated historic community in Benton County, Washington, United States, located approximately three miles west of Umatilla, Oregon on the north bank of the Columbia River, just above Devil's Bend Rapids. 
In October 1922, the developers of Longview in Cowlitz County, Washington petitioned the residences of Longview, Benton County to change the station name, freeing the name for their development in Cowlitz County. In exchange for a covered platform on which to drop the mail in a protected location, the residence agreed and the railroad chose the name Barger. Finally, on November 23, 1943, the station was renamed the original King until it closed in 1951. 
This Benton County, Washington state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The original Charter is still in the company's possession and is housed with the rest of its library and archive in the Guildhall Library. The company obtained a grant of arms from the College of Arms in January 1672. In 1766, the Court of Aldermen granted the Company its livery. The number of Liverymen was originally limited at sixty but has been increased in number over the years by approval of the City of London Corporation and currently stands at a maximum of three hundred. 
The Clockmakers Company is formally affiliated with the Antiquarian Horological Society, the UCL Observatory, HMS Protector, the Royal Navy's Ice Patrol Ship. and HMS Archer, a P264 Class University Royal Naval Unit based in Edinburgh. 
Datuk Rosni binti Sohar (born 1 February 1958) is a Malaysian politician and the Selangor State Assemblywoman representing Hulu Bernam. 
It was shown that in non-local gravity, Schwarzschild singularities are stable to small perturbations. Further stability analysis of black holes was carried out by Myung and Park. 
This biographical article related to association football in France, about a midfielder born in the 1980s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Thompson opted to join the Sheffield-based jazz-funk aggregation Floy Joy in 1984 where she featured on one album and scored two minor hits with the soul ballad "Until You Come Back to Me" (#91 UK pop) and "Operator" (#86 UK pop). In 1987 she duetted with Aztec Camera's Roddy Frame on the song "One and One" from the album Love. 
In 2018, Thompson recorded an album of Phyllis Dillon songs as a tribute to the late singer, set for release in 2019. 
Thompson has worked as a session singer with Michael Jackson, Stevie Wonder, Natalie Cole, Pet Shop Boys, Robbie Williams, Boy George, Maxi Priest, Sting, Billy Ocean, Chaka Khan, Aswad and M People. Composer for documentaries Comedy Central US. Channel 4. Musical director/ composer Babymother the movie.[citation needed] She is also the co-founder (with Adebayo) of Colourtelly, Britain's first black interest internet TV station. 
Muhammed K. Abubakar (born 19 October 1959) was appointed Nigerian Minister of Science and Technology on 6 April 2010, when acting president Goodluck Jonathan announced his new cabinet. 
Abubakar was born on 19 October 1959 at Zuru in Kebbi State.  He studied biochemistry at Ahmadu Bello University, Zaria where he earned a B.Sc. in 1982 and an M.Sc. in 1989. In 1994 he earned a Ph.D. in biochemistry from the University of Essex in the United Kingdom.  He has held administrative positions in government, and teaching positions at Usmanu Danfodiyo University. 
After being inaugurated as Minister of Science and Technology on 6 April 2010, Abubakar said that his ministry would be concerned about translating scientific ideas into production. 
Dieter Annies (born December 1, 1942) is a German politician of the Free Democratic Party (FDP) and former member of the German Bundestag. 
For the elections to the Volkskammer on 18 March 1990, he was placed third on the list of the electoral alliance Die Liberalen in his electoral district and moved into the Volkskammer as a member of parliament. On 28 September 1990, Annies was elected to the Bundestag by the Volkskammer of the GDR, where he remained as a member of parliament for the Free Democratic Party (FDP) until 20 December. 
This biography article about a member of the German Free Democratic Party (FDP) is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to an Australian cricket person born in the 1870s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
David Kiselak (born 2 August 1988 in Slovenj Gradec) is a Slovenian football Defender who plays for NK Dravograd. 
This biographical article relating to Slovenian association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Sannicandro has been called "a strong advocate for education funding and a strong voice for people with disabilities." 
While serving as state representative, he earned an MPA from Harvard University's John F. Kennedy School of Government in 2011. He also earned a master's and a Ph.D. in social policy from Brandeis University's Heller School for Social Policy and Management in 2015 and 2016 respectively. His doctoral dissertation was called The Effect of Postsecondary Education on Employment and Income for Individuals with Intellectual Disabilities. 
After leaving the House of Representatives, Sannicandro became director of the Institute of Community Inclusion at the University of Massachusetts Boston. He left that role in 2019 to become Director of the Massachusetts Association of Community Colleges, an advocacy organization on behalf of the fifteen public community colleges in Massachusetts, their Boards of Trustees, and the approximately 150,000 students enrolled in those community colleges. 
Cheltenham station is a SEPTA Regional Rail station in Cheltenham, Pennsylvania. Located at Old Soldiers Road and Hasbrook Avenue, it serves the Fox Chase Line. The station has a 17-space parking lot. In FY 2013, Cheltenham station had a weekday average of 267 boardings and 392 alightings. 
Cheltenham station serves the Burholme neighborhood of Northeast Philadelphia and the eastern part of Cheltenham Township. 
In 1993, the original 100-year-old station was destroyed by fire in what was ruled by the police as an arson. The station was replaced with a trailer serving as the ticket office. A new station and high-level platforms were opened in October 2007. 
 Below is a list of those who have held the office of Governor of Berwick-upon-Tweed, including the garrison at Holy Island (during English occupation of the Royal Burgh): 
Marutha served as Grand Metropolitan of the East until his death on 2 May 649 (AG 960), and he was buried at the cathedral in the citadel of Tikrit. He was commemorated in a hagiography by his pupil and successor Denha I, and later also added to the calendar of saints of Jacob of Edessa and Saliba bar Khayrun. 
A letter from Marutha to John, who succeeded Athanasius as patriarch of Antioch, is preserved in Michael the Syrian's Chronicle, in which he alleges the adoption of Nestorianism by the Church of the East and the dyophysite archbishop Barsauma's role in the persecution of miaphysites. 
Dan Paul Benjamin (born October 26, 1972) is a software developer, user interface designer, writer, and podcaster. He is the founder of 5by5 and owner of Bacon Method. 
In 2017, he released fireside.fm, a platform for podcasters. Benjamin holds a B.A. in Technical Writing with a Computer Science focus from the University of Central Florida. 
This biographical article relating to a computer specialist in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Aston Martin DP212 was a prototype sports car developed by Aston Martin for use in the 1962 24 Hours of Le Mans. 
The car was built on the chassis of a DB4 GT, but featured a streamlined body specifically designed to handle the high speeds of Le Mans.  It also featured a 4.0-litre Inline-6-cylinder engine, based on the DB4 GT's 3.7-litre Tadek Marek unit. Following its participation at Le Mans, the car was slightly modified to feature a Kamm tail design, which would later be used on the Aston Martin DB6. 
Aston Martin DP212 had many successful races during the 1970s in the hands of Mike Salmon. In 1973 the project car returned to motor racing and won twice at Silverstone, and once at Castle Combe, all with Salmon at the wheel. Salmon also won the Classic Car Championship in 1974; with five class wins, one overall win and two second places. In 1975 Mike Ottway acquired the car, however Mike Salmon still continued to race the car. 
In 1981 Mike Salmon won first in class at Brands Hatch, a fifth place at Silverstone and a significant win, against an all Aston Martins field in Dubai again in 1981. 
It is believed the registration (which it still holds today) of '212 DP' was acquired in the early 1990s. In 1995 DP212 appeared as a static exhibit at the Silverstone Coys meeting, with the car returning to the meeting in 1999 in the Pre '64 GT race. Where the car, driven by Mike Salmon and Gary Pearson, was in second place in 'Part 1' of the event. But during the first lap of 'Part 2', after taking the lead the car retired with Pearson at the wheel. 
In 1997 Lord Downe entered DP212 in a Concours event at Pebble Beach, Concours d'Elegance in California. 
In 1998 the car took part in the first R.A.C. TT Revival race at Goodwood, however it retired when in 2nd place. The car came back to the Goodwood TT Revival in 1999, with the car put on pole by Martin Brundle in a time of 1.27.635 (not bettered until 2006 after track had been resurfaced) but then crashed in practice by Pearson and therefore did not start (DNS). The crash heavily damaging the front end. 
In 2002 its present owner Wolfgang Friedrichs bought the car. He continued the Goodwood Revival trend, competing in the R.A.C. TT event in 2002, finishing 12th, with drivers Friedrichs and David Clark. Friedrichs and Clark again competed in the same event in 2004, 2005 and 2006. Finishing, with one DNF (2004) and two 10th-place results in 2005 and 2006. 
In 2013 the car, driven by Friedrichs and Simon Hadfield, finally finished 1st in the Revival TT race. Going at a blistering pace through the pack in the second, rain-soaked part of the race. 
Although, being extremely valuable, the car has been the most actively campaigned of the original surviving 'project cars' in recent years. 
Kane Tenace (born 4 July 1985) is an Australian rules footballer who played for the Geelong Football Club in the Australian Football League (AFL). 
Tenace was selected with the 7th Pick in the 2003 AFL Draft by Geelong Football Club. He was recruited from the Murray Bushrangers in the TAC Cup. 
Tenace debuted against Carlton in Round 2, 2004. His first season was fairly impressive, earning an AFL Rising Star nomination in Round 6, and winning Geelong's Best First Year Player Award. 
In 2006, Tenace completed his third season at senior level and had a reasonable year. He played the first eight games, but managed only another six after injuring his knee and missing rounds nine to twelve. In Round 14, he had a career-high 21 disposals against Carlton. 
Tenace began his fourth season in the AFL impressively, averaging just over 19 possessions a game, including a career-high 28 in Geelong's round eight win over Fremantle. However, he was struck down with hamstring problems in the second half of the season after playing his last senior game for the season in round 14. These injuries caused Tenace to miss playing in either of Geelong's winning AFL and VFL Premiership teams. 
At the conclusion of the season, after attracting interest from several AFL clubs, Tenace agreed to a new two-year deal to remain at the club until at least the end of the 2009 season. 
Tenace moved to Adelaide in 2010 to play for Glenelg in the South Australian National Football League (SANFL).  He performed well in his first season with Glenelg, finishing second in the club's fairest and best award. At the end of the 2013 season he moved back to Victoria to play for the St Mary's in the Geelong Football League. 
This Australian rules football biography of a person born in the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Opened in 1979, the gallery has a permanent collection, part of which is exhibited at any one time, and also hosts special exhibitions. 
This article related to art or architecture in Japan is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a location in the municipality of Srebrenica, Republika Srpska is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Augusta Township was one of the seven original townships of Northumberland County, Pennsylvania in the United States. It was formed in 1772 and ceased to exist on April 13, 1846 when it was divided into Upper Augusta and Lower Augusta townships . 
Rohde was rated as a master at thirteen. He gained the International Master title in 1976, followed by that of Grandmaster in 1988. At one point, he was ranked as high as 59th in the world. 
In 1975 he was the National Scholastic Chess Champions Junior High School Champion, and the following year he was the High School Champion. He won first place in the U.S. Open in 1991 as well as several other titles. He wrote the "Game of the Month" column for Chess Life from 1991 to 2006. 
This biographical article relating to an American chess figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Operation Khukri was a multinational operation launched in the United Nations Assistance Mission in Sierra Leone (UNAMSIL), involving India, Ghana, Britain and Nigeria. The aim of the operation was to break the two-month-long siege laid by armed cadres of the Revolutionary United Front (RUF) around two companies of 5/8th Gorkha Rifles Infantry Battalion Group of Indian army at Kailahun by effecting a fighting breakout and redeploying them with the main battalion at Daru. 
The Indian 5/8th Gorkha Rifles, 14th Mechanised Infantry and elements of the 23rd Mechanised Infantry, together designated as INDBATT-1, had been sent to Sierra Leone to aid the Government in the disarmament of the RUF rebels. Two rifle companies had been kept as a Quick Reaction Force. Elements of the 9th Para (SF), were also included. 
The RUF rebels had six brigades, one of which were deployed in the sector. This brigade consisted of four main battalions, and one Strike Battalion. They were armed with AK-47s, RPGs, APCs, and SAMs. Each battalion was deployed in a particular area: 
Phase I of the operation was the buildup of forces. Between 13th and 15th, the UNAMSIL forces were assembled at Daru and Kenewa. The IAF and RAF Aviation units were critical in the buildup, especially at Daru, since the area was cut off from the rest of the UN controlled areas. By midnight, 14 July, the buildup was complete. 
The units at Kailahun were informed of the plan, and constantly kept in touch with the HQ through satellite phones. The operational plans were conveyed in Malayalam to overcome RUF monitoring of communications. Since the operation required insertion by helicopters, the two companies at Kailahun were required to fall back 500 metres from the town itself, and secure two helipads. 
The use of SAS-supplied phosphorus grenades by 2 Para (SF) quickly laid waste the camp and denied any UN stores and supplies that would be left behind while the INDBATT companies conducted the breakout from falling into RUF hands. 
At approximately 10:20, nearly four hours ahead of schedule, 2 para (SF) affected a linkage with the 18th Grenadiers at Giehun (1807), which had landed there at around 10:00. The force commander landed at Geihun to congratulate the SF team commander for an excellent operation. 
After the airlift, the column reorganised and advanced towards Pendembu. They were faced with two major roadblocks along the road, the first was an 8-foot-deep ditch, and the second, a 4-foot-deep one, each covered by troops with small arms and RPGs. Continuous sniping and slushy roads hampered the progress, but the column secured the area, and using bridging stores carried in the column and dropped by the MI-8s, the units crossed the bridges, and continued on their way. 
At 06:20, after the extraction of personnel at Kailahun, the INDBATT-2, INDMECH QRC (Mech-2 Company), and the rest of the 5/8th Gorkha Rifles (Mot-2 Company) at Daru, commenced their operations. The 18th Grenadiers, alongside Infantry Fighting Vehicles from the Mech-2, and aided by artillery bombardment, secured a firm base along the road. 
The column continued to move towards Area-3 bridges, suppressing enemy fire with their IFVs, while 9th Para, part of the battalion's QRC, was airlifted from Daru in 3 MI-8s, and secured the bridges in Area 3. Maintaining momentum, the column met up with the QRC forces near the bridges at 1230 hours, and continued onwards to Pendembu. 
At 1430 hours, near Bewabu, the leading IFVs came across a ditch, covered by heavy small arms fire from higher ground on both sides. The Commanding Officer realised that his troops were in the kill zone. He immediately sent 4 Rifle Platoon to engage the enemy targets. The firefight continued for fifteen minutes, and the MI-35 strafed enemies on both sides of the road. 6 Platoon and INDENG units bridged the gap, and the column immediately set off. 
The convoy continued the rest of the way uneventfully. By 1730 hours, all the units had safely reached Daru. 
The operation was a complete success. All the besieged forces were evacuated successfully, with one casualty. 
Operation Khukri was not a success simply in tactical terms. It was the worst defeat that the RUF has suffered in recent times, and was a tremendous boost to UNAMSIL morale. The Indian Forces were met with a rapturous welcome, as they marched triumphantly into Daru. The people of Sierra Leone helped build the Khukri War Memorial on the bank of the River Moa. 
Red Chillies Entertainment, Dharma Productions, Azure Entertainment, and Flying Unicorn Entertainment are making a film based on Operation Khukri. Film will have Shah Rukh Khan, Ayushmann Khurrana, and Rajkummar Rao in lead roles. 
Tripura Industrial Development Corporation or TIDC is a state Industrial Development Corporation in the state of Tripura, India. 
The Tripura Industrial Development Corporation Limited (TIDC) was established in 1974 as a Private Limited Company under the company's act 1956. On top of that, provisions of State Financial Corporations Act 1951 have been extended to TIDC as well. This leads to TIDC performing the twin role of the State Industrial Development Corporation and State Financial Corporation. TIDC is a profit making PSU.  
Hodge is an unincorporated community in the Mojave Desert, within San Bernardino County, California, United States. 
The settlement was named after ranch owners Gilbert and Robert Hodge.  Hodge was a railroad station, supplying water from wells into the usually subterranean Mojave River. It was a desert stop on U.S. Route 66 between Barstow and Victorville. 
The 74th Massachusetts General Court, consisting of the Massachusetts Senate and the Massachusetts House of Representatives, met in 1853 during the governorship of John H. Clifford. Charles Henry Warren served as president of the Senate and George Bliss served as speaker of the House. 
1 (1780)  2 (1781)  3 (1782)  4 (1783)  5 (1784)  6 (1785)  7 (1786)  8 (1787)  9 (1788)  10 (1789)  11 (1790)  12 (1791)  13 (1792)  14 (1793)  15 (1794)  16 (1795)  17 (1796)  18 (1797)  19 (1798)  20 (1799)  21 (1800)  22 (1801)  23 (1802)  24 (1803)  25 (1804) 
26 (1805)  27 (1806)  28 (1807)  29 (1808)  30 (1809)  31 (1810)  32 (1811)  33 (1812)  34 (1813)  35 (1814)  36 (1815)  37 (1816)  38 (1817)  39 (1818)  40 (1819)  41 (1820)  42 (1821)  43 (1822)  44 (1823)  45 (1824)  46 (1825)  47 (1826)  48 (1827)  49 (1828)  50 (1829) 
51 (1830)  52 (1831)  53 (1832)  54 (1833)  55 (1834)  56 (1835)  57 (1836)  58 (1837)  59 (1838)  60 (1839)  61 (1840)  62 (1841)  63 (1842)  64 (1843)  65 (1844)  66 (1845)  67 (1846)  68 (1847)  69 (1848)  70 (1849)  71 (1850)  72 (1851)  73 (1852)  74 (1853)  75 (1854) 
76 (1855)  77 (1856)  78 (1857)  79 (1858)  80 (1859)  81 (1860)  82 (1861)  83 (1862)  84 (1863)  85 (1864)  86 (1865)  87 (1866)  88 (1867)  89 (1868)  90 (1869)  91 (1870)  92 (1871)  93 (1872)  94 (1873)  95 (1874)  96 (1875)  97 (1876)  98 (1877)  99 (1878)  100 (1879) 
101 (1880)  102 (1881)  103 (1882)  104 (1883)  105 (1884)  106 (1885)  107 (1886)  108 (1887)  109 (1888)  110 (1889)  111 (1890)  112 (1891)  113 (1892)  114 (1893)  115 (1894)  116 (1895)  117 (1896)  118 (1897)  119 (1898)  120 (1899)  121 (1900)  122 (1901)  123 (1902)  124 (1903)  125 (1904) 
126 (1905)  127 (1906)  128 (1907)  129 (1908)  130 (1909)  131 (1910)  132 (1911)  133 (1912)  134 (1913)  135 (1914)  136 (1915)  137 (1916)  138 (1917)  139 (1918)  140 (1919)  141 (1920)  142 (1921)  143 (1923)  144 (1925)  145 (1927)  146 (1929)  147 (1931)  148 (1933)  149 (1935)  150 (1937) 
151 (1939)  152 (1941)  153 (1943)  154 (1945)  155 (1947)  156 (1949)  157 (1951)  158 (1953)  159 (1955)  160 (1957)  161 (1959)  162 (1961)  163 (1963)  164 (1965)  165 (1967)  166 (1969)  167 (1971)  168 (1973)  169 (1975)  170 (1977)  171 (1979)  172 (1981)  173 (1983)  174 (1985)  175 (1987) 
176 (1989)  177 (1991)  178 (1993)  179 (1995)  180 (1997)  181 (1999)  182 (2001)  183 (2003)  184 (2005)  185 (2007)  186 (2009)  187 (2011)  188 (2013)  189 (2015)  190 (2017)  191 (2019)  192 (2021)  
The men's road race at the 1993 UCI Road World Championships was the 60th edition of the event. The race took place on Sunday 29 August 1993 in Oslo, Norway. The race was won by Lance Armstrong of the United States. 
XHMTLA-FM is a public radio station on 98.3 FM, owned by the municipality of Tlatlaya, State of Mexico. The station broadcasts from studios and a transmitter located at the municipal government building. 
XHMTLA-FM's concession was awarded in 2018. The station officially came on the air December 1 after testing for nearly two months. 
This article about a radio station in the State of Mexico is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In September Shin along with bandmate Lee Min-woo performed at the West Bank Music Festival in Shanghai from September 30 to October 2, as K-Pop representatives along with other international artists such as Michael Bolton in front of an audience of 100,000 people. 
The Chain of Rocks Lock is operated by the St. Louis District of the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers. Locks No. 27 are the southernmost locks on the Mississippi River and they are the only Locks south of the confluence of the Mississippi River and Missouri River. As such, the Locks move more cargo than any other navigation structure on the Mississippi River. 
This biographical article related to a Brazilian association football midfielder born in the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Jamshed Ismailov (born 12 January 1987) is a Tajikistani footballer who currently plays for Regar-TadAZ Tursunzoda. He is a member of the Tajikistan national football team in the 2010 FIFA World Cup qualification campaign. 
This biographical article related to Tajikistani association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Psammophory is a method by which certain plants armor themselves with sand on their body parts making chances less for them to be eaten by animals.  Over 200 species of plants hailing from 88 genera in 34 families have been identified as psammorphorous. 
The term was first proposed in 1989 by scientists studying the habits of the beetle Georissus which actively covers its elytra with sand or mud particles. 
Richardson sailed from Glasgow to Manila in 1837 to join the firm Paterson & Co.  They subsequently became McEwen & Co. and moved to Singapore and Java in 1851 
In 1853, Richardson relocated with his firm back to the United Kingdom.  He became a director of the Borneo Company on its formation in 1856, progressing to Chairman from 1871 until his death in 1896. 
Caldecote is a village and civil parish in Cambridgeshire, in the district of South Cambridgeshire, England. It lies south of the A428, approximately six miles west of Cambridge and three miles east of Cambourne. 
Nearby settlements are Hardwick and Toft to the east, Bourn to the west, Childerley to the north and Kingston to the south. Bourn Airfield lies on the north-west edge of the village. 
The older part of the village lies to the south, just off the B1046 road and is mentioned in the Domesday Book of 1086. The parish church, St. Michael and All Angels, parts of which date to the 14th century, is in this part of the village. Bourn Brook and the route of the former Oxford and Cambridge Railway run to the south of the village. 
Highfields Caldecote is a newer development in the north of the village. The A428 was converted to a dual carriageway and was opened in 2007, allowing easier access. 
The development in Highfields led to a rapid increase in the population of Caldecote from an estimated 800 in 2001 to 1,737 in 2011. It now proudly boasts a  hairdressers, named Caldecutz, and a Social Club. 
The village was home to the headquarters[citation needed] of the Raspberry Pi Foundation, a charity known worldwide for developing the Raspberry Pi computer system. 
This biographical article related to Judo in Canada is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to Japanese athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He also received the French Community of Belgium quinquennial prize of literature for (culmination of work), and Tristan Tzara prize for scraping wings. 
Bob Strait (born April 12, 1949) is an American stock car racing driver. He was one of the pioneer NASCAR SuperTruck Series drivers. He has sixteen ARCA victories. 
This biographical article related to United States auto racing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Cyprus participated in the Junior Eurovision Song Contest 2008 as host country. Elena Mannouri and Charis Savva represented the country with the song "Gioupi gia!". 
The final was held on 28 June 2008, hosted by Christiana Stavrou and Kiriakos Pastides. The winner was chosen by a combination of votes from a professional jury (40%) and public televoting (60%). 
Camay Calloway was born to Cab Calloway and Zelma Proctor at Harlem Hospital in New York on January 15, 1927. Her teenaged parents were not married, they met while attending high school in Baltimore, Maryland. The pregnancy was kept a secret and Proctor was sent to New York to give birth. After staying with some relatives for a while, she returned to Baltimore. 
In 1968, she became the supervisor of Arlington Public Schools for a decade. In 1978, she became principal at Ashlawn Elementary School where she remained until her retirement in 1993. During her tenure as principal, she opened a black heritage museum at Ashlawn, and the school was recognized as a National Blue Ribbon School. 
In 1994, Murphy relocated to Baltimore to work as a cultural development consultant at Coppin State University. Her father died later that year and Murphy paid tribute to him by founding the Cab Calloway Jazz Institute and Museum at Coppin State University which promotes music education. She was also the chairman of Baltimore's Eubie Blake National Jazz Institute and Cultural Center. In 1999, she was appointed as commissioner of Baltimore City Public Schools' Board of Education. 
In 2008, 8.79 hectares (21.7 acres) of vineyard surface was in production within the AOC, and 274 hectoliter of wine was produced, corresponding to somewhat over 36,000 bottles. 
The main grape variety for Mazis-Chambertin is pinot noir. The AOC regulations also allow up to 15 per cent total of Chardonnay, Pinot blanc and Pinot gris as accessory grapes, but this is practically never used for any Burgundy Grand Cru vineyard. The allowed base yield is 37 hectoliter per hectare, a minimum planting density of 9,000 vines per hectare is required as well as a minimum grape maturity of 11.5 per cent potential alcohol. 
Baseball PEI is the provincial governing body for baseball in Prince Edward Island. It is a member of Baseball Canada and Baseball Atlantic. 
Due to Baseball PEI's efforts at the grassroots level, and its dedication to improving the skills and enjoyment of its members, it has been named Baseball Canada's "Province of the Year" in 2013 (in which it shared with Baseball Ontario) and in 2015. 
Baseball PEI is a non-profit organization that continuously enables the development of baseball skills and knowledge among youth across Prince Edward Island. 
Baseball PEI has a Board of Directors that makes rules, policies and procedures concerning the managing of affairs, discipline, and operation of Baseball PEI teams, associations and competitions. The Board of Directors of Baseball PEI is as follows:  
Each association is a member of one of four "AAA" zones across Prince Edward Island (each zone must have at least one "AAA" team in each age division each season). 
Other grassroots programs offered by Baseball PEI are the Winterball program (in partnership with schools across Prince Edward Island to distribute and implement over the past 10 years) and the Challenger program (in partnership with the Stratford Minor Baseball Association; this program is designed for players with a physical and/or mental disability). 
She is married to Eduardo Blaquier and has three children. Her daughter, Delfina Blaquier, was a competitive track & field athlete. 
Marcus Edwin Gwyn (born November 4, 1977) is an American former professional baseball relief pitcher. 
After being drafted by the Oakland Athletics in the 2000 Major League Baseball draft, Gwyn made his major league debut on July 29, 2007, for the Los Angeles Angels of Anaheim. On January 4, 2008, he signed a minor league deal with the Florida Marlins, but was released on July 25, 2008, after spending the entire year with Triple-A Albuquerque. On July 29, he signed a contract with the Tohoku Rakuten Golden Eagles of the Nippon Professional Baseball(NPB). 
This biographical article relating to an American baseball pitcher born in the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This Caldwell County, Kentucky state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Parnassius jacquemontii, the keeled Apollo, is a high altitude butterfly which is found in India and Pakistan. It is a member of the snow Apollo genus (Parnassius) of the swallowtail family (Papilionidae). It is also fairly common at high altitudes from Chitral to Kumaon. 
Female. Similar, generally darker with the irroration of black scales more dense; the crimson spots are often larger and more brilliant. Anal pouch after fertilization "ovally scoop-shaped in front, convex beneath," furnished with a sharp high carina posteriorly. 
North-eastern Afghanistan, Indus Valley (Pakistan) and (Jammu & Kashmir), Tajikistan (Pamirs), Uzbekistan, South West China and Szechwan. 
It was produced by Robert Bruning an actor who had produced several TV series. He wanted to move into TV movie production and succeeded in selling Paradise to Channel Nine, who were considering making it a 26-episode series. According to the Sydney Morning Herald the network hoped the film "to be a slick, glossy offering along the lines of Banacek." 
This article related to an Australian made-for-TV movie is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 2013, Azar teamed up with and posed in an ad campaign for PETA, speaking out against animal cruelty in circuses and bullfights and asking fans to never attend either. 
Arafat remains a controversial figure. Palestinians generally view him as a martyr who symbolized the national aspirations of his people. Israelis regarded him as a terrorist. Palestinian rivals, including Islamists and several PLO leftists, frequently denounced him as corrupt or too submissive in his concessions to the Israeli government. 
In 1944, Arafat enrolled in the University of King Fuad I and graduated in 1950. At university, he engaged Jews in discussion and read publications by Theodor Herzl and other prominent Zionists. By 1946 he was an Arab nationalist and began procuring weapons to be smuggled into the former British Mandate of Palestine, for use by irregulars in the Arab Higher Committee and the Army of the Holy War militias. 
Arafat's full name was Mohammed Abdel Rahman Abdel Raouf Arafat al-Qudwa al-Husseini. Mohammed Abdel Rahman was his first name, Abdel Raouf was his father's name and Arafat his grandfather's. Al-Qudwa was the name of his tribe and al-Husseini was that of the clan to which the al-Qudwas belonged. The al-Husseini clan was based in Gaza and is not related to the well-known al-Husayni clan of Jerusalem. 
Fatah dedicated itself to the liberation of Palestine by an armed struggle carried out by Palestinians themselves. This differed from other Palestinian political and guerrilla organizations, most of which firmly believed in a united Arab response. Arafat's organization never embraced the ideologies of the major Arab governments of the time, in contrast to other Palestinian factions, which often became satellites of nations such as Egypt, Iraq, Saudi Arabia, Syria and others. 
On 13 November 1966, Israel launched a major raid against the Jordanian administered West Bank town of as-Samu, in response to a Fatah-implemented roadside bomb attack which had killed three members of the Israeli security forces near the southern Green Line border. In the resulting skirmish, scores of Jordanian security forces were killed and 125 homes razed. This raid was one of several factors that led to the 1967 Six-Day War. 
At the same time, Nasser contacted Arafat through the former's adviser Mohammed Heikal and Arafat was declared by Nasser to be the "leader of the Palestinians." In December 1967 Ahmad Shukeiri resigned his post as PLO Chairman. Yahya Hammuda took his place and invited Arafat to join the organization. Fatah was allocated 33 of 105 seats of the PLO Executive Committee while 57 seats were left for several other guerrilla factions. 
When the Palestinian National Council (PNC) convened in Cairo on 3 February 1969, Yahya Hammuda stepped down from his chairmanship of the PLO. Arafat was elected chairman on 4 February. He became Commander-in-Chief of the Palestinian Revolutionary Forces two years later, and in 1973, became the head of the PLO's political department. 
Because of Lebanon's weak central government, the PLO was able to operate virtually as an independent state. During this time in the 1970s, numerous leftist PLO groups took up arms against Israel, carrying out attacks against civilians as well as military targets within Israel and outside of it. 
In addition, some circles within the US State Department viewed Arafat as an able diplomat and negotiator who could get support from many Arab governments at once. An example of that, we find in March 1973 that Arafat tried to arrange for a meeting between the President of Iraq and the Emir of Kuwait in order to resolve their disputes. 
Following recognition, Arafat established relationships with a variety of world leaders, including Saddam Hussein and Idi Amin. Arafat was Amin's best man at his wedding in Uganda in 1975. 
Arafat returned to Lebanon a year after his eviction from Beirut, this time establishing himself in the northern Lebanese city of Tripoli. This time Arafat was expelled by a fellow Palestinian working under Hafez al-Assad. Arafat did not return to Lebanon after his second expulsion, though many Fatah fighters did. 
Arafat and Fatah's center for operations was based in Tunis, the capital of Tunisia, until 1993. In 1985 Arafat narrowly survived an Israeli assassination attempt when Israeli Air Force F-15s bombed his Tunis headquarters as part of Operation Wooden Leg, leaving 73 people dead; Arafat had gone out jogging that morning. 
During the 1980s, Arafat received financial assistance from Libya, Iraq and Saudi Arabia, which allowed him to reconstruct the badly damaged PLO. This was particularly useful during the First Intifada in December 1987, which began as an uprising of Palestinians against the Israeli occupation of the West Bank and Gaza Strip. The word Intifada in Arabic is literally translated as "tremor"; however, it is generally defined as an uprising or revolt. 
In mid-1996, Benjamin Netanyahu was elected Prime Minister of Israel. Palestinian-Israeli relations grew even more hostile as a result of continued conflict. Despite the Israel-PLO accord, Netanyahu opposed the idea of Palestinian statehood. In 1998, US President Bill Clinton persuaded the two leaders to meet. The resulting Wye River Memorandum detailed the steps to be taken by the Israeli government and PNA to complete the peace process. 
Arafat's ability to adapt to new tactical and political situations was perhaps tested by the rise of the Hamas and PIJ organizations, Islamist groups espousing rejectionist policies with Israel. These groups often bombed non-military targets, such as malls and movie theaters, to increase the psychological damage and civilian casualties. In the 1990s, these groups seemed to threaten Arafat's capacity to hold together a unified nationalist organization with a goal of statehood. 
An attack carried out by Hamas militants in March 2002 killed 29 Israeli civilians celebrating Passover, including many senior citizens. In response, Israel launched Operation Defensive Shield, a major military offensive into major West Bank cities. Mahmoud al-Zahar, a Hamas leader in Gaza, stated in September 2010 that Arafat had instructed Hamas to launch what he termed "military operations" against Israel in 2000 when Arafat felt that negotiations with Israel would not succeed. 
Under the Oslo Peace Accords, Israel undertook to deposit the VAT tax receipts on goods purchased by Palestinians into the Palestinian treasury. Until 2000, these monies were transferred directly to Arafat's personal accounts at Bank Leumi, in Tel Aviv.  
Numerous theories have circulated regarding Arafat's death, with the most prominent being poisoning (possibly by polonium) and AIDS-related illnesses, as well as liver disease or a platelet disorder. 
On 27 November 2012, three teams of international investigators, a French, a Swiss, and a Russian team, collected samples from Arafat's body and the surrounding soil in the mausoleum in Ramallah, to carry out an investigation independently from each other. 
The Ducal Palace or Palazzo Ducale of Atina is a 14th-century gothic-style, government palace in Piazza Saturno, in the center of the town of Atina, province of Rieti, region of Lazio, Italy.   
The tall facade has three mullioned windows and above three oval rose windows. The main portal has a pointed Gothic arch. Above the entrance is an Ancient Roman spolia, poorly conserved, of a low relief depicting a votive offering, dating to the first Imperial period. To the right of the portal is an Ancient Roman statue, presumably of a high ranking official, but nicknamed Pasquino. Flanking the facade are two medieval rectangular towers.   
The palace now serves as the Town Hall, the Register Office, and a display on the archeology of the region. 
This is a list of television shows,  movies and video games that were either filmed, or set, in the U.S. state of West Virginia 
Worrell is a Senior Research Associate at University College London, having joined the university in May 2003. Worrell worked as the Finds Liaison Officer for Hampshire for the Portable Antiquities Scheme before taking up the role of National Finds Adviser (Prehistoric, Iron Age, and Roman Artefacts) there. Whilst working as FLO for Hampshire she appeared in an episode of Time Team. 
Since 2003 she has contributed to the annual reporting of Romano-British metal detected finds to the journal Britannia. 
In 1939, at the outbreak of the Second World War, he joined the army. While in military service, he sent radio scripts to the British Forces Network in London, which resulted in him being recruited by the variety department. He soon became a producer for the Network. By the end of the war, he had risen to the rank of major. He left the army in 1947. 
Returning to civilian life, Colehan moved into working for the BBC. He first came to prominence in 1948 as the producer responsible for the radio quiz programme Have A Go, hosted by Wilfred Pickles. The programme was recorded on location at community centres and town halls across the UK. Colehan would personally hand the prize money to the winning contestant, in response to the audience cry of "Give him (or her) the money, Barney!" 
As a light entertainment producer Colehan produced the first programme when television arrived in the North of England in 1951. One of his early successes was Top Town, a talent show pitting contestants from neighbouring towns against each other. 
Colehan was also involved in other major television successes. Colehan had the idea in 1963 of making a TV version of Jimmy Savile's popular Radio Luxembourg show Teen and Twenty Disc Club. He produced the pilot which later became Top of the Pops. In August 1966, Colehan brought It's a Knockout to the screen which ran for 16 years under his watch. 
In 1981, he was made a Member of the Order of the British Empire for services to entertainment. The following year, he was awarded the British Academy of Composers & Songwriters Gold Badge for lasting contribution to the UK's entertainment industry. 
He retired from the BBC in 1983, after the last broadcast of The Good Old Days. In 1985, he directed a television special for Channel 4 entitled Don't Say Goodbye, Miss Ragtime!, which featured various performances of ragtime music on a riverboat. 
Barney suffered a stroke whilst playing golf (Otley), his favourite pastime, and died on 21 September 1991 in hospital at Rawdon, near Leeds. 
Colehan was married to Monica, they had two children Margaret and Eileen. Although Colehan travelled extensively, he never lived outside of Yorkshire. Barney was a member at Otley Golf Club 
With the help of her devoted manager and girlfriend, Vaggie (Monica Franco), and their reluctant first patron, pornographic film actor Angel Dust (Michael Kovach), she's determined to make her dream become a reality. But when her proposal on live television goes awry, her plan attracts the attention of the powerful "Radio Demon" Alastor (Edward Bosco) who, despite finding her belief in redemption laughable, wants to help Charlie run the hotel for his own amusement. 
In July 2020, a webcomic titled "Dirty Healings" that showed how Angel Dust came to know the hotel was completed, containing twenty-two pages and hosted on the official website. Another comic titled "A Day in the Afterlife" which focused on Alastor's daily life in Hell was uploaded to the website on October 19, 2020, containing sixteen pages. 
On August 7, 2020, A24 picked up Hazbin Hotel for the production of a TV series.[c] In January 2021, in a white paper about the increase in adult animation, John Evershed, founder of Mondo Media, described the series as a rare exception to shows on YouTube that are picked up by companies as a "long form TV series." He argued that the show generated enough attention and views to interest A24 in producing the show as a TV series. 
The Springfield Armory SAINT[a] is a series of AR-15 style semi-automatic firearms manufactured by Springfield Armory, Inc. Introduced in November 2016, the series includes rifles, short-barreled rifles (SBRs), and pistols. Variants are marketed under the SAINT, SAINT Victor, and SAINT Edge brand names. The series is primarily chambered for 5.56 NATO, while some models are also available in .308 Winchester or .300 Blackout. 
The SAINT Edge variant was introduced in mid-November 2017, featuring a modular trigger system, mid-sized charging handle, and muzzle brake. A year later, a pistol version of the Edge was added. Two additional Edge pistols with different braces were announced in January 2020. 
The mid-range SAINT Victor variant, in rifle, pistol, and short-barreled rifle offerings, was announced in January 2019. Models chambered for .308 Winchester were later announced; rifle in April 2019, and pistol in January 2020. 
In February 2019, Springfield Armory contrasted the SAINT, SAINT Victor, and SAINT Edge rifle offerings as follows: 
The Scottish Greyhound Derby is an original classic greyhound competition held at Shawfield Stadium. 
Held at Carntyne Stadium from 1928 to 1968, after the closure of Carntyne the race appeared at Shawfield from 1970 until 1985. 
In 1988 the Greyhound Racing Association (GRA), moved the race to Powderhall Stadium in Edinburgh because they had the rights to the event and wanted it to take place at one of their tracks. After just two years it returned to Glasgow and Shawfield following the sale of Powderhall by the GRA. 
He was born Francis Factor in St. Louis, Missouri, the son of Max Factor, a Polish-Jewish businessman and cosmetics pioneer. Known as "Frank," his family moved to Los Angeles, California, in 1908 where he began working in the family business while still a boy. 
After his father's death in 1938, Frank Factor legally changed his name to Max Factor Jr. and as president expanded the still private cosmetics firm, along with members of the immediate family. He was heavily involved with the development of new products, particularly "Tru-Color" released in 1940 as the first smear-proof lipstick. 
Forest Park is an unincorporated community in Otsego Township, Steuben County, in the U.S. state of Indiana. 
The landforms of Earth are generally divided into physiographic divisions, consisting of physiographic provinces, which in turn consist of physiographic sections, though some others use different terminology, such as realms, regions and subregions. Some areas have further categorized their respective areas into more detailed subsections. 
West Kilimanjaro Airstrip (ICAO: HTWK) is an airstrip in the Kilimanjaro Region of Tanzania. It is near Kilimanjaro National Park. 
Got Your Back (2011) is Pour Habit's second full-length album released through Fat Wreck Chords in 2011. 
This article about a punk rock album from the 2010s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to a football defender from Saudi Arabia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Boston Sand and Gravel is a supplier of ready-to-pour concrete, concrete blocks, sand, and crushed stone, with operations and subsidiaries around eastern Massachusetts and New Hampshire in the United States. 
The Charlestown, Massachusetts, plant is a highly visible landmark for commuters on the north side of Boston, because it is located between the Central Artery North (part of Interstate 93) and the MBTA Commuter Rail tracks just north of North Station.  Its tower directly abuts the new Leverett Connector, and the ramps connecting the Zakim Bridge with the Tobin Bridge completely surround the plant, which supplied concrete for the Big Dig project which constructed them. 
The company was founded in 1914, and was originally located where the CambridgeSide Galleria is now. The spot was convenient to the Charles River because materials were originally sourced from dredging. Later, the company began obtaining raw material from quarries in Ossipee, New Hampshire, and Hooksett, New Hampshire. 
Boston Sand and Gravel owns railroad track from Ossipee to Rollinsford, New Hampshire, through its railroad subsidiary, the New Hampshire Northcoast Corporation. The location of its plant along the government-owned tracks in Charlestown provides easy access for its gravel trains, through an agreement to use the freight trackage rights kept by Pan Am Railways. It also owns a terminal in Everett, Massachusetts, for shipping of aggregate materials by ship, railroad, and truck. 
As of 2016, the company's other subsidiaries are Manchester Sand and Gravel, Ossipee Aggregates, Rosenfeld Concrete, Southeastern Concrete, and Lawrence Ready Mix. 
As of December 2019, CAU offers 66 undergraduate majors and over 32 masters and 21 doctoral programs. There are around 12,000 undergraduate and 8,900 graduate students. Among them, 508 students are international. Its gymnasium hosted the wrestling events during the 2008 Summer Olympics.  
CAU is a Chinese Ministry of Education Class A Double First Class University, and is designated as part of both Project 985, to create world class universities in China, and Project 211, to raise the research standards of universities. 
In 1995, Beijing Agricultural University and Beijing Agricultural Engineering University merged as China Agricultural University (CAU). Since then, the university became the top academic institution in China in terms of agricultural studies. 
China Agricultural University has played a key part in the reintroduction of rugby union into modern China and its subsequent growth. 
Rugby re-emerged in the PRC in 1990, with a club formed at Beijing Agricultural University. A professor there, Chao Xihuang was introduced to the sport by a Japanese businessman, and set up a couple of sides. 
4 subjects are listed in world top 1% of ESI (Essential Science Indictors based on the ISI Web of Knowledge)  
6 academic disciplines listed as number one among 700 Chinese universities according to the Ministry of Education 
4th of total number of number one disciplines among 700 Chinese universities (Ministry of Education) 
5th of the total number of National Significant Scientific Progress Awards given by the State Council 
This biographical article relating to Uzbekistani sport is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Mezquita de Jarque is a municipality located in the province of Teruel, Aragon, Spain. According to the 2004 census (INE), the municipality has a population of 123 inhabitants. 
This article about a location in the Province of Teruel is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Voice of the Whirlwind is a 1987 cyberpunk science fiction novel by American writer Walter Jon Williams. 
In those fifteen years, the entire world has changed. An alien race known as The Powers has established relations with humanity. The Orbital Policorp, which held his allegiance, has collapsed. He fought and survived the off-world Artifacts War, but dozens of his friends did not. Both his first and second wives have divorced him. Further, someone has murdered him, causing the activation of the beta back-up. Now Steward has to figure out who wanted him dead, if he does not want to die again. 
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
Movimiento Nacional (English: National Movement) was the name given to a governing institution established by General Francisco Franco during the Spanish Civil war in 1937. During Francoist rule in Spain, it purported to be the only channel of participation in Spanish public life. It responded to a doctrine of corporatism in which only so-called "natural entities" could express themselves: families, municipalities and unions. It was abolished in 1977. 
The National Movement was led by Francisco Franco, titled Jefe del Movimiento (English: Chief of the Movement), assisted by a "Minister-Secretary General of the Movement". The hierarchy extended itself to all of the country, with a "local chief of the movement" named in each village. 
Franco held his power by balancing these internal rivalries, cautious not to show any favoritism to any of them nor compromise himself too much to anyone. 
Patrick Kevin Francis Michael Nevin (born 6 September 1963) is a Scottish retired footballer. In a 20-year career, he played for Clyde, Chelsea, Everton, Tranmere Rovers, Kilmarnock and Motherwell as a winger. He won 28 caps for Scotland, scattered across a ten-year international career, and was selected for the UEFA Euro 1992 finals squad. Since retiring as a player, Nevin has worked as a chief executive of Motherwell and as a football writer and broadcaster. 
Nevin trained with Celtic as a youngster, but was rejected for being too small. He was signed by Clyde in 1981. In his first season, the club were promoted as Scottish Second Division champions; Nevin scored 14 goals in 30 starts and was voted SPFA Second Division Player of the Year. He scored six goals in 44 starts in his second season with the club. 
Howard Kendall returned to the club as manager in November 1990; he and Nevin openly disagreed with each other, which reduced Nevin's playing opportunities, as did the arrival of new wingers Robert Warzycha and Mark Ward. 
Nevin was unfortunate to arrive at Everton just after one of the finest spells in their history, when they had collected two league titles, an FA Cup and the European Cup Winners' Cup. In contrast, Nevin's four seasons at the club saw a runners-up medal in the FA Cup (1989) being the closest he came to being part of a trophy winning side, and they never finished higher than sixth in the league (1990). 
In 1997, Nevin returned to Scotland and played for Kilmarnock and later Motherwell before retiring in 2000. 
In 1982 while playing for Clyde, he travelled to Finland to play for the Scotland U18 team at the UEFA European Youth Championship and was named player of the tournament after helping Scotland win it. The following year, he starred for the Scotland U20 team that reached the quarter-finals of the FIFA World Youth Championship. 
Nevin won 28 caps for the Scottish national side, making his debut against Romania in 1986. He scored five goals in a ten-year international career and played at Euro 92, but was not selected in the final squads for the 1986 or 1990 World Cups. He made his final appearance for Scotland in 1996 but did not appear at the Euro 96 finals. 
After retiring as a player, Nevin became chief executive of Motherwell. He resigned in April 2002, after Motherwell chairman John Boyle put the club into administration due to financial problems. 
He has an arts degree from Glasgow Caledonian University. His interest in literature, the arts, and his musical taste distinguishes him from many of his peers. He preferred The Fall and Joy Division to Phil Collins or Lionel Richie. He was interviewed by music magazine NME and was a guest music presenter on Radio City during his Everton and Tranmere career. 
The Book of Us: Entropy is the third Korean-language studio album by South Korean band Day6. It was released by JYP Entertainment on October 22, 2019. The lead single "Sweet Chaos" was released the same day. The album debuted at number four on the Gaon Album Chart. 
Chad Austin Gallagher (born May 30, 1969) is a retired American professional basketball player who played in the National Basketball Association (NBA) and other leagues. A 6'10" center played collegiately at Creighton University from 1987 to 1991, and was selected with the fifth pick in the 2nd round of the 1991 NBA draft by the Phoenix Suns. 
Gallagher's NBA career consisted of 2 games for the Utah Jazz in February, 1994, playing 3 total minutes and scoring 6 points on 3-of-3 field goals. 
This biographical article relating to a United States basketball player, coach, or other figure born in the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Burns is a city in Marion County, Kansas, United States.  The city name came from a nearby train station, which was named prior to the city being incorporated.  As of the 2020 census, the population of the city was 234.  It is located between El Dorado and Florence along the west side of U.S. Route 77 highway.  The south edge of the city is the border of Marion and Butler counties. 
For many millennia, the Great Plains of North America was inhabited by nomadic Native Americans.  From the 16th century to 18th century, the Kingdom of France claimed ownership of large parts of North America.  In 1762, after the French and Indian War, France secretly ceded New France to Spain, per the Treaty of Fontainebleau. 
In 1802, Spain returned most of the land to France.  In 1803, most of the land for modern day Kansas was acquired by the United States from France as part of the 828,000 square mile Louisiana Purchase for 2.83 cents per acre. 
In 1854, the Kansas Territory was organized, then in 1861 Kansas became the 34th U.S. state.  In 1855, Marion County was established within the Kansas Territory, which included the land for modern day Burns. 
At the present location, a city named St. Francis was platted in August 1880. When the town incorporated, they discovered the official city name of St. Francis was already taken, so they changed the name to be the same as the nearby Burns train station, then soon afterward the station was moved into the new city. The original station was named after a railroad company official. 
In 2010, the Keystone-Cushing Pipeline (Phase II) was constructed 6.5 miles west of Burns, north to south through Marion County, with much controversy over road damage, tax exemption, and environmental concerns (if a leak ever occurs).  A pumping station named Burns was built 2 miles north of Potwin. 
As of the census of 2010, there were 228 people, 93 households, and 59 families residing in the city. The population density was 651.4 inhabitants per square mile (251.5/km2). There were 112 housing units at an average density of 320.0 per square mile (123.6/km2). The racial makeup of the city was 96.9% White, 1.3% African American, 0.4% Native American, 0.4% Pacific Islander, and 0.9% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 0.9% of the population. 
There were 93 households, of which 29.0% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 51.6% were married couples living together, 7.5% had a female householder with no husband present, 4.3% had a male householder with no wife present, and 36.6% were non-families. 32.3% of all households were made up of individuals, and 16.2% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.45 and the average family size was 3.14. 
The median age in the city was 38 years. 25% of residents were under the age of 18; 8.8% were between the ages of 18 and 24; 23.2% were from 25 to 44; 27.1% were from 45 to 64; and 15.8% were 65 years of age or older. The gender makeup of the city was 53.9% male and 46.1% female. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 268 people, 101 households, and 79 families residing in the city. The population density was 755.6 people per square mile (295.6/km2). There were 116 housing units at an average density of 327.1 per square mile (128.0/km2). The racial makeup of the city was 98.51% White, 0.75% African American and 0.75% Native American. 
There were 101 households, out of which 36.6% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 63.4% were married couples living together, 10.9% had a female householder with no husband present, and 20.8% were non-families. 17.8% of all households were made up of individuals, and 6.9% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.65 and the average family size was 2.94. 
In the city, the population was spread out, with 29.1% under the age of 18, 8.2% from 18 to 24, 29.5% from 25 to 44, 17.5% from 45 to 64, and 15.7% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 36 years. For every 100 females, there were 107.8 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 102.1 males. 
As of 2000 the median income for a household in the city was $33,500, and the median income for a family was $39,000. Males had a median income of $22,143 versus $21,250 for females. The per capita income for the city was $11,990. About 7.5% of families and 11.9% of the population were below the poverty line, including 15.8% of those under the age of eighteen and 9.8% of those 65 or over. 
The city is served by the Burns Public Library at 104 North Washington Avenue. The library is a member of the North Central Kansas Libraries System. 
Burns is served by numerous radio stations of the Wichita-Hutchinson listening market area, and satellite radio.  See Media in Wichita, Kansas. 
Burns is served by over-the-air ATSC digital TV of the Wichita-Hutchinson viewing market area, cable TV by Allegiance Communications, and satellite TV.  See Media in Wichita, Kansas. 
U.S. 77 highway runs north-south on the east side of Burns, and follows roughly parallel to the old railway. 
James (or Jacob)  Uriell (died 1423) was an Irish landowner and  judge who held office  very briefly as Chief Baron of the Irish Exchequer. 
He was born in County Dublin, the  son of Thomas Uriell, a  landowner. The Uriells were an Anglo-Norman  family who  originally settled in County Louth and are thought to have taken their surname from the Kingdom of Oriel. 
Permit mail is anything sent through the postal service where postage is paid by a post office issued permit.  No postage stamp is affixed to letters sent by permit mail. 
The post office will bill the sender based on the number of items sent, their weight, etc.[citation needed] 
3 Bats Live is a music DVD by rock singer Meat Loaf. Recorded on March 18, 2007 at London, Ontario during his "Seize the Night" tour, it mainly features songs from the Bat Out of Hell trilogy. The DVD was released in the UK on October 15, 2007, and in the UK on November 20, 2007. 
Extra features include the videos for "It's All Coming Back to Me Now" and "Cry Over Me", both directed by P. R. Brown. It also contains the "Monster Is Loose Animated Short Film" and "Making the Monster: Making of Bat Out of Hell III", that were included on the CD+DVD UK edition of the Bat III album. A second disc contains a ninety-minute retrospective documentary called Meat Loaf: In Search of Paradise, about preparations for the tour and its first leg. 
A Limited Collectors "deluxe edition" box was also released, which includes a replica tour programme, tour poster, bat shaped sticker and guitar pick. 
A Blu-ray edition was released in the United Kingdom on November 11, 2008 by Mercury UK and is also available as an import in the United States. No official US Blu-ray release has been set at this time by Hip-O or Mercury. 
He was replaced by Hori Naoyori and the domain was increased to a 100,000 koku nominal kokudaka, although the actual revenues of the domain were closer to 170,000 koku. Under the Hori clan, the castle town was developed and expanded, and new industries were promoted. In 1642, his grandson, Hori Naosada died at age 7 without heir, and the domain came under attainder. The Hori clan survived through a cadet line at Muramatsu Domain.  
As with most domains in the han system, Murakami Domain consisted of several discontinuous territories calculated to provide the assigned kokudaka, based on periodic cadastral surveys and projected agricultural yields. 
In November 2014, Universal Pictures chairwoman Donna Langley told The Hollywood Reporter that there would be at least three more films in the franchise after Furious 7. In April 2015, Vin Diesel stated that the possible sequel that "Paul Walker used to say that [an eighth film] was guaranteed. And in some ways, when your brother guarantees something, you sometimes feel like you have to make sure it comes to pass." 
Diesel further hinted at an eighth film on Jimmy Kimmel Live! when he stated that Kurt Russell's character would span multiple films. He also stated that the next film would take place in New York City. Chris Morgan returned to write his sixth script in the franchise, while Neal H. Moritz returned to produce. Moritz later stated, "[The story] is going to have to be something enticing for all of us. It has to be as good as or better [than Furious 7]". 
Brian Tyler, who scored the third, fourth, fifth, and seventh installments, was tapped to compose the film score for the eighth picture. A soundtrack album by Atlantic Records was released on April 14, 2017, coinciding with the film's US theatrical release. The film's score album was released on April 27, by Back Lot Music. 
The Fate of the Furious had its world premiere in Berlin on April 4, 2017. The film was theatrically released in the United States on April 14. The film was released in 1,074 IMAX screens around the world, making it the widest opening in IMAX history. 
The Fate of the Furious was released on Ultra HD Blu-ray, Blu-ray and DVD on July 11, 2017 by Universal Pictures Home Entertainment. 
The sequel, titled F9, is directed by Justin Lin, written by Daniel Casey, and was released on June 25, 2021. 
Reiner Stach (born 1951) is a German author, biographer of Franz Kafka, publisher, and publicist. Stach lives and works as a freelancer in Berlin. 
While Kafka had a relatively small literary output, his influence is so immense that Stach estimates there are at least 130,000 web sites devoted to him. Stach stopped his own internet count of Kafka sites when he got to 500 of them. There are dozens of Kafka biographies. Stach decided to write a detailed Kafka biographical trilogy because despite all this, "No definitive biography of Franz Kafka exists". 
The grey goshawk (Accipiter novaehollandiae) is a strongly built, medium-sized bird of prey in the family Accipitridae. The white morph of this species is known as the white goshawk. 
The grey morph has a pale grey head and back, dark wingtips, barred grey breast and tail, and white underparts. The white morph is the only bird of prey in the world to be entirely white.[citation needed] 
The grey goshawk is found along the coasts of northern, eastern and south-eastern Australia, Tasmania and rarely Western Australia. The variable goshawk was previously considered a subspecies. 
Hunting is often done by stealth, but grey goshawks are willing to pursue their prey before catching it with their talons. 
The female is usually responsible for incubating the eggs and feeding the young. The male does most of the hunting. 
Kinetic military action is a euphemism for military action involving active warfare, including lethal force. The phrase is used to contrast between conventional military force and "soft" force, including diplomacy, sanctions and cyber warfare. "Kinetic" was used as a retronymic euphemism for military action in Bush at War, a 2002 book by Bob Woodward. United States Defense Secretary Donald Rumsfeld used the words "kinetic" and "non-kinetic" often. 
 "Kinetic military action" was used by White House aide Ben Rhodes on March 23, 2011 to describe U.S. military action in Libya:
I think what we are doing is enforcing a resolution that has a very clear set of goals, which is protecting the Libyan people, averting a humanitarian crisis, and setting up a no-fly zone... Obviously that involves kinetic military action, particularly on the front end.
This use was noted by news media: "'Kinetic military action' is still hell" and "Kinetic Military Action No More". 
U.S. Department of Defense used "kinetic operations" on a webpage about "Operation Inherent Resolve". It contained an interactive graphic titled "AIRSTRIKES IN IRAQ AND SYRIA" and captioned "... operations related to ISIL since kinetic operations started on Aug. 8, 2014 ...". 
On February 11, 2015, President Obama used "kinetic strike" in a letter to Congress. He wanted, among other things, Congress to "authorize the use of U.S. forces [against ISIL] in ... [ground] missions to enable kinetic strikes". The phrase was not used in the draft resolution proposed to Congress. 
Tolevamer is a medication developed to combat Clostridium difficile associated diarrhea. It is a potassium sodium polystyrene sulfonate. It was never marketed. 
Tolevamer was designed to bind the enterotoxins of Clostridium difficile. Since it has no antibiotic properties, it does not harm the gut flora. Early studies used the sodium salt, but it was soon replaced with the potassium sodium salt to prevent hypokalaemia, which is often associated with diarrhea. 
Euxoa enixa is a moth of the family Noctuidae. It is found in the western Tien-Shan mountains, Fergana, Togus-Torau, Issyk-Kul, the Alexander Mountains and Aschabad. 
This is a list of the mammal species recorded in the Falkland Islands. There are 28 mammal species in and around the Falkland Islands, of which two are endangered and two are vulnerable. The Falkland Island wolf is the only species on the islands which has gone extinct. 
The following tags are used to highlight each species' conservation status as assessed by the International Union for Conservation of Nature: 
Some species were assessed using an earlier set of criteria. Species assessed using this system have the following instead of near threatened and least concern categories: 
The bats' most distinguishing feature is that their forelimbs are developed as wings, making them the only mammals capable of flight. Bat species account for about 20% of all mammals. 
The order Cetacea includes whales, dolphins and porpoises. They are the mammals most fully adapted to aquatic life with a spindle-shaped nearly hairless body, protected by a thick layer of blubber, and forelimbs and tail modified to provide propulsion underwater. 
There are over 260 species of carnivorans, the majority of which feed primarily on meat. They have a characteristic skull shape and dentition. 
The even-toed ungulates are ungulates whose weight is borne about equally by the third and fourth toes, rather than mostly or entirely by the third as in perissodactyls. There are about 220 artiodactyl species, including many that are of great economic importance to humans. 
A long-time member of the Italian Socialist Party (PSI), he joined the Labour Federation (FL) in 1994 and the Democrats of the Left (DS) in 1998. 
He was deputy from 1992 to 2001 and served as the President of Calabria from 1987 to 1992. In 2006, he was elected mayor of Catanzaro. 
This article about a Democratic Party (Italy) politician is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Belmont Township is one of twenty-six townships in Iroquois County, Illinois, United States. As of the 2010 census, its population was 2,610 and it contained 1,188 housing units. 
Rowlatts Hill (also known as Rowlatts Hill Estate, or R.H.E.) is an eastern, residential suburb of the English city of Leicester. It contains mostly council-owned housing. 
The suburb is roughly bordered by Spencefield Lane to the east and Whitehall Road to the south, which separates it from neighbouring Evington. A second boundary within the estate consists of Coleman Road to Ambassador Road through to Green Lane Road; Rowlatts Hill borders Crown Hills to the west. To the north, at the bottom of Rowlatts Hill is Humberstone Park which is located within Green Lane Road, Ambassador Road and also leads on to Uppingham Road (the A47), which is also Rowlatts Hill. 
The Leicester General hospital is located near Goodwood on Coleman Road which is south of Uppingham Road (the A47). 
"Breaking the Law" is a song by English heavy metal band Judas Priest, originally released on their 1980 album British Steel. The song is one of the band's better known singles, and is readily recognized by its opening guitar riff. 
The song features some sound effects, including the sound of breaking glass and a police siren. The band were recording British Steel at Tittenhurst Park, which was the home of the Beatles's drummer Ringo Starr. For the breaking glass effect, the band used milk bottles that a milkman brought them in the morning, and the police siren was actually guitarist K. K. Downing using the tremolo arm on his Stratocaster. 
Halford later said, "It was a time in the U.K. when there was a lot of strife-a lot of government strife, the miners were on strike, the car unions were on strike, there were street riots. It was a terrible time. That was the incentive for me to write a lyric to try to connect with that feeling that was out there." 
Downing later said, "I have to chuckle to myself really about how they got us to do whatever it was we were doing. But we were young and it was exciting and we were making probably the first ever heavy metal conceptual video. It reminds us that however big and powerful we were, we still did everything that people wanted us to do..." 
"Metal Gods" is a song by Judas Priest from their album British Steel. The song was also released as the B-side to the song "Breaking the Law". 
"The Queen Bee" is a science fiction short story by Randall Garrett. First published in Astounding Science Fiction in December 1958, it has drawn harsh criticism in the following decades, with Michael Dirda of the Washington Post noting that it is "often regarded as the most sexist short story in the history of science fiction". 
The cemetery contains a field of honour administered by the Commonwealth War Graves Commission where 154 First World War casualties and 3 Second World War casualties are buried. The field of honour also includes several of the city's Boer War veterans and is the location of a Cross of Sacrifice, 25 of which are in Canada. 
At the south end of the cemetery is a potter's field where an estimated 1,000 poor and homeless residents were buried, as well as several executed criminals. 
This article about a member of the Wisconsin State Assembly is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Jennifer is a feminine given name, the Cornish form of Guinevere, adopted into the English language during the 20th century. 
Kevin Bridgens (born 21 December 1961) is a South African cricketer. He played in 44 first-class and 46 List A matches for Boland and Western Province from 1986/87 to 1992/93. 
This biographical article related to a South African cricket person born in the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Skyborg: Into the Vortex was a CD-ROM science fiction computer game released in 1995 by the trading card company SkyBox International, Inc. and created by American studio Fringe Multimedia. 
It was based on Creators Edition Master Series a set of trading cards by various artists created especially for the game, which were released simultaneously with the game. Each copy of the game came with a random pack of the cards. Card artists included: Dave Dorman, Julie Bell (wife of Boris Vallejo), Brom, and Brian Stelfreeze. Some cards in the SkyBox Master Series: Creators Edition contain a code that can be used to complete Skyborg's mission. 
Players assume the role of Skyborg, a cyborg in the year 2025, on a dangerously overpopulated Earth low on food. Dr. Sinclair Barton has created a torus-shaped pocket universe to alleviate this problem. You must enter this universe and travel from planet to planet gathering clues to figure out what has gone wrong and where Dr. Barton is. 
The game's lead designer was Carl Schnurr.  Eric Garrison, Director of Online Services, for SkyBox was Technical Director.  This game was the brain child of George White, Mark Davidson, Eric Garrison and Rick Ferguson of SkyBox who wanted to combine a CD Rom interactive game with Trading Cards. 
Next Generation reviewed the PC version of the game, rating it one star out of five, and stated that "Even though the game looks great, it moved about a quick as a pregnant whale, and after a few hours going around in circles, it's not going to hold much interest." 
The Federation of European Laboratory Animal Science Associations is a pan-European stakeholder organisation, representing common interests in the furtherance of laboratory animal science in Europe and beyond. The organisation was founded in 1978 and is an umbrella organisation for European national or multinational associations. 
As of May 2020[update], the federation consisted of 22 member associations, representing 29 countries. 
This article about the Municipality of Pivka in Slovenia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Lutheran High School Association of Greater Detroit, or simply Lutheran High School Association, is an association of several Lutheran high schools in Metro Detroit, Michigan.  It has a unified standards-based curriculum.  Currently its component high schools are Lutheran High School North, Lutheran High School Westland, and Lutheran High School Northwest. The Lutheran High School Association administrative office relocated to an addition at Lutheran Northwest in 2006. 
OK Go is the debut studio album by American rock band OK Go. It was released in September 2002. The cover was created by designer Stefan Sagmeister. 
The album debuted at number 107 on Billboard 200, and number one on Billboard Top Heatseekers Chart. 
 All lyrics are written by Damian Kulash Jr., except track 9 by Tim Nordwind; all music is composed by Damian Kulash Jr., except where noted.
"Get Over It" was featured on the soundtrack of the video games Triple Play Baseball 2002 and Madden NFL 2003. "Don't Ask Me" was featured on the soundtrack of the video game MVP Baseball 2003, trailers for Just Friends and Good Luck Chuck (and also "You're So Damn Hot"), and the movie Catch That Kid. "You're So Damn Hot" was used on an episode of The O.C.. It also appeared in a television commercial advertising campaign for Payless Shoes in 2006, and in ads for ABC's television show Castle. 
St James' Presbyterian Church (also known as Welsh Congregational Church) was a church in The Haymarket, St James, Bristol, England. 
The church was built in 1859. It was destroyed during The Blitz in World War II. In around 1953, St James's Presbyterian in Romney Avenue, Lockleaze was built. 
In 1897, the church hosted a synod of the Presbyterian Church of England in order to commemorate Rev. William C. Burns becoming the church's first missionary to China when he arrived there in 1847. The moderator of the synod was Rev. H. L. Mackenzie, who spoke at length about his experiences over nearly four decades at the Presbyterian Church of England's Swatow Mission in China. 
The remains of the Victorian-era St James' Church are just south of the current Bristol coach station. The church was bombed in the evening of 24 November 1940 and partly restored as a chapel in 1957. The tower still remains but the nave has been converted to offices. 
Fairhope Township is a township in Somerset County, Pennsylvania, United States. The population was 137 at the 2000 census. It is part of the Johnstown, Pennsylvania, Metropolitan Statistical Area. 
The age distribution was 19.7% under the age of 18, 8.0% from 18 to 24, 25.5% from 25 to 44, 26.3% from 45 to 64, and 20.4% 65 or older. The median age was 42 years. For every 100 females there were 124.6 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 120.0 males. 
The median household income was $28,958 and the median family income was $29,688. Males had a median income of $31,667 versus $14,250 for females. The per capita income for the township was $13,087. There were 7.7% of families and 11.4% of the population living below the poverty line, including 14.7% of under eighteens and 16.0% of those over 64. 
Spawn is a fictional character appearing in a monthly comic book of the same name published by American company Image Comics, as well as in a number of films, television series, and video game adaptations set in the Image Universe. Created by Todd McFarlane, the character first appeared in Spawn #1 (May 1992). 
Todd McFarlane began drawing as a hobby at an early age, and created the character Spawn when he was 16, spending "countless hours" perfecting the appearance of each component of the character's visual design. 
The first issue of Spawn was very popular with sales of 1.7 million copies. During Spawn's second year of publication, Wizard noted that "The top dog at Image is undoubtedly Todd McFarlane's Spawn, which, without the added marketing push of fancy covers, polybagged issues, or card inserts has become the best-selling comic on a consistent basis that is currently being published." Sales slumped around the time of Spawn #25, but by Spawn #45 it was again a consistently strong seller. 
Spawn began a resurgence in popularity as the title approached its 300th issue, with the title once again becoming a fixture in Diamond's Top 100. This 300th issue also made Spawn the longest-running independent comic book series of all time. 
In his early battles, Spawn faces street thugs and gangs, becoming a dark, sadistic antihero, and brutally murders the pedophile and child murderer Billy Kincaid. Spawn gains the attention of police detectives Sam Burke and Twitch Williams, and becomes "King of Rat City", a gathering of alleys populated by the city's homeless. There he meets Cogliostro, who seems to know much about Spawn and becomes his mentor. 
Spawn is hunted by the warrior angel Angela, who hunts Hellspawns for sport, and battles the cyborg mob enforcer Overt-Kill. He also fights the angelic warrior Anti-Spawn, also known as the Redeemer, who is really Jason Wynn. 
After a confrontation with the Redeemer, Spawn's suit becomes more advanced, with a new cape and chains that can shapeshift to confuse his opponents. Spawn's boots and gloves are replaced with spikes. Since the metamorphosis, the suit will feed off souls. 
Spawn wears a living symbiotic costume, Leetha of the 7th House of K (also known as K7-Leetha). While wearing it, the host assumes a dominant role over his suit. His shroud, spikes, chains and skulls are all part of an organism bonded to his central nervous system that will protect Spawn even if he is unconscious. 
As Spawn struggles to find a way to regain control, he notices that the attacks are coming from both Heaven and Hell. Due to increasing attacks, Spawn began to lose himself to evil but the Heap, an emissary of the Greenworld, arrives and Spawn is able to regain his goal. Greenworld, a dimension whose power was equal to both Heaven and Hell, gives new powers to Spawn to better understand the world and its people. These powers seem to give control of all of the elements in the world. 
Spawn is later attacked by Urizen. After recovering, Spawn learns the Greenworld has imbued him with a gift, which he uses to contain Urizen by splitting the ground and imprisoning him inside the earth. 
After his battle, Spawn learns Malebolgia had caused Urizen's release in an attempt to start Armageddon and conquer the forces of Heaven. Spawn and Angela then journey to Hell to stop him. During the battle, Angela mortally wounds Malebolgia, who kills her in retaliation. Consumed with anger, Spawn takes Malebolgia's head. 
On Earth, Spawn meets a young Wiccan named Nyx, with whose help he regains his suit. Mammon tricks and betrays Nyx, usurping her control over Spawn's union with his suit and removing all of Spawn's memories. With no memory, Spawn wanders the Earth. He releases a group of angels called the Forgotten and stays neutral in the war between Heaven and Hell. He discovers Mammon is a member of the Fallen who was sent to Hell. 
When Spawn's heart falls to the Greenworld, a soul is freed. Chris meets with his mother and travels to Hell along with Sam Burke and Twitch Williams to rescue Spawn from Mammon. Spawn escapes and returns to Earth, where signs of Armageddon begin to appear, and looks for a way to stop it. Spawn discovers Wanda's twin children are responsible. He stops them from killing their entire family but cannot destroy them. Zera reveals  Jake is God and Katie is Satan. 
Spawn finds out the Mother removed their powers and positions and sent them to Earth due to their hatred of each other and constant fighting. She tells him he cannot stop Armageddon but he has the potential to gain the power of a god and preserve the human race. 
Spawn returns to Earth, which has been destroyed by Four Horsemen and angels and demons are waiting to fight their final battle. After defeating Zera, Spawn finds dead warriors of Heaven, one of whom is Granny Blake, who is betrayed by her faith. Spawn battles the forces of Satan and God, and destroys the forces of Heaven, Hell and humanity. He is then killed by the two, who then fight alone on Earth. 
Zera reappears as a head in a jar. Spawn is summoned by a voodoo priestess named Mambo Suzanne. Zera attempts to take over Nyx's body and fights Spawn but she is killed when Suzanne throws Zera's head into the street. Nyx is freed and she and Spawn becomes friends again. 
Ab and Zab create a hell where visitors are forced to view their deepest fears, which are eaten by demons called sin eaters. When Spawn confronts Ab and Zab, is faced with his own sin against Wanda and his unborn child. Spawn cannot break free from the guilt and is parasitized by a sin eater. When Nyx interferes, he breaks the sin eater's illusion. Spawn breaks all the others illusions and comes across Albert Simmons' brother Richard. 
Spawn decides to allow Richard to feel his sins. Mammon, as Mr. Malefick, had put an influence on Albert Simmons and Richard Simmons. Only Marc Simmons saved himself from Mammon but was unable to help the others. Richard calls his brothers to help him save the drug dealer's life and Albert Simmons, instead of calling an ambulance, pulls the knife from Weasel's body and kills him with it. Mammon appears, sending the brothers home while he hides the drug dealer's body. 
Nyx and Spawn kill the last sin eater and Spawn discovers Richard cannot remember their parents due to a spell placed by Mammon; Spawn goes to find out about them. He finds their home under a spell placed by Mammon. His mother planned with Mammon to create a Hellspawn stronger than the others. He is then given a journal by his father that reveals his ancestor came across a Hellspawn in the past known as the Gunslinger Spawn. 
Spawn is left helpless and weakened against his enemy Erskine's psychic powers, and Spawn is troubled by Erskine's creation of a tentacle creature he uses to impale his enemies. 
Spawn is given an opportunity to cause Erskine's death. Spawn enters the bubble dome, a dimension, if Erskine does not reveal the location of Mammon. Mammon allows Erskine to complete his last murder. Mammon confesses that it was he who taught Erskine how to use his powers. Erskine tries to commit suicide. Spawn continues to attack Mammon. 
Later a man wakes in a mortuary with amnesia. Some doctors working on him discover he is alive and are killed by a person in a robe, who is revealed to be Morana. The revived man, whose name is Severin, is one of a species of vampires called the Vrykolakas. He wants to die and Morana promises him death in return for his help. Severin appears, defeats Marc and Nyx, and bites Spawn to transfer his vampirism. He retreats to Morana. 
Cyan has been experiencing horrid visions. Severin's attack has caused Spawn to battle the suit in his mind. Mammon with Morana and his adopted mother and father prepare for the next step in their plans. Cyan is having more visions. Granny had warned Cyan and she uses a knife to send Spawn into an illusionary world to talk to Wanda non-violently. 
He is taken to another hospital with other patients. He later leaves and reunites with his previous nurse Sara, and begins to transform. He calls to Sara but leaves before she can see him. Meanwhile, a reporter begins to ask questions about the incident at the hospital. Wandering the city Jim is attacked and kills his assailants. This draws the attention of Sam and Twitch, who recognize the chaos as Spawn's doings. 
After reuniting with Sara and telling him about his transformation, Jim wanders off again and meets Wanda Blake, Al Simmons' ex-wife. She recognizes Jim as the form Al took when he originally returned to earth, and she realizes he is a Spawn like Al. 
On Wanda's advice, Jim travels to Rat City and finds Spawn's throne, and is met by an angel. Jim fights the angel, beats the angel and leaves. Jim finds out that a man working for Gilbert Sanchez has been asking questions about him. 
The angel Spawn beat is later attacked by Clown, who removes her wings. When Spawn returns, the angel is powerless and insane, and find Freak and Violator. Despite Freak's warnings, Clown begins to deceive Jim and informs him his suit is a living being, and then vanishes. Clown is arrested by Sam and Twitch, and meet the leader of a vampire group to attempt to form a unity between the leader, Clown, and Spawn. 
Mob members kill Gilbert Sanchez for his information on the new Spawn. Spawn attempts to learn more about Jim but is assaulted and uses his powers on his attacker. Jim later finds the man who had been asking Sara questions. He tracks him to his family's home, which is bombed, killing everyone inside but Spawn. Spawn finds more mob members and questions them further and kills them. 
A four-issue miniseries released in 1995 written by Alan Moore. Drawn by Brian Denham. Ink by Jonathan Sibal & Danny Miki. 
A four-issue miniseries released in 1995 written by Alan Moore. Drawn by Tony Daniel. Ink by Kevin Conrad. 
Todd McFarlane created a mob enforcer character named "Antonio 'Tony Twist' Twistelli", who McFarlane acknowledged was named after hockey player Tony Twist. Twist won a $15 million verdict in 2004 when a St. Louis, Missouri, jury found Todd McFarlane Productions had profited from Twist's likeness.  The verdict was upheld after two appeals in June 2006, but the two later settled out of court for $5 million. 
Many issues of Spawn have been gathered together in various trade paperbacks collections since the mid-nineties. The original US and UK trade releases contain issue 9, but not 10 (Cerebus' appearance). 
In 2005 the entire Spawn series began to appear in massive trade paperback releases under the title Spawn Collection, each containing (with the exception of Volume 1) approximately twenty issues. Released after the Gaiman lawsuit, these editions do not contain either Issue 9 (featuring the first appearance of Angela and Cogliostro, both created by Neil Gaiman) or Issue 10 (featuring Dave Sim's Cerebus). 
Spawn Collection Volume 1 was ranked 17 in the top 100 graphic novels for December 2005 period, with pre-order sales of 3,227. 
A new edition of this volume, collected now in full color, was released in February 2021 with a different front cover art (from Spawn #95, and back cover art from Spawn #70). As with the previous edition, this book does not collect the individual issues' covers. 
Originally published by a South African publisher named Battle Axe Press in the early 1990s. Only the first 10 issues were published due to legal matters. The comic book prints were released on standard paper as opposed to the original glossy paper from Image comics. 
In the meantime, in the year of 2001, another publisher called Pandora Books released the edition named "Witchblade: Era das Trevas" (like 'The Dark Ages') with the encounter with the character Medieval Spawn. 
In the year of 2006 to 2008 Spawn changed the publisher (after 10 years of Editora Abril Jovem) and went to Editora Pixel Media. They released from the issue number 151 to 178. Besides that, they released on the format of trade paperback the edition of Spawn Armageddon, Spawn Godslayer and the first two editions of Spawn Origin. 
In the beginning of year 2019 Todd McFarlane himself confirmed at social media that a new Brazilian publisher named New Order Editora will release Spawn from the number 251 to 255 and the special "Spawn: Resurrection". 
Spawn was ranked 60th on Wizard magazine's list of the Top 200 Comic Book Characters of All Time, 50th on Empire magazine's list of The 50 Greatest Comic Book Characters, and 36th on IGN's 2011 Top 100 Comic Book Heroes. 
Washington routinely delivers one-quarter of U.S. hydroelectric generation, and hosts the nation's largest capacity power station at Grand Coulee Dam.  60% of Washington households use electricity as their primary heating fuel, unlike most households in other U.S. states that typically utilize natural gas. 
The department store closed its doors to staff and the public without warning on 8 March 2016. The liquidators state that the unforeseen costs of dealing with asbestos, and the disruption to trading this would have entailed, proved to be a stumbling block to attracting investment and this led to the sudden closure. Derry City Council officials raised the issue of dealing with the asbestos following the introduction of new regulations, in the Spring of 2015. 
In 1956, at the age of 21, Latynina made her Olympic debut at the Melbourne Olympic Games. In the all-around event, she fought off stiff competition to win gold. She finished first in the vault, second in the uneven bars and in the exercise on the floor and fourth in the balancing beam. She also led the Soviet Union in Team Event to victory. 
Latynina retired after the 1966 World Championships and became a coach for the Soviet national gymnastics team, a position she held until 1977. Under her coaching the Soviet women won team gold in the 1968, 1972 and 1976 Olympics. She organized the gymnastics competition at the 1980 Olympic Games in Moscow.[citation needed] 
1989: Olympic Order (silver), International Olympic Committee 1998: Inducted into the International Gymnastics Hall of Fame 
Born in Milwaukee, Wisconsin, Grootemaat went to business college in Milwaukee. He was president of A. J. Grootemaat and Sons, Inc. which dealt with real estate, insurance, and mortgages. From 1892 to 1897, Grootemaat served on the Milwaukee Common Council. In 1899, Grootemaat served in the Wisconsin State Assembly and was a Republican. Grootemaat  died at his home in Milwaukee, Wisconsin. 
This article about a Republican Party member of the Wisconsin State Assembly born in the 1860s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Battle of Moel-y-don was a battle fought in 1282 war during the conquest of Wales by Edward I. Also known as the Battle of the Bridge of Boats, it is now considered unlikely the battle site was near Moel-y-don, but farther north. 
After stripping much Welsh land from Llywelyn ap Gruffudd in 1277, Edward I of England imposed harsh terms on the lands he had conquered. He had been aided in 1277 by many Welshmen, including Llywelyn's own brother Dafydd ap Gruffydd, but the terms of the peace, coupled with domination by English laws and by Edward's officials drove many of them into rebellion. The war began when Dafydd turned against the English and slaughtered the garrison of Hawarden Castle. 
Edward raised several armies through levy and indenture, and sent them into Wales on multiple fronts to surround and destroy Llywelyn's armies. One important expedition, consisting of 2000 infantrymen and 200 cavalrymen under the former constable of Gascony, Luke de Tany, was sent to capture the island of Anglesey. This would deprive the Welsh of much of their grain, and outflank the Welsh who were defending the Conwy. 
After successfully capturing Anglesey, Luke de Tany's men constructed a bridge of boats across the Menai Strait which separates Anglesey from the mainland. Edward's plan was to cross the River Conwy while Tany crossed the Menai and attacked from the north. However, Tany ignored the plan, believing he could defeat the Welsh without Edward's aid. He had contacted some of the clergy in Bangor, who had promised to aid him by giving a signal when the time was right to attack. 
The bridge was finished in September that year and, on 6 November, Tany and his men crossed the bridge, having been given the signal to attack. Llywelyn ap Gruffydd had been alerted to the crossing somehow, and emerged with a large army to meet the English as they crossed. A rising tide cut off de Tany's men from the bridge. When they tried to flee, many of them drowned when their heavy armour dragged them under the sea. Walter of Guisborough wrote an account of the battle: 
When they had reached the foot of the mountain and, after a time, came to a place at some distance from the bridge, the tide came in with a great flow, so that they were unable to get back to the bridge for the debt of water. The Welsh came from the high mountains and attacked them, and in fear and trepidation, for the great number of the enemy, our men preferred to face the sea than the enemy. They went into the sea but, heavily laden with arms, they were instantly drowned.
Luke de Tany, the nobles Roger de Clifford, Phillip and William Burnell (brothers of the chancellor Robert Burnell), sixteen English knights (and their esquires) and over 400 of Tany's men perished. The Welsh suffered few casualties. The remaining English army made it back to Anglesey; their losses, however, were too great for them to launch a further attack. 
This victory, and the Battle of Llandeilo Fawr in which another English army was destroyed in South Wales, boosted Welsh morale and set back Edward's plans for conquering Wales. 
An Taisce is a membership organisation and charity, not a state or semi-state organisation. However, it receives  government funding for specific programmes, such as Blue Flag beaches, Green Schools and the annual National Spring Clean, and it has a statutory role in certain planning and environmental processes in the country. 
An Taisce's range of expertise extends across Ireland's natural, built, and social heritage. It seeks to educate, inform, and lead public opinion on the environment, to advocate and influence policy, and to manage a small portfolio of heritage properties. 
The Planning Acts provide for An Taisce, and about 20 other prescribed bodies, to be informed of all planning applications in areas of scenic beauty or high amenity significance or where architectural, archaeological or environmental issues need to be considered. Local authorities are required, in certain defined circumstances under the Planning & Development Regulations, to consult An Taisce on development proposals. 
The organisation comprises over 5,000 members, with a range of membership fees.  Some members are also organised in local organisations.  Overall steering of the organisation is in the hands of a council, which in turn elects a board of management, and other internal policy and operational committees.[citation needed] 
Henri Dagba (born 1957) is a Beninese athlete. He competed in the men's triple jump at the 1980 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to Beninese athletics and track and field is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Contarex lenses are a series of photographic camera lenses used by the Contarex camera. They use the Contarex bayonet lens mount. The lenses were first presented at Photokina in 1958 and initially scheduled for delivery in the spring of 1959, but they were not made generally available until March 1960. The series was discontinued, but there are still many lenses available in the market. Their exemplary performance has led companies to make mount adapters to fit them to modern digital cameras. 
On April 22, 1871, she married William Unthank.  She died in Cedar City, Utah at the age of 69.  Jerry Anderson created a statue of her with feet that is located on the Southern Utah University campus at the former location of her home. 
Alison Triessl is a criminal defense lawyer based in Los Angeles, California who specializes in assault, drug and third strike cases. 
In May 2014, The Huffington Post published an article by Triessl about Shelly Sterling. Legal Smart with Alison Triessl began airing on KTLA in July 2015; the segment airs on Tuesdays and Thursdays at 3pm locally. Since September 2015, she has contributed to the syndicated investigative news magazine series Crime Watch Daily. 
In 2006, Triessl was named "Woman of the Year" for Los Angeles County and received an honor for "Outstanding Community Service" from both the Lieutenant Governor and City Attorney. She is married and has children. In 2012, she told Miami Herald how she balances her work and personal lives: 
In 2010, Triessl was part of a group of speakers gathered by the Californians for Drug Free Youth to "raise awareness about the dangers of marijuana". 
The 368th Infantry Regiment was an infantry regiment of the United States Army that served in World War I in France. Its commander was Colonel Frederick Brown. It was one of four regiments of the 92nd Division, all of which were composed of black enlisted personnel and junior officers, while the senior officers were white. 
The murder had a significant influence on French intellectuals Jean Genet, Jean-Paul Sartre, Simone de Beauvoir, and Jacques Lacan, who sought to analyze it, and some considered it symbolic of class struggle. The case formed the basis of a number of publications, plays, and films, as well as essays, spoken word, songs, and artwork. 
The sisters worked as maids in various Le Mans homes. They preferred to work together whenever possible.[citation needed] 
In July 1933, Christine experienced a "fit", or episode, in which she tried to gouge her own eyes out and had to be put in a straitjacket. She then made a statement to the investigating magistrate, in which she said that on the day of the murders she had experienced an episode like the one she just had in prison and that this was what precipitated the murders. 
The case had a huge impact on the community and was debated intensely by the intelligentsia. Some people considered that the murders had been the result of "exploitation of the workers", considering that the maids worked fourteen-hour days, with only a half-day off each week. Intellectuals empathized with the sisters' oppressive struggle of the social classes.[citation needed] 
eXeem was a peer-to-peer (P2P) file sharing client using the BitTorrent protocol. eXeem was designed to replace the need for centralized trackers (servers which co-ordinate the transfer of metadata across a BitTorrent network). It largely failed to achieve this goal, and the project was canceled and eXeem's network was shut down by the end of 2005. 
eXeem was created by Swarm Systems Inc. which is located in Saint Kitts and Nevis. The company employed Andrej Preston, the founder of Suprnova.org, as its spokesperson and public face of eXeem. Five thousand Suprnova.org users were selected to take part in a private beta test of eXeem before the public beta was released on  January 21, 2005. 
The eXeem network used super-peers that were used to track torrents (as ordinary bittorrent trackers). These super-peers were also responsible for maintaining file lists, comments and ratings for part of the files in the network. When a peer that was tracking a torrent was closed or went down, a new peer was assigned to be the tracker for that particular torrent. 
St. Peregrine the martyr was an early Christian martyr who died because he and others refused to worship the Roman Emperor Commodus on his birthday. 
Bong-2 is an electoral district for the elections to the House of Representatives of Liberia. The constituency covers three wards of Gbanga city (wards 5, 8 and 9), 10 communities of Jorquelleh District (i.e. Kolleta-Mula-Two, Beh-Lah-Three, Beletanta-Two, Tomue-Five, Mano-Weasue-Three, Samay-One, Jankpayah-Four, Gbenequellen-Two, Tamay Ta-One, Janyea-Four) and 2 communities of Yeallequelleh District (i.e. Yeanawoun-One and Garwuquelleh-Two). 
The General Encyclopedia had been successfully printed by Bracha Peli's printing business under the editorship of Prof. Joseph Klausner. Bracha Peli's son, Alexander was keen to start a more ambitious encyclopedia in Hebrew. 
The idea of the Encyclopaedia Hebraica began to take material form in the summer of 1944. An advisory committee was established to determine the goals of the encyclopedia. Printing of the first volume began in the summer of 1948 with the founding of the State of Israel. The honorary president of the project was the President of Israel, Professor Chaim Weizmann. 
We have strong faith that we will realize our aspiration to provide exceptional content in a magnificent vessel and to add and enhance from volume to volume, and that we will finish publishing all 16 volumes within five or six years and that the whole project will achieve its purpose. 
The many years needed for completion of the encyclopedia meant that its editors were replaced over the years. The position was held by Joseph Klausner, Benzion Netanyahu, Yeshayahu Leibowitz, Nathan Rotenstreich, Yehoshua Gutman, and Joshua Prawer. The editorial supervisor throughout all the volumes was Alexander Peli. More than 2,500 writers participated in the writing of the encyclopedia, among them the leading Israeli scientists and fifteen Nobel laureates. 
The newer volumes of the encyclopedia that were written in the 1990s and edited by David Shacham were criticized for allegedly containing a post-Zionist tone. 
Within a year of the last volume being published the rights to the encyclopedia had been sold. Schocken Publishing House are said to be working on a new, revised edition of the encyclopedia. 
Born in Cynthiana in Harrison County, Kentucky, West was a Confederate veteran and a municipal judge in Kentucky. He was Governor of Utah Territory twice, between 1886 and 1888 and between 1893 and 1896, the last before statehood. 
At an estimated population of 290,000 - 305,000 people, it comprises a number of sub-sections which reflect the diverse class backgrounds of the population. It was once a major stronghold of the United Democratic Front, the broad-based ANC-sponsored anti-apartheid body. It also has one of greater Cape Town's biggest shopping centres, known as the Liberty Promenade. 
The residential area was reportedly named after Mitchell Baker but this is unconfirmed, and is one of a number of possible explanations.[citation needed] Another theory is that the area was named after Major Charles Cornwallis Michell, the Cape's first surveyor-general. Yet another theory is that the area was named after a farmer that previous owned a farm that the neighborhood was built on. 
According to 2011 census data compiled by Statistics South Africa, Mitchells Plain comprises the following in terms of demographics: 
Today Mitchells Plain is one of Cape Town's and South Africa's largest townships with a population of about 290,000 people. 
The Mitchells Plain Commercial Business District is commonly referred to as the Town Center by residents. It is a shopping district that includes a 58 000 square meter retail plaza, a shopping centre over and around in the train station, a public library, two major transport interchanges and informal markets. Informal traders in the Town Center sell fruit, vegetables, stationary, spices and cosmetics.[citation needed] 
Like the townships of Soweto, Khayelitsha and Delft, Mitchells Plain, believed to be South Africa's 3rd largest township, is split into a number of sub-sections. The western half of the township is home to a wealthier population, while the eastern half comprises poorer communities.[citation needed] 
Mitchells Plain is home to 85 schools, Some of these schools include Meadowridge Primary School, Aloe, Lentegeur, Beacon Hill, Oval North, Cedar, Glendale, Rocklands and Westville Primary Spine Road, Mondale, Portland, Princeton, Woodlands, Tafelsig, Westridge, Seaview Primary and Westport primary 
In the latter years of apartheid, Mitchells Plain became the seat of the launch of the United Democratic Front, a mass democratic movement of community organisations and trade unions fighting against apartheid. It was launched in August 1983 with such leaders of the people as Dr Allan Boesak, Albertina Sisulu, Helen Joseph, Joe Marks, Trevor Manuel, Mosiuoa "Terror" Lekota and many others present.[citation needed] 
The most active social movements and activist organisations in Mitchells Plain after apartheid have been the Western Cape Anti-Eviction Campaign, the Treatment Action Campaign and the Mitchells Plain Concerned Hawkers and Traders Association. the Mitchell's Plain Backyarders Association, which had strong links to the Western Cape Anti-Eviction Campaign, organised a massive land occupation - The Mitchell's Plain Land Occupation in 2011. 
Kym Campbell (born August 4, 1981) is an American-Australian former singer-songwriter. Campbell had a career as an Australian-based singer-songwriter and issued two extended plays, So Alive (2008) and Preview (July 2010), and a studio album, Real Life (August 2012). She supported these releases with tours of Australia. 
Kym Campbell was born in Denver, Colorado and grew up in Seattle, Washington. She attended Santa Clara University, where she completed a Bachelor of Science before immigrating to Australia to pursue post-graduate education at Griffith University. In 2010 Campbell became a dual US-Australian citizen where she now resides in the state of Queensland.[citation needed] 
Campbell married in 2011 and gave birth to her first child in 2017 after a long struggle with PCOS related infertility.[citation needed] 
Offterdinger was a student of Heinrich von Rustige. In the second half of the 19th century, Offterdinger illustrated numerous children's books, fairy tales, adventure stories, and broadsheets. 
University Institute of Technology RGPV, popularly known as UIT RGPV or UIT RGTU, is a public institution located in Bhopal, India. The institution was established by the government of Madhya Pradesh with the name Government Engineering College (GEC). It is an autonomous institution as of 1986.AICTE Application No./UGC Registration No./College Code is-1-136924  
This article about a university or college in Madhya Pradesh, India is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Cloverdale is an unincorporated community in Osceola County, Iowa, United States. It is located 5 miles southeast of the county seat Sibley, and 10 miles from the Iowa-Minnesota border.   
The Jacobsohn Quartet which was here established contained the famous names of Simon E. Jacobsohn, first violin; Theodore Thomas, second violin; Carl Baetens, M. Dr., viola, and Adolf Hartdegan, cello (afterwards Michael Brandt, cello). Jacobsohn and Thomas alternated in playing first and second violin. Jacobsohn considered Thomas one of the finest interpreters of Mozart in the world; and so, when Mozart was played, Thomas always played first violin. 
Tsugaru was launched by the Yokosuka Naval Arsenal on 5 June 1940, and was commissioned into service on 22 October 1941. 
Tony Cragg was born in Liverpool. He studied art at Gloucestershire College of Arts and Technology, Cheltenham, from 1968 to 1970, and painted at the Wimbledon School of Art, London, from 1970 to 1973. The same year he went on to study sculpture at the Royal College of Art, London, completing an MA in 1977. 
Tony Cragg's early work involved site-specific installations of found objects and discarded materials. 
In the 2016 Birthday Honours Cragg was created a Knight Bachelor for services to visual arts and UK-German relations. 
Infoblox was founded in 1999 in Chicago, Illinois, by Stuart Bailey who was at the University of Illinois.  The company moved to Santa Clara, California, in 2003. 
On September 8, 2020, Infoblox announced a significant investment from Warburg Pincus. Following necessary approvals, the investment closed on December 1, 2020 with Vista Equity Partners and Warburg Pincus holding 50% ownership in Infoblox. 
By 2015, the Infoblox market share in DDI jumped to 49.9 percent in 2015 from 46.7 percent in 2014, and the overall DDI market grew 18.3 percent in the same period to $533 million. No other competitor had a market share greater than 15 percent. 
This article related to members of the fly subfamily Dexiinae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
It is a small airport, serving Uzhhorod and the whole oblast. The airport's runway begins 90 meters from the Ukrainian-Slovak international border, so planes must use Slovak airspace for take-offs and landings under special treaty. 
The following airlines operate regular scheduled and charter services to and from Uzhhorod International Airport: 
These battles saw some of the most violent fighting of the whole war. During the nine campaigns launched, coordinated Soviet assaults would regularly drive out the mujahideen from the valley, but they would return as soon as the Soviets left. 
The first Soviet operation in Panjshir took place in April 1980, four months after the arrival of Soviet forces in Afghanistan. It involved three Soviet battalions, of which one was the fourth battalion of the 56th Guards Air Assault Brigade led by Captain Leonid Khabarov, and 1,000 men of the Afghan army and security forces. The overall commander of the operation was General Pechevoy. 
The final operation of 1980 began on December 12. Heavy airstrikes hit the valley, causing the death of 100 civilians and 15 mujahideen. The fort at Rokha was finally evacuated on December 27, and the operation ended two days later, leaving the valley mostly under rebel control. 
By 1982 Massoud had built up his forces to 3,000 men, and other mujahideen from neighbouring areas could come to his aid  The approaches to the valley were strengthened with defensive positions established on dominant heights and near narrow passages. Hollowed-out caves were used as supply depots and shelters. 
Massoud, who expected an attack similar to the previous ones, had disposed his defenses close to the entrance of the valley, and was thus unable to prevent the Soviets from gaining footholds in the Panjshir. They established three main bases at Rukha, Bazarak and Anava. Most of the mujahideen had survived the attack and Massoud divided them into small, mobile groups that fought the Soviets all down the valley. 
Despite bitter fighting, the Soviets were unable to eradicate the mujahideen, and the battle soon developed into a stalemate. During the 5th and 6th offensives the Soviets suffered up to 3,000 casualties, and 1,000 Afghan Army soldiers defected to the Mujahideen. 
In January 1983, for the first time a ceasefire was concluded between the Soviets and the mujahideen, lasting 6 months, and later extended. Negotiated by Massoud in person with a colonel of the GRU, Anatoly Tkachev, the agreement stipulated that Soviet troops should evacuate the Panjshir, except for a small garrison at Anava, whose access was controlled by the mujahideen. The area covered by the ceasefire included the Panjshir valley, but not the Salang pass, where fighting continued. 
The 9th offensive was carried out in reprisal for the destruction of the DRA garrison at Peshgur, during which Massoud's mobile groups took 500 prisoners including 126 officers and killed a brigadier of the Afghan Army. The prisoners had been marched into the mountains, where the mujahideen claimed they were killed by a Soviet aerial bombardment, a claim others dubbed suspicious. 
Initiated hours after the raid, the Soviet counter-attack installed a new garrison in Peshgur, and pursued the retreating mujahideen. The group escorting the captured Afghan officers was caught in the open by Soviet helicopters, and in the ensuing fight most of the prisoners were killed, with both sides blaming the other for the incident. 
The first proposed solution to overcoming the gradient was by the use of three caisson locks. Adverts were printed in Bath periodicals in January 1796 to recruit stonemasons for building the locks. 
Trials of this first lock took place between November 1797 and June 1798. These showed that it could be traversed in 7 minutes; on 9 June 1798, a reporter for the Bath Herald wrote that: 
It is a pleasure to reflect that the hydrostatical contrivance for conveying of boats from upper to lower levels and vice versa, is completed, and may now be esteemed one of the greatest discoveries of the age; every scrupulous objection to the practability of its operation being removed.
In May 1801, having moved to Bath upon her father's retirement, Jane Austen wrote to her sister Cassandra about plans with her uncle to "take the long-planned walk to the Cassoon"; the short trip was a popular excursion at the time. The same year, Richard Warner wrote of the then-state of the caisson lock in his Excursions from Bath: 
The deviation of a few hundred yards from the road to Combhay, leads us to the hydrostatical lock, called the caisson, the bason of which now alone remains [...] the machine was consigned to destruction, but not to oblivion, since it will ever remain a memorable proof of the superior mechanical abilities of its very ingenious inventor
The precise location of the caisson locks (or their intended location) is in doubt. General consensus is that the completed caisson lock was accessed east of the basin near Caisson House. The second caisson was likely a short distance to the east, with the third a considerable distance downstream (near the site of Locks 19 and 20). 
Construction began on the flight in November 1802, with the first lock (lock 19) being completed in June 1804. During the works, the caisson lock was demolished and it is likely that the significant amount of masonry was reclaimed for use on the lock flight as coping stones and possibly on the later building of Caisson House. 
In 1881, the Camerton Branch of the Bristol and North Somerset Railway opened through the Cam valley, crossing the lock flight at lock 16. Like many canals, the arrival of rail transport began the decline of the waterway's use. The canal was put up for sale in 1894. The backpumps on the flight ceased operation in November 1898; transport would continue to operate until August 1899 when the water levels became insufficient for navigation. 
After the abandonment of the canal in 1899, the flight was left to become derelict. The chamber of lock 16, beneath a railway arch of the Camerton railway branch, was infilled. 
A building near the summit of the flight, Caisson House, is named for its proximity to the first caisson lock. The building is likely a former terrace of cottages built for the canal company in the 1830s (and therefore the removal of the caisson lock predates the cottages' construction). 
General restoration work began on the lower lock flight (below the Bull's Nose) in 2000. This work was expanded to cover the upper flight in 2011, as landowner permission needed to be sought. This work was undertaken alongside the Inland Waterways Association's Waterway Recovery Group. 
Half of this jungle is cleared to serve as a tourist spot while the other half is developed as a wildlife sanctuary. A trek for a kilometer leads one to a full view of seasonal waterfall. The inflow of tourists is more only during the holidays. Animals at the park include spotted deer, mongoose, hedgehog, foxes, reason monkeys, red headed parrots, love birds, tortoises, peacock, crocodiles, wild cats, eagles, ducks, pigeons, wild parrots, rabbits, and pythons(Indian Rock Python). 
Point Omega is a short novel by the American author Don DeLillo that was published in hardcover by Scribner's on February 2, 2010. It is DeLillo's fifteenth novel published under his own name and his first published work of fiction since his 2007 novel Falling Man. 
According to the Scribner 2010 catalog made available on October 12, 2009, Point Omega concerns the following: 
At the end of his service, Elster retreats to the desert, where he is joined by a filmmaker intent on documenting his experience. Jim Finley wants to make a one-take film, Elster its single character - "Just a man against a wall." 
An original short story unrelated to Point Omega entitled "Midnight in Dostoevsky" appeared in the November 30 edition of The New Yorker. 
An extract from Point Omega was made available on the Simon and Schuster website on December 10, 2009. 
DeLillo was set to give a first public reading of Point Omega at Book Court in Brooklyn, New York on February 11, 2010. 
DeLillo made an unexpected appearance at a PEN event on the steps of the main branch of the New York City Public Library in support of Chinese dissident writer Liu Xiaobo, who was sentenced to eleven years in prison for "inciting subversion of state power" on December 31, 2009. 
Point Omega spent one week on the New York Times Bestseller List, peaking at #35 on the extended version of the list during its one-week stay on the list. 
Pseudoplanktonic organisms are those that attach themselves to planktonic organisms or other floating objects, such as drifting wood, buoyant shells of organisms such as Spirula, or man-made flotsam. Examples include goose barnacles and the bryozoan Jellyella. By themselves these animals cannot float, which contrasts them with true planktonic organisms, such as Velella and the Portuguese Man o' War, which are buoyant. Pseudoplankton are often found in the guts of filtering zooplankters. 
Samantha Strauss is an Australian screenwriter known for the shows Dance Academy and Nine Perfect Strangers. 
Strauss grew up in Gold Coast, Queensland, and was educated at St Hilda's School, Trinity Lutheran College and Bond University, where she studied Film and Television. She also trained in professional ballet on the Gold Coast, before a fractured back injury forced her to change directions. 
Samantha Strauss is the co-creator and head writer of the 65-part ABC teen drama series Dance Academy. In 2011 the series won the Australian Logie for Most Outstanding Children's Drama and was nominated for an International Emmy Award in the Children and Young People category. 
She was a writer on the 2021 Hulu miniseries Nine Perfect Strangers, based on the novel by Australian writer Liane Moriarty. 
Gimhae National Museum is a national museum located in Gimhae, South Gyeongsang Province, South Korea. It opened on July 29, 1998 with the aim to compile available cultural properties of Gaya, one of ancient states in Korea. 
Its natural habitats are tropical moist lowland forests. It is threatened by habitat loss due to caused the expansion of agriculture. 
Breconshire or Brecknockshire was a constituency in Wales which returned one Member of Parliament (MP)  to the House of Commons of the English Parliament, and later to the Parliament of Great Britain and of the United Kingdom, between 1542 and 1918. (Historically, the "-shire" suffix was often omitted, leading to potential confusion with the Brecon borough constituency, which existed until 1885.) 
By the time of the 1911 census, the population of Breconshire was 63,036, and there were around 13,000 voters on the register around the outbreak of the First World War, a respectable size, but neighbouring Radnorshire with barely 6,000 voters was too small to survive. With effect from the 1918 general election, the two constituencies were merged, to form a new Brecon and Radnor constituency. 
Samisoni Langi (born 11 June 1993) is a Tonga international rugby league footballer who plays as a centre and stand-off for the Catalans Dragons in the Betfred Super League.  
Langi previously played for the Sydney Roosters in the NRL and for the Leigh Centurions in the Super League, signing from the Penrith Panthers in June 2017. 
He played his junior rugby league for the Berala Bears. While attending Trinity Catholic College, Auburn, he was selected to play for the NSW Combined Catholic Colleges Schoolboys and the Australian Schoolboys teams, both in 2011. 
In 2016, Langi joined the South Sydney Rabbitohs' feeder team, the North Sydney Bears, in the New South Wales Cup.  
Langi joined the Penrith Panthers in 2017, playing for their New South Wales Cup team. In June 2017 he moved to Leigh Centurions on a deal lasting until the end of the season. 
On 9 October 2021, Langi played for Catalans Dragons in their 2021 Super League Grand Final defeat against St. Helens. 
Langi was a member of Tonga's squad for the 2013 World Cup. He played in all three of Tonga's matches, kicking a total of 7 goals. 
On 19 October 2014, Langi played at five-eighth in Tonga's match against Papua New Guinea. On 2 May 2015, he played for Tonga in the 2015 Polynesian Cup against Samoa. He missed Tonga's first two conversion attempts, and the goal-kicking duties were given to Solomone Kata for the remainder of the match. 
On 7 May 2016, he played for Tonga against Samoa in the 2016 Polynesian Cup, suffering a game ending injury inside the opening 10 minutes. 
This article about a location in Rajkot district, Gujarat, India is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Douglas John Booth (born 9 July 1992) is an English actor. He first came to public attention following his performance as Boy George in the BBC Two film Worried About the Boy (2010). He also starred in the BBC adaptations of Great Expectations and Christopher and His Kind (both 2011) and  Netflix biopic The Dirt (2019). 
In 2013, Booth starred in Carlo Carlei's film adaptation of Romeo & Juliet. In 2014, he appeared in Darren Aronofsky's Noah and Lone Scherfig's The Riot Club, and in 2015, co-starred in The Wachowskis' Jupiter Ascending. 
Booth joined the Curtis Brown acting agency at the age of fifteen. He won his first professional acting role at the age of sixteen and quit his AS levels in drama, media studies and English literature. 
Booth was partly privately educated, attending Solefield School, a boys' junior independent school in the town of Sevenoaks in Kent, followed by Bennett Memorial Diocesan School, a Church of England state Voluntary Aided school in the town of Royal Tunbridge Wells (Kent), and Lingfield Notre Dame School, an independent school in the village of Lingfield in Surrey. 
On 3rd July 2021, Douglas announced via his Instagram account, that he had proposed to his long term girlfriend and ex co-star Bel Powley. The two met on set for Mary Shelley and had fallen in love during filming. 
Also in 2011, Booth appeared in the BBC film Christopher and His Kind, which explored novelist Christopher Isherwood's formative years in 1930s Berlin. He played Heinz, a German street-sweeper who became the lover of Matt Smith's Isherwood. 
In March 2014, he appeared as Shem in Darren Aronofsky's biblical epic Noah. Emma Watson played his character's wife; she first met Booth while shooting a Burberry fashion campaign in 2009: "There's something old-mannish about Doug, which he had even then. He knows who he is. He doesn't get intimidated, doesn't hold back, and is generally fearless." 
Booth has been supporting UNHCR since 2015. He has travelled to Iraq to visit refugees and internally displaced persons. Booth has highlighted the work of UNHCR in media interviews and has helped raise awareness of the global refugee crisis via his social media channels. Booth has supported UNHCR fundraising events and campaigns including World Refugee Day and the Nansen Refugee Award.[citation needed] 
Tobegah Dogbe was named Prime Minister on 28 September 2020 by President Faure Gnassingbe after the resignation of Komi Selom Klassou.[citation needed] 
She won a gold medal in flyweight at the 1987 World Taekwondo Championships in Barcelona. She won a silver medal at the 1989 World Taekwondo Championships, after being defeated by Won Sun-jin in the final. 
This biographical article relating to a Taiwanese sportsperson is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Obrint Pas was formed in 1993. One year later, in 1994 they recorded their first tape which took them to the III Tirant de Rock. During the following years, the band also took part in several festivals that helped them to consolidate their music. 
Their last work En Moviment (2005) is a Live album with many collaborations such as the likes of Alex from Inadaptats, Fermin Muguruza, Al Tall and many more. It was recorded in a tributing gig to Ovidi Montllor in Valencia ten years after his death. This work reached the charts in Spain (The only group singing in Catalan). 
In 2006, the band undertook an international tour that was called 2006 Internacionalista Tour and included England, Norway, Czech Republic, and Argentina. 
On 24 October 2010, in the city of Vic, the music of Obrint Pas was used in a world record attempt to get the largest lipdub ever. It succeeded with 5771 participants. The background music used was La flama, a song from 2004. 
Pedro Sanchez departed from the band and was replaced by Jorge Ortiz. Leaving Roberto Guadarrama as the final original member of Los Bukis. 
The 2016 UEC European Track Championships (under-23 & junior) were the 16th continental championships for European under-23 and junior track cyclists, and the 7th since the event was renamed following the reorganisation of European track cycling in 2010. The event took place at the Velodromo Fassa Bortolo in Montichiari, Italy from 12 to 17 July 2016. 
The 52nd Venice Biennale was an international contemporary art exhibition held in 2007. The Venice Biennale takes place biennially in Venice, Italy. Artistic director Robert Storr curated its central exhibition, "Think with the Senses, Feel with the Mind". 
Rodan is a male name. Its name day is celebrated on December 21 (Noel), or March 15 (Slovak calendar). 
A Different Light was a chain of four LGBT bookstores in the United States, active from 1979 to 2011. 
For 22 years the store were immensely successful and influential.  By the time ADL moved to Chelsea in New York City, it was hosting over 300 author events a year in its 3 stores.  Each store became a serious part of the local LGBT community and fostered the careers of many LGBT authors.  At its zenith, it employed over 80 people. 
Following several years of increased financial difficulty amid extreme competition with online book sellers, Barker and Newman closed the West Hollywood store in 2009, and the Castro branch in 2011. The chain's closure was part of a spate of LGBT bookstore closings in the United States early in the 21st century, including New York's Oscar Wilde Bookshop and Washington, D.C.'s Lambda Rising. 
The Treutlen County School District is a public school district in Treutlen County, Georgia, United States, based in Soperton. It serves the communities of Lothair and Soperton. 
Simone Camilli was born in Rome, Italy, on 28 March 1979. He and his partner Ylva van den Berg have a daughter named Nour Camilli. His funeral was held on Friday, 15 August 2014 in the Cathedral of SS Peter and Paul in Pitigliano, where his father had been the mayor since 2011. 
Ali Shehda Abu Afash was born around 1978. He was married to Shireen Abu Afash, and had two daughters named Majd (7) and Wajd (2). 
Simone Camilli began as an intern in Rome for the Associated Press in 2005. One of his first assignments was the death of Pope John Paul. In 2006, he moved to Jerusalem, where he covered stories of conflict and wartime in places like Israel and the Palestinian territories, Lebanon, and Iraq. He was interested in reporting on war and its effects on people's lives. In 2014, he moved to Beirut, Lebanon. During the Israeli operation in the Gaza Strip, he decided to report on the conflict. 
Abu Afash was a computer engineer at a health union in the Gaza Strip. He quit this work to be a journalist. From there, he worked for the Gaza Centre for Media Freedom as a Palestinian translator and journalist. He reported for three months on the problems Palestinian journalists dealt with and that of a training program within its sister organization, the Doha Centre for Media Freedom. 
Camilli and Abu Afash died while reporting on the morning of 13 August 2014 in Beit Lahiya. A soccer field located in the Gaza Strip had a live bomb, which was dropped by an Israel F-16. That Wednesday, Camilli and Abu Afash were at the scene filming the Gazan Police Force while they attempted to defuse the explosive. The story they were working on was about the ordnance crew. The bomb exploded during the process and killed six people, including the two journalists. 
Hatem Moussa, an AP photographer who was working with Camilli and Abu Afash, survived but was badly injured from the explosion. 
Irina Bokova, director-general of UNESCO, said, "I deplore the death of Simone Camilli and Ali Shehda Abu Afash, lifting the death toll of media workers from the current conflict (to eight journalists at the time). The loss of individuals who brave danger to ensure that the world is kept informed of events in conflict zones affects to us all." 
Pope Francis conducted a silent prayer with a group of around 70 journalists who were aboard the papal plane and at the time heading to a visit in South Korea. 
The Lightning rejoined the Atlantic Division after a one-season stint in the Central Division due to re-alignment under league's return to play protocols. 
On July 17, 2021, the Lightning announced the re-signing of defenseman Fredrik Claesson to a one-year, two-way contract. Claesson appeared in two regular season games with the Lightning after coming over via trade from the San Jose Sharks. 
That same day, the Lightning traded the negotiating rights to forward Barclay Goodrow to the New York Rangers in exchange for a 7th-round pick in the 2022 NHL Entry Draft. Goodrow was a member of the Lightning's back to back championships. 
On July 19, 2021, the Lightning announced that it had signed a 2-year extension with the Orlando Solar Bears to keep it as its ECHL affiliate. 
On July 21, 2021, the Seattle Kraken selected forward Yanni Gourde during their expansion draft from the Lightning. Gourde spent the past six seasons with the team. He skated in 310 games, recording 80 goals, 107 assists and winner of 2 Stanley Cups. 
On July 24, 2021, the Lightning announced that it had re-signed forward Gemel Smith to a 2-year contract extension. Smith appeared in five games with the Lightning during the regular season, recording three assists. 
On July 24 and 25, 2021, the Lightning made seven selections in the 2021. The Lightning picked 4 forwards and 3 defensemen. The following players made up their picks: Roman Schmidt (D), Dylan Duke (LW), Cameron MacDonald (C), Alex Gagne (D), Daniil Pylenkov (D), Robert Flinton (LW) and Niko Huuhtanen (RW). 
On July 26, 2021, the Lightning announced that it had issued qualify offers to restricted free agents Alex Barre-Boulet, Ross Colton, Boris Katchouk, Taylor Raddysh, Otto Somppi, Sean Day and Cal Foote. Former draft picks Ryan Lohin and Dominik Masin were not issued qualifying offers, which resulted in them becoming unrestricted free agents. 
On July 27, 2021, the Lightning announced that it had re-signed Otto Somppi to a one-year contract extension. Somppi appeared in 32 games with the Syracuse Crunch last season, recording 12 goals and 26 points. 
On July 28, 2021, the Lightning began the first day of free agency by announcing the signing of free agents Gabriel Dumont, Charles Hudon, Darren Raddysh, Andrej Sustr and Maxime Legace to one-year contracts. Dumont and Sustr had both previously played for the team. Darren Raddysh is the brother of Lightning prosepct Taylor Raddysh. 
The next free agent signing announced by the Lightning was that of goaltender Brian Elliott. The team signed Elliott to a one-year contract valued at $900k. Elliott spent the previous three seasons with the Philadelphia Flyers. Elliott was signed as the replacement of Curtis McElhinney as the team's backup goaltender. 
The next signing was 2020 Stanley Cup champion Zach Bogosian. Bogosian left the team as a free agent after helping the team to its second Stanley Cup by signing a one-year deal with the Toronto Maple Leafs. Bogosian signed a three-year contract that carries an annual cap hit of $850,000. 
The team next announced that it had signed Brayden Point to an 8-year contract extension valued at $75 million. The Lightning draft pick has skated in 351 career NHL games with the team, recording 139 goals and 310 points. Point was also a member of the Lightning's back to back championships. 
The Lightning moved back to free agent signings with the signing of Pierre-Edouard Bellemare to a two-year contract. The Bellemare contract will carry a cap hit of $1 million. Bellemare spent the past two seasons with the Colorado Avalanche. He recorded 18 goals and 15 assists during that timeframe. 
The Lightning finished the day with the signing of free agent Remi Elie to a one-year contract. Elie has appeared in 106 career NHL games between the Dallas Stars and Buffalo Sabres. He spent the past season playing for the Rochester Americans of the American Hockey League. 
On July 29, 2021, the Lightning announced the signing of forward Corey Perry to a two-year contract valued at $2 million. Perry joins the team after having lost to the team in consecutive finals with the Dallas Stars and Montreal Canadiens. Perry has been in the league for 16 years, recording 386 goals and 818 points over that span. 
The same day the team announced that it had re-signed defenseman Cal Foote to a two-year contract extension. The contract is to carry a cap hit of $850k. Foote was drafted by the team in 2017, and has skated in 35 career NHL games. 
On July 30, 2021, the Lightning announced the re-signing of forward Alex Barre-Boulet to a three-year contract extension. The contract will carry an annual cap hit of $758k. Barre-Boulet appeared in 15 games last season after making his NHL debut with the team. 
That day the Lightning also announced that it had traded forward Mitchell Stephens to the Detroit Red Wings in exchange for 6th-round pick in the 2022 NHL Entry Draft. Stephens had played in 45 games with the Lightning over the past two seasons. Stephens had three goals and four assists in the Lightning's 2020 championship run. 
Only July 31, 2021, the Lightning announced that it had re-signed forwards Taylor Raddysh and Boris Katchouk to three-year contract extensions. Both contracts will carry an annual cap hit of $758k. Raddysh has skated in 159 career AHL games, recording 49 goals and 110 points. Katchuouk has skated in 164 career AHL games, recording 36 goals and 89 points. Both forwards are expected to compete for the open roster spots at forward. 
Later that day the team announced that it had traded goaltender Spencer Martin to the Vancouver Canucks for future considerations. Martin recorded a 7-5-2 recorded in 15 games last season with the Syracuse Crunch of the American Hockey League. 
On August 1, 2021, the Lightning announced the re-signing of defenseman Sean Day to a one-year contract extension. Day appeared in 29 games with the Syracuse Crunch last season, recording 3 goals and 15 assists over 29 games. 
On August 9, 2021, the Lightning announced the re-signing of Ross Colton to a two-year contract extension. The contract will carry an annual cap hit of $1.125 million. Colton made his NHL debut this past season, skating scoring 9 goals and 3 assists over 30-games. Colton was also just the seventh rookie in NHL history to score a Stanley Cup winning goal and the second in the NHL's modern era. 
On September 21, 2021, the Lightning announced their 60-man 2021 training camp roster. The initial roster consists of 36 forwards, 18 defensemen and 6 goaltenders. Amongst the contracted players are 6 invitees that are not under contract with the Lightning. 
On September 28, 2021, the Lightning signed General Manager Julien BriseBois to a contract extension. BriseBois was the General Manager of the team during their back to back cup wins and has been with the franchise since 2010. 
On September 29, 2021, the Lightning announced their first round of training camp roster cuts. Forwards Jack Finley, Niko Huuhtanen, Cameron MacDonald and Declan McDonnell were reassigned to their junior clubs. Defenseman Roman Schmidt was also reassigned to his junior club. The Lightning also released Xavier Cormier and Avery Winslow from their camp tryouts. 
On October 4, 2021, the Lightning announced its second round of training camp roster cuts. The team cut 13 forwards, 6 defensemen and 3 goaltenders. This reduced the roster to 18 forwards, 11 defensemen and 3 goaltenders. 
Later in the day the team announced that it had cut four more players from its training camp roster. Gabriel Dumont, Charles Hudon, Sean Day and Darren Raddysh were assigned to the Syracuse Crunch to prepare for the start of the AHL season. This further trimmed the roster down to 16 forwards, 9 defensemen and 3 goaltenders. 
On October 8, 2021, the Lightning announced the reduction of the training camp roster by two players. Simon Ryfors was assigned to the Syracuse Crunch of the AHL, and Amir Miftakhov was assigned to the Orlando Solar Bears of the ECHL. This brought the team's roster down to 15 forwards, 9 defensemen and 2 goaltenders. 
On October 11, 2021, the Lightning announced the re-signing of head coach Jon Cooper to a 3-year contract extension. The contract terms were not released, however, they are believed to be in the same ballpark as Joel Quenneville ($5.5 million per year). 
Later that afternoon the Seattle Kraken claimed Alex Barre-Boulet off of waivers from the Lightning. Barre-Boulet skated in 15 games with the team last season. 
The regular season schedule was released on July 22, 2021, with only about a handful of games scheduled in February because NHL players are planning to participate in the 2022 Winter Olympics. 
Below are the Tampa Bay Lightning's selections at the 2021 NHL Entry Draft, which was held on July 23 and 24, 2021, via video conference call due to the COVID-19 pandemic. 
Mahakavi Kalidasu is 1960 Indian Telugu-language  biographical film produced by K. Nagamani and P. Suri Babu and directed by Kamalakara Kameswara Rao. It stars Akkineni Nageswara Rao and Sriranjani Jr., with music composed by Pendyala Nageswara Rao. The film is based on the life of the poet Kalidasa. 
Korlahalli is a village in the Mundargi taluk of Gadag district in the Indian state of Karnataka. Korlahalli is located south to district headquarters Gadag and Taluka headquarters Mundargi.  
Per the 2011 Census of India, has a total population of 3336; of whom 1684 are male and 1652 female. 
This article related to a location in Gadag district, Karnataka, India is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Bostrycapulus heteropoma is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Calyptraeidae, the slipper snails or slipper limpets, cup-and-saucer snails, and Chinese hat snails. 
The town is the seat of Strzelin County and also of the smaller municipality (gmina) of Strzelin. It is known for its extensive granite quarries, the deepest Europe's granite quarry is located here. It is 123 meters deep and covers 19.5 ha 
The 1969 Indian vice-presidential election was held on 30 August 1969. Gopal Swarup Pathak won the election to become the fourth Vice-President of India. The election was occurred since the sitting VP, Varahagiri Venkata Giri resigned to contest the presidential election after the death of incumbent President Zakir Husain. 
There were 6 contesting candidates and the counting of votes was taken up immediately after the conclusion of the poll. The result was declared after the first round of counting of first preference votes. Pathak declared elected after getting 400 first preference votes. 
FrameForge Storyboard Studio (formerly FrameForge Previz Studio) is previsualization storyboard software used by directors, cinematographers, VFX Supervisor and other creatives in the fields of filmmaking, television production, filmed advertising, industrial videos and other filmed or video content. 
It also won a Lumiere Award from the Advanced Imaging Society (previously the International 3D Society) for the program's support of Stereo 3D filmmaking. 
He moved to the Frenz United youth academy in the summer of 2014. He participated in the Frenz International Cup 2015 in which he gave an excellent performance by scoring 2 magnificent goals against Liverpool and 1 goal against Guangzhou Evergrande. 
Reza Karimi moved to Gostaresh Foolad in summer 2015. He made his debut on 7 February 2016 against FC Mashhad, formerly known as Siah Jamegan Khorasan F.C. 
The 1999 Coca-Cola 600, the 40th running of the event, was a NASCAR Winston Cup Series race held on May 30, 1999 at Lowe's Motor Speedway in Concord, North Carolina. Contested at 400 laps on the 1.5 mile (2.4 km) speedway, it was the twelfth race of the 1999 NASCAR Winston Cup Series season. 
The race was won by Jeff Burton, driving the #99 Exide Batteries Ford Taurus for Roush Racing. It was his third victory of six he recorded during the 1999 season and his first of two wins in the Coca-Cola 600 (he later won the event in 2001). He also won a $1 million bonus from Winston as part of their No Bull 5 competition. 
On 20 January 2017, the church was the venue for the funeral of Antony Armstrong-Jones, 1st Earl of Snowdon. He was buried in the churchyard where the family has a plot. 
The Handle is the name of an electric guitar created by the award-winning designer Peter Solomon and produced by the company XOX Audio Tools. 
The Handle is characterized by its hollow shell which construction favors direct transmission of acoustic vibrations and creates a resonance chamber similar to that of a semi-acoustic guitar. 
The guitar won the "Good Design" 2006 award from Chicago Athenaeum Museum has been selected by the acclaimed ADI Design Index. 
Bog spavin is a swelling of the tibiotarsal joint of the horse's hock which, in itself, does not cause lameness. The joint becomes distended by excess synovial fluid and/or thickened synovial tissue bringing about a soft, fluctuant swelling on the front of the joint, as well as in the medial and lateral plantar pouches.  Bog spavin is generally an indication of underlying pathology within the joint. 
Many horses with bog spavin will not be lame. However, bog spavin can be a sign that the horse has joint disease, which is a very significant finding. Usually lameness will occur if the workload of the horse is increased. Bog spavin should not be treated lightly, and it is best to have a veterinarian examine the horse to find the cause, even if the horse does not appear lame. 
Unlike bone spavin, bog spavin does not show any changes to the bone itself. For this reason it is considered to be of no interest to those studying animal paleopathology (Baker and Brothwell, 1980). 
DSCAM and Dscam are both abbreviations for Down syndrome cell adhesion molecule. In humans, DSCAM refers to a gene that encodes one of several protein isoforms. 
Down syndrome (DS), caused by trisomy 21, is the most common birth defect associated with intellectual disability. DSCAM plays a crucial role in the development of DS: it is expressed in the developing nervous system, with the highest level of expression occurring in the fetal brain. When over-expressed in the developing fetal central nervous system, it leads to Down syndrome. 
DSCAM was first identified in an effort to characterize proteins located within human chromosome band 21q22, a region known to play a critical role in Down syndrome. The name Down syndrome cell adhesion molecule was chosen for a combination of reasons including: 1) chromosomal location, 2) its appropriate (normal) expression in developing neural tissue, and 3) its structure as an Ig receptor related to other cell adhesion molecules (CAMs). 
Another DSCAM-like gene, DSCAML1, is located on chromosome band 11q23, a locus associated with Gilles de la Tourette and Jacobsen syndromes. 
Comparing the homology between genes and their products, is fundamental in understanding the phylogenetic relationship across the evolutionary pathway. In addition to the thousands of isoforms that can be populated from a single DSCAM of one species, DSCAM also demonstrates a diverse array of homology across species. Below are the genes, mRNA transcripts, and proteins identified as homologs of Down syndrome adhesion molecule. 
Like many neuronal receptors, Dscam proteins have multiple functions, with repulsive and attractive roles that are dependent on the type of ligand that they interact with. 
Self-avoidance is a mechanism where the neuronal processes from the cell repel each other during arborization and axon branching to avoid fasciculation and clumping. Self-avoidance is necessary to prevent extensive overlapping in the arborization pattern and to facilitate the coverage of the neuronal processes across different regions of the nervous system during development. 
DSCAM is recognized to be involved in this process in both vertebrates and invertebrates during neural development. Cell aggregation assays show that cell adhesion molecules, such as DSCAM, belonging to the immunoglobulin superfamily bind homophilically and specifically. These molecules also appear to have a role in chemoattraction and repulsion. 
Vlasina Okruglica is a village in the municipality of Surdulica, Serbia. According to the 2002 census, the village has a population of 163 people. 
WFUNA is an international non-governmental organization with Consultative Status at the United Nations Economic and Social Council (ECOSOC) and consultative or liaison links with many other UN organizations and agencies. As a Federation, its membership is made of 95 United Nations Associations (UNAs) in as many member states of the UN. 
WFUNA is the largest non-profit organization with the mission of supporting the principles and purposes of the UN. 
WFUNA was founded in Luxembourg on 2 August 1946 by 22 national United Nations Associations (UNAs). The Constitution they adopted proclaims that: 
Believing that since wars begin in the minds of men, it is in the minds of men that the defenses of peace must be constructed, and 
Believing that the peace must be founded, if it is not to fail, upon the intellectual and moral solidarity of all peoples, 
 Have resolved to combine our efforts to form an association of the peoples to be known as the World Federation of United Nations Associations."
Over the years, UNAs have been established in more UN member-States especially as new countries were formed and joined the UN. 
Eleanor Roosevelt was an active participant in WFUNA and one of the leading figures in its creation. 
WFUNA helped promote "Security and Co-operation in Europe" (CSCE) by holding in 1967 the first conference on this topic. Other NGOs followed WFUNA's campaign which continued until 1975 when the Final Act was signed at Helsinki by 35 governments, including United States and Canada, establishing the CSCE process. Further campaigning led in 1994 to the CSCE process that consisted of a Biennial Review Conference being raised to a Permanent Organization (OSCE). 
WFUNA, including its African UNA members, made significant contributions to the NGO campaign for the abolition of Apartheid. The 32nd General Assembly of the UN, in 1977, received a resolution from the 117th WFUNA Executive Committee meeting, which requested: 
"The Security Council of the UN to give urgent consideration to the taking of immediate steps to ensure that no State, multinational or other body or person be allowed to provide South Africa or Rhodesia with any equipment, technology or production of nuclear weapons of any kind". 
WFUNA facilitated high-level informal consultations on disarmament issues between key experts of the US and USSR during the Cold War. It organized a number of NGO Seminars on disarmament in cooperation with the UN, UNESCO and other NGOs. 
During its history, WFUNA has served as a forum for global dialogues on development. Several suggestions, like the establishment of an Economic Commission for Africa, were first adopted at the WFUNA Plenary Assemblies and then endorsed by governments. 
There are currently 92 UN Associations connecting hundreds of thousands of people to the United Nations. UNAs at the national level mainly play a role in: 
A United Nations Association can only be recognized in a UN member-State and there can be only one in each UN member-State. All Associations are non-profit organizations, independent from one another. WFUNA is in charge of the coordination of the network and puts efforts in building the capacity of its existing members while trying to provide counseling to those groups willing to create new UNAs in member-State that don't have any. 
The continent with the most UN associations is Europe immediately followed by Africa while South America has seen a rapid growth in numbers of UNAs in the last decade. 
WFUNA is involved with the UN system since its inception and has been working with most Member States through its activities and through its member Associations.  
In 2020, WFUNA also resumed with the traditional creation of art posters to commemorate specific events starting with the 75th Anniversary of the United Nations and with idea of "fragile multilateralism" as  a leading message.  
Line 4 was one of a few Metro lines that was never extended beyond the Parisian city limits, though an initial extension towards La Vache-Noire was originally planned (but was never carried out). Nearly a century after the line's opening, construction of the Montrouge extension commenced, with the new Mairie de Montrouge station opening to passengers on 23 March 2013. 
In 2018, 7,081,319 passengers passed through the metro station placing it in 45th position for usage of all 302 stations. 
The Montrouge town hall, the belfry of Montrouge, which is a cultural and congress center, as well as the church of Saint-Jacques-le-Majeur are in the immediate vicinity of the station. 
After the Nazis banned Jews from holding academic positions in Germany in 1933,  she moved to England and then to the United States where she worked for the Eastman Kodak Company.  Her main areas of research were photochemistry and reaction kinetics. 
On April 7, 1933, the Law for the Restoration of the Professional Civil Service in Germany was passed, banning  Jews from holding public positions, including teaching positions. Along with nearly one-third of the University of Berlin's teaching staff and nearly half of its private lecturers, Kornfeld was deprived of her teaching license and any further possibility of employment in German academia. 
Kornfeld was able to emigrate to England in 1933.  She apparently received some assistance from the Society for the Protection of Science and Learning (SPSL)  at the University of Birmingham.  The SPSL, which was initially known as the Academic Assistance Council, formed in London in 1933. Kornfeld was on the List of Displaced German Scholars compiled by the  SPSL and published in 1936. 
Relocation, for younger women, was perhaps easier. Kornfeld was older and better established in her field in 1933. Even with positive recommendations from Max Bodenstein and physicist Friedrich Paschen, it was difficult for her to find a new position at her level and in her specialization. She initially resisted the idea of teaching at a women's college, or going into industrial research. 
Village at Sunset is an oil painting created in 1884 by Vincent van Gogh. It is currently on display at Rijksmuseum in Amsterdam.  
The body of femur (or shaft of femur), is the almost cylindrical, long part of the femur. It is a little broader above than in the center, broadest and somewhat flattened from before backward below. It is slightly arched, so as to be convex in front, and concave behind, where it is strengthened by a prominent longitudinal ridge, the linea aspera. 
The linea aspera is a prominent longitudinal ridge or crest, on the middle third of the bone, presenting a medial and a lateral lip, and a narrow rough, intermediate line. 
The lateral ridge termed the gluteal tuberosity is very rough, and runs almost vertically upward to the base of the greater trochanter. It gives attachment to part of the gluteus maximus: its upper part is often elongated into a roughened crest, on which a more or less well-marked, rounded tubercle, the third trochanter, is occasionally developed. 
The intermediate ridge or pectineal line is continued to the base of the lesser trochanter and gives attachment to the pectineus; the medial ridge is lost in the intertrochanteric line; between these two a portion of the iliacus is inserted. 
Below, the linea aspera is prolonged into two ridges, enclosing between them a triangular area, the popliteal surface, upon which the popliteal artery rests. 
Of these two ridges, the lateral is the more prominent, and descends to the summit of the lateral condyle. 
It ends below at the summit of the medial condyle, in a small tubercle, the adductor tubercle, which affords insertion to the tendon of the adductor magnus. 
From the medial lip of the linea aspera and its prolongations above and below, the vastus medialis arises; and from the lateral lip and its upward prolongation, the vastus lateralis takes origin. 
The adductor magnus is inserted into the linea aspera, and to its lateral prolongation above, and its medial prolongation below. 
Between the vastus lateralis and the adductor magnus two muscles are attached: the gluteus maximus inserted above, and the short head of the biceps femoris arising below. 
Between the adductor magnus and the vastus medialis four muscles are inserted: the iliacus and pectineus above; the adductor brevis and adductor longus below. 
The linea aspera is perforated a little below its center by the nutrient canal, which is directed obliquely upward. 
The other two borders of the femur are only slightly marked: the lateral border extends from the antero-inferior angle of the greater trochanter to the anterior extremity of the lateral condyle; the medial border from the intertrochanteric line, at a point opposite the lesser trochanter, to the anterior extremity of the medial condyle. 
The anterior surface includes that portion of the shaft which is situated between the lateral and medial borders. 
From the upper three-fourths of this surface the vastus intermedius arises; the lower fourth is separated from the muscle by the intervention of the synovial membrane of the knee-joint and a bursa; from the upper part of it the articularis genus takes origin. 
The lateral surface includes the portion between the lateral border and the linea aspera; it is continuous above with the corresponding surface of the greater trochanter, below with that of the lateral condyle: from its upper three-fourths the vastus intermedius takes origin. 
The medial surface includes the portion between the medial border and the linea aspera; it is continuous above with the lower border of the neck, below with the medial side of the medial condyle: it is covered by the vastus medialis. 
J. Buck's was a restaurant chain named after the Buck family of broadcasters, Jack Buck, Joe Buck, and Julie Buck. Established in 1999, J. Buck's operated 2 restaurants in Greater St. Louis, Missouri. The franchise closed on October 31, 2015. 
J. Buck's had two locations in Missouri; one is St. Louis, and another in Clayton. Both closed on October 31, 2015. 
J. Buck's introduced a new, expanded menu in January 2009 featuring salads, sandwiches, pizzas and entrees along with desserts and daily specials.  
This US-based restaurant or restaurant chain article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Pellegrini started his career in 1992 as a television writer, collaborating with RAI, Mediaset and MTV. After directing a short film (Biodegradabile, 1997) and several commercial shorts, in 1999 he made his feature film debut with the comedy film E allora mambo!, which got him a nomination for Silver Ribbon for Best Director. 
This biographical article related to film in Italy is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In thermodynamics a residual property is defined as the difference between a real gas property and an ideal gas property, both considered at the same pressure, temperature, and composition. 
The Story of Ivy is a 1927 melodramatic novel by the British writer Marie Belloc Lowndes. It portrays Ivy Jervis, a beautiful but ambitious young woman whose frustrations with her impoverished husband push her to murder him, and let the blame fall on another. 
A 19 November 1927 review in The Spectator commented "This is one of Mrs. Lowndes's best stories. It has a strong vein of mystery and sensation, and yet gives us a variety of true characterization and some shrewd commentary on modern life." 
In 1947 the story served as the basis for a film Ivy directed Sam Wood and starring Joan Fontaine in the title role. The production is a costume film set during the Edwardian Era and with some changes from the original plot to conform to the requirements of the production code. 
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
Scott Michael Sanderson (born July 25, 1974) is a former American football offensive lineman. He played college football at Washington State University in Pullman, where he was an All-American in 1996 under head coach Mike Price. Sanderson was selected in the third round of the 1997 NFL Draft by the Tennessee Oilers, and appeared mostly on special teams. He later played for the New Orleans Saints and Chicago Bears. 
This biographical article relating to an American football offensive lineman born in the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Mega reviewer Andy Dyer wrote that "it took me longer to write this 400-word review than it did to finish the game". 
Coelocnemis is a genus of darkling beetles in the family Tenebrionidae. There are about seven described species in Coelocnemis, found mainly in western Canada, western United States, and Mexico. 
Princesses is an American television sitcom that aired on CBS from September 27 to October 25, 1991. The series was produced by Universal Television and lasted five episodes. The series theme song, "Someday My Prince Will Come" (from Disney's animated film Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs), was written by Frank Churchill and Larry Morey, and was performed by The Roches. 
The idea of the three being roommates in the same apartment was by accident, thanks to the apartment's owner Tony, who promised Tracy and Georgy the use of the rent-free building without telling either one who would use it or to whom he had loaned it. 
Shortly after the cancellation, an accidental meeting gave Drescher a chance to pitch a new television series to Sagansky, and she came up with her hit show The Nanny. In fact, Drescher developed the idea for The Nanny while visiting with Princesses co-star Twiggy and her family in England, and modeled the character of Maxwell Sheffield on Twiggy's husband Leigh Lawson. 
The show ended up ranking 118th out of 132 shows that season, averaging only a 6.3 household rating. 
It was located on the northeast corner of the Postplatz (post office square) in the old town before it was severely damaged in the Dresden bombing in 1945 and subsequently destroyed in 1962 by the party and government of the GDR. It was the only Gothic church in the city. 
The Franciscan Friary stood empty for decades before it was restored in 1610 by Sophie of Brandenburg and reopened as a Lutheran church dedicated to Saint Sofia in her honour. In 1737 it became the (Evangelical Lutheran) Hofkirche (court church) of the Electorate of Saxony (not to be confused with the Roman Catholic Hofkirche the Elector began building at the same time). 
Between the years 1718 and 1720 famed pipe organ maker Gottfried Silbermann installed one of the only 50 organs he completed, known for their clear meantone temperament.  Johann Sebastian Bach is known to have played concerts on the instrument in 1725 and 1747.[citation needed] 
In 1933 the towers were simplified (gothic elements were removed and the spires covered in copper) because they had been deteriorating and were becoming dangerous. This was intended as a temporary solution before restoring the neogothic details later. 
In the bombing of Dresden in February 1945 the Sophienkirche was gutted by fire and the Silbermann organ completely destroyed. The ceiling and walls remained intact until 1946 when the vaulted ceiling, without the support of the internal columns destroyed by the fire, collapsed leaving only the south spires standing.  These were then intentionally destroyed in 1950 to recover the copper for the Kreuzkirche. 
Beginning in 2009 a monument incorporating original fragments of the Busmann chapel has been built in the chapel's original position as a memorial to the Sophienkirche and a reminder of the horrors of war and the misuse of power by dictators.  It is intended to enclose the memorial in a glass cube so that it can be used for exhibitions. 
The Ministry of Tourism was created on December 24, 1986, in article No. 83 of Law No. 15,851, promulgated that day. It included the national tourism policy; the promotion of tourism industries; the regime, coordination and control of tourism; the promotion of tourism to the country and within it; tourist infrastructure, promotion, regime and registration of tourism service providers. 
Matt Prime is a multi-award winning, multi-platinum selling English songwriter and record producer based in the UK. 
Prime grew up in Somerset and studied music at university in London.  After graduating he secured a publishing deal with Sony/ATV and has since written over fifteen Top 10 hit singles, five Top 5 UK singles and a US Billboard Chart #1 single. His writing and production credits include: Sam Smith, Charlie Puth, Aloe Blacc, Trey Songz, Jason Derulo, CeeLo Green, Jake Bugg, Kylie Minogue, Maverick Sabre, JP Cooper, James Blunt, The Vamps, Olly Murs, Eliza Doolittle and more. 
The Bait al-Hikmah as a Central Library and Center for Academic Research possesses all requisite modern library equipment and facilities as well as a qualified staff. It is used by students, faculties, researchers, scholars and freelancers nationally and internationally. The library is fully computerised. 
 Hakim Said collected significant Islamic manuscripts from around the world and gave them to the Bait al-Hikmah. The Manuscripts section of Bait al-Hikmah library houses old and rare, centuries-old hand-written manuscripts of the Quran. The periodical section has 2,255 Journals (current), and about 28,010 bound volumes of journals (back issues). The clipping section has more than 3.68 million clippings on over 1,300 subjects. 
At present Bait al-Hikmah Library has more than 477 thousand books, 1,700+ manuscripts and more than three-and-a-half million clippings. 
This is an inclusive list of science fiction television programs whose names begin with the letter J. 
A building, or edifice, is a structure with a roof and walls standing more or less permanently in one place, such as a house or factory. Buildings come in a variety of sizes, shapes, and functions, and have been adapted throughout history for a wide number of factors, from building materials available, to weather conditions, land prices, ground conditions, specific uses, and aesthetic reasons. To better understand the term building compare the list of nonbuilding structures. 
Ever since the first cave paintings, buildings have also become objects or canvasses of much artistic expression. In recent years, interest in sustainable planning and building practices has also become an intentional part of the design process of many new buildings and other structures. 
Structural height in technical usage is the height to the highest architectural detail on building from street-level. Depending on how they are classified, spires and masts may or may not be included in this height. Spires and masts used as antennas are not generally included. The definition of a low-rise vs. a high-rise building is a matter of debate, but generally three storeys or less is considered low-rise. 
There is clear evidence of homebuilding from around 18,000 BC. Buildings became common during the Neolithic (see Neolithic architecture). 
Building types may range from huts to multimillion-dollar high-rise apartment blocks able to house thousands of people. Increasing settlement density in buildings (and smaller distances between buildings) is usually a response to high ground prices resulting from many people wanting to live close to work or similar attractors. Other common building materials are brick, concrete or combinations of either of these with stone. 
Historically many people lived in communal buildings called longhouses, smaller dwellings called pit-houses and houses combined with barns sometimes called housebarns. 
Buildings are defined to be substantial, permanent structures so other dwelling forms such as houseboats, yurts, and motorhomes are dwellings but not buildings. 
The practice of designing, constructing, and operating buildings is most usually a collective effort of different groups of professionals and trades. Depending on the size, complexity, and purpose of a particular building project, the project team may include: 
Regardless of their size or intended use, all buildings in the US must comply with zoning ordinances, building codes and other regulations such as fire codes, life safety codes and related standards. 
Any building requires a certain general amount of internal infrastructure to function, which includes such elements like heating / cooling, power and telecommunications, water and wastewater etc. Especially in commercial buildings (such as offices or factories), these can be extremely intricate systems taking up large amounts of space (sometimes located in separate areas or double floors / false ceilings) and constitute a big part of the regular maintenance required. 
Buildings may be damaged during the construction of the building or during maintenance. There are several other reasons behind building damage like accidents such as storms, explosions, subsidence caused by mining, water withdrawal or poor foundations and landslides. Buildings also may suffer from fire damage and flooding in special circumstances. They may also become dilapidated through lack of proper maintenance or alteration work improperly carried out. 
After initially failing to secure a berth in the FIBA World Olympic Qualifying Tournament (OQT) by virtue of FIBA rankings in September 2019, the Philippines was given a new chance to qualify for the 2020 Summer Olympics in Tokyo in February 2021. The team was given a berth in the OQT in Belgrade, Serbia after New Zealand's withdrawal. However the Philippines failed to qualify for the Olympics, losing games to Serbia and the Dominican Republic. 
The team also participated at the 2021 King Abdullah Cup in Jordan as part of their preparations for the FIBA Asia Cup. However the FIBA Asia Cup was postponed by a year. Similarly the Philippines plans to field a basketball team at the 2021 Southeast Asian Games in Vietnam, but the multi-sporting event was likewise postponed to 2022. 
The following was the roster of the Philippines national team for the third window of the 2021 FIBA Asia Cup qualification. 
The following was the roster of the Philippines national team for the 2020 FIBA Men's Olympic Qualifying Tournament in Belgrade. 
Because of the unusual chemical structure and its potential biological activity, there has been research aimed at its total synthesis. 
Schanker was a radical among radicals. His "conglomerations of color-patches, among other things", wrote the sympathetic art critic Emily Genauer in 1935, "are bound to alienate no small part of the gallery-going public." However, the work proved popular in the New York art scene. 
By 1937, even the often hostile New York Times art critic Edward Alden Jewell softened to the artist. When speaking of Schanker's major WPA mural at the municipal building studios of WNYC in New York, Jewell noted that Schanker had "a touch of lyric feeling".  In 1938, Art News declared that "Louis Schanker's delightful Street Scene From My Window calls forth admiration for its delicacy of color and kaleidoscopic forms in plane geometry." 
Though much of my work is generally classified as abstract, all of my work develops from natural forms. I have great respect for the forms of nature and an inherent need to express myself in relation to those forms.
Schanker moved into teaching, first at the New School for Social Research and then, from 1949 until his retirement, at Bard College. The January 1955 Life Magazine article "Comeback of an Art", describes him as "one of the earliest U.S.woodcut artists to do abstractions, Schanker since has trained or influenced a generation of talented younger artists." 
He was one of the major printmakers of the 1930s. He continued to be an active part of the New York art scene with many group and solo exhibitions including two shows (1943 and 1974,) at the Brooklyn Museum and a 1978 retrospective at the Associated American Artists. Just a few blocks from the hospital where he died in 1981 the Martin Diamond Gallery was holding a major show of his oils, sculpture and prints and his work was on exhibit at the Whitney Museum of American Art. 
Schanker's has remained popular and there is still continuing interest in his works. In 1989, summing up Schanker's career for a book on American abstraction, Virginia Mecklenburg wrote of "an animated expressionism that aims at a fundamental emotional structure". 
In December 1960, Schanker married socialite Libby Holman. It was his second marriage. They remained together until her death in 1971. 
Schanker died on May 7, 1981 at the Lenox Hill Hospital, after previously suffering a stroke. He was 78 years old. 
Utkala Kingdom was located in the northern and eastern portion of the modern-day Indian state of Odisha and also included the districts of Bankura, Purulia and Midnapore districts of West Bengal. This kingdom was mentioned in the epic Mahabharata, with the names Utkala, Utpala, and Okkal. It is mentioned in India's national anthem, Jana Gana Mana. 
The Dasarnas, the Mekalas (a kingdom to the west of Utkala) and the Utkalas were mentioned as kingdoms of Bharata Varsha (Ancient India) (6:9). Utkalas were mentioned as taking part in the Kurukshetra War siding with the Kauravas. Many Mekalas, Utkalas, Kalingas, Nishadas, and Tamraliptakas, advanced against Nakula, showering their shafts and lances, desirous of slaying him (8:22). 
The Utpalas, the Mekalas, the Paundras, the Kalingas, the Andhras, the Nishadas, the Trigartas, and the Valhikas, were all vanquished by Karna (7:4). 
The administrative divisions of Hunan, a province of the People's Republic of China, consists of prefecture-level divisions subdivided into county-level divisions then subdivided into township-level divisions. 
All of these administrative divisions are explained in greater detail at Administrative divisions of the People's Republic of China. This chart lists only prefecture-level and county-level divisions of Hunan. 
Ingrid Pahlmann (born 1 December 1957) is a German politician of the Christian Democratic Union (CDU) who has served as a member of the Bundestag from the state of Lower Saxony from 2013 till 2017 and again since 2019. 
This biography article about a member of the Christian Democratic Union of Germany (CDU) is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The organization of the Rio 2007 Games has chosen the figure of the Sun to represent the event. And, in a decision never taken before, it has defined it as the single mascot of the Pan American and Parapan American Games, such as the Brazilian expression, that the "Sol Brilha para Todos" (The sun shines for everyone), reinforcing thus the principles against prejudice and that, like the sun, sport is for all. 
Traditionally used in large sport events, the mascot figure serves the purpose of cheering the event, enforcing the playful aspect of sports and captivating spectators and athletes. The mascot's main choice is to transmit messages of peace, respect to the environment, friendship and brotherhood, which are intrinsic values to the Olympic Movement. 
For the 2007 Games Futsal was added to the program for the first (and as of 2011 only time) while racquetball and basque pelota were dropped. 
Cubot is a brand of Android smartphones manufactured in China by Shenzhen Huafurui Technology Co., Ltd. The company is based in Shenzhen and was founded in 2012. 
In February 2016, Cubot and Cheetah Mobile launched the CheetahPhone, an Android 6.0 Marshmallow based smartphone, at MWC in Barcelona, Spain. 
In 2016, Cubot and Kilimall launched the Cubot Note S, which includes an eight megapixel primary camera. The secondary camera is five megapixels. The 5.5" scratch resistant screen comes with an extra layer of security in the form of a protector. It has a high definition resolution of 720p. The device has a mono speaker and a 3.5mm jack. The device has 16 gigabytes of internal storage, expandable to 64 gigabytes. 
Henk Grim (born 1 April 1962) is a Dutch former professional footballer who played for De Treffers, NEC, Den Bosch and AZ, as a striker. After retiring as a player, he later worked as a scout, working at NEC between 1997 and 2012, rising to become head scout. He became head scout at De Treffers in 2015, combining that position with a role at German club FC St. Pauli. 
This biographical article related to association football in the Netherlands, about a forward, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
"Forever" is the second single by the band Sturm und Drang. It was only released as a radio promo, and there was no music video for it. The band recorded another version of it, featuring Udo Dirkschneider on backing vocals. It charted at number 9 in Finland.[citation needed] 
"Wolves" is a song by American rapper Big Sean featuring American rapper and singer Post Malone. It was sent to rhythmic contemporary radio on September 19, 2020, as the second single from Sean's fifth studio album Detroit 2 (2020). The song was produced by Take A Daytrip, with additional production from Teddy Walton and Samuel Bonhart. It also features additional vocals from American rapper ASAP Rocky. 
Post Malone heard it early. I ran into him at a restaurant, and we were kicking it. It was like a mutual-respect-type of exchange. We were both working, so I'm like, "I got this song. See what you think." When I sent it to him he was like, "Man, this is incredible. I have to, let's do it." A$AP Rocky is on there too, at the very beginning just doing some ad-libs.
Big Sean also revealed in that interview that ASAP Rocky originally had a verse on the song, but it was moved to another song on Detroit 2. 
The official music video was released on November 20, 2020. It features a cameo from Big Sean's mother, Myra Anderson. Sean and Post Malone "trade haunting verses in a sleek white warehouse", and also in front of a big red circle resembling a super blood wolf moon. 
In September 2017, Embley was placed at number 79 on commentator Iain Dale's list of 'The 100 Most Influential People on the Left'. 
Archpriest of Santa Prassede, Laurentius was elected pope on 22 November 498, in opposition to Pope Symmachus, by a dissenting faction. If Theodore Lector can be trusted, he was picked by the former consul Rufius Postumius Festus as a candidate; Festus had secretly promised the Byzantine Emperor Anastasius that Pope Anastasius II would approve the Henotikon, but upon returning from Constantinople he found the Pope had died. 
Once news of Theodoric's decision reached Rome, Laurentius retired from the city to one of Festus's estates, according to the "Laurentian Fragment", because "he did not want the city to be troubled by daily strife", where he fasted constantly until his death. 
Colin Anthony "Topper" Carew (born July 16, 1943) is an American film director, screenwriter and producer. He is best known for such films as Talkin' Dirty After Dark and D.C. Cab.  He is also the creator of such television series as Martin. 
This article about a television writer from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Shehadeh grew up in a Christian Arab family in Nazareth. He gained a BA in economic and international relations at the Hebrew University of Jerusalem in 1995, an MA in political science from the University of Haifa, and a PhD in the same subject at the Hebrew University. He worked as a researcher at Mada al-Carmel and became a member of the High Follow-Up Committee for Arab Citizens. 
The discography of Lorie, a French pop singer, consists of five studio albums, one compilation album, three live albums and eighteen singles. Throughout her singing career, Lorie has obtained success in France, Canada and Francophone Belgium. 
The deviation between the measurements in all inertial frames is given by the formulas for Lorentz transformation and time dilation (see Derivation). It turns out that the proper length remains unchanged and always denotes the greatest length of an object, and the length of the same object measured in another inertial reference frame is shorter than the proper length. This contraction only occurs along the line of motion, and can be represented by the relation 
In this equation both L and L0 are measured parallel to the object's line of movement. For the observer in relative movement, the length of the object is measured by subtracting the simultaneously measured distances of both ends of the object. For more general conversions, see the Lorentz transformations. An observer at rest observing an object travelling very close to the speed of light would observe the length of the object in the direction of motion as very near zero. 
Magnetic forces are caused by relativistic contraction when electrons are moving relative to atomic nuclei. The magnetic force on a moving charge next to a current-carrying wire is a result of relativistic motion between electrons and protons. 
This effect also applies to magnetic particles without current, with current being replaced with electron spin.[citation needed] 
The author unjustifiably stated a difference of Lorentz's view and that of mine concerning the physical facts. The question as to whether length contraction really exists or not is misleading. It doesn't "really" exist, in so far as it doesn't exist for a comoving observer; though it "really" exists, i.e. in such a way that it could be demonstrated in principle by physical means by a non-comoving observer.
Due to superficial application of the contraction formula some paradoxes can occur. Examples are the ladder paradox and Bell's spaceship paradox. However, those paradoxes can be solved by a correct application of relativity of simultaneity. Another famous paradox is the Ehrenfest paradox, which proves that the concept of rigid bodies is not compatible with relativity, reducing the applicability of Born rigidity, and showing that for a co-rotating observer the geometry is in fact non-Euclidean. 
According to the relativity principle, objects that are at rest in S have to be contracted in S' as well. By exchanging the above signs and primes symmetrically, it follows: 
Conversely, if the object rests in S and its proper length is known, the simultaneity of the measurements at the object's endpoints has to be considered in another frame S', as the object constantly changes its position there. Therefore, both spatial and temporal coordinates must be transformed: 
Length contraction can also be derived from time dilation, according to which the rate of a single "moving" clock (indicating its proper time      T  0     {\displaystyle T_{0}}  ) is lower with respect to two synchronized "resting" clocks (indicating     T   {\displaystyle T}  ). Time dilation was experimentally confirmed multiple times, and is represented by the relation: 
Additional geometrical considerations show, that length contraction can be regarded as a trigonometric phenomenon, with analogy to  parallel slices through a cuboid before and after a rotation in E3 (see left half figure at the right).  This is the Euclidean analog of boosting a cuboid in E1,2.  In the latter case, however, we can interpret the boosted cuboid as the world slab of a moving plate. 
King Haakon VII's Freedom Cross (Norwegian: Haakon VIIs Frihetskors) was established in Norway on 18 May 1945. The medal is awarded to Norwegian or foreign military or civilian personnel for outstanding achievement during war.  It is ranked fifth in the order of precedence in the Norwegian honours system. 
Captiva Pass is the strait that separates North Captiva Island from La Costa Island in Lee County, Florida. 
Macbeth is a 1987 French film of Verdi's opera  Macbeth (libretto by Francesco Maria Piave based on Shakespeare's play) Directed by Claude d'Anna, it was screened out of competition at the 1987 Cannes Film Festival. 
This article related to a French film of the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a railway station in North Rhine Westphalia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The list is arranged by drainage basin from north to south, with respective tributaries indented under each larger stream's name and ordered from downstream to upstream. All rivers in Sergipe drain to the Atlantic Ocean. 
Perley Dunn Aldrich (November 6, 1863 - November 20, 1933) was a vocal teacher, composer and conductor. 
He was born on November 6, 1863, in Blackstone, Massachusetts. He married Jennie L. Lamson in 1887. He died on November 20, 1933, at age 70. He was buried in Elmwood Cemetery in Adams, New York. 
In April 1970, the Postmaster General (PMG) at the time commissioned the Commonwealth Department of Housing and Construction to carry out a feasibility study in relation to a tower on Black Mountain accommodating both communication services and facilities for visitors. The tower was to replace the microwave relay station on Red Hill and the television broadcast masts already on Black Mountain. 
Design of the tower was the responsibility of the Department of Housing and Construction, however a conflict arose with the National Capital Development Commission which, at the time, had complete control over planning within the Australian Capital Territory. 
Black Mountain Tower was opened on 15 May 1980 by Prime Minister Malcolm Fraser. It was officially named Telecom Tower, and when the telecommunications company was rebranded in 1993, became Telstra Tower. 
Prior to the construction of the tower, CTC-TV (now called Southern Cross 10) had its studios located at the top of Black Mountain until new studios were constructed in Watson in 1974. Also located on the top were two guy-wired masts, one for CTC-TV channel 7 and the other one for the local ABC TV station broadcasting on channel 3. These were demolished in 1980 after the tower had opened. 
The viewing platforms provide 360 degree views of Canberra and the surrounding city and countryside. Visitors to Telstra Tower can see the city unfold from the enclosed viewing gallery or from the two open viewing platforms. The tower is open from 9.00 am to 10.00 pm every day. Besides the telecommunications facilities the tower includes also a souvenir shop, a relaxing coffee lounge. 
Telstra Tower has become one of the most symbolic landmarks in Canberra and a major tourist attraction with a total of over six million visitors. In 1989 the World Federation of Great Towers invited the tower to join such distinguished monuments as the CN Tower in Toronto, Blackpool Tower in England and the Empire State Building in New York City. 
Telstra Tower is one of the most visually imposing structures on the Canberra skyline, visible from many parts of Canberra and Queanbeyan. 
Destroyed and rebuilt in 1934, the Naka-za became the most major theatre in the city, surpassing the Naniwa-za, but was destroyed along with most of the rest of the city in the 1945 Allied bombing of Osaka in World War II. 
The West Indies women's cricket team is a multi-national cricket team that represents the West Indies (Antigua and Barbuda, Barbados, Dominica, Grenada, Guyana, Jamaica, Saint Lucia, Saint Vincent and the Grenadines, Trinidad and Tobago, parts of Saint Kitts and Nevis, Montserrat, British Virgin Islands, Sint Maarten and the US Virgin Islands). 
The list comprises all members of the West Indies women's cricket team who have played at least one Twenty20 international match. 
The Grand Hotel, at 306 W. Coal Ave. in Gallup, New Mexico, was built in 1925.  It was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1988. 
The hotel went out of business around 1980, and it has also operated as "Ricca's Mercantile", a store. 
This article about a property in New Mexico on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This plant is native to the Americas, where its natural range extends from Mexico to Argentina, and includes parts of the Caribbean. It has been widely introduced outside of this range, and it is cultivated in some places. It is naturalized in parts of India. 
The plant grows best on sunny sites with moist, fertile soils, but it is tolerant of a wide range of conditions and can grow in disturbed areas and in bad soils. It does not tolerate salinity or flooded substrates. In Brazil it is most common in coastal areas. 
The pulp of the fruit is said to have a tart, strawberry-like taste. It has also been described as bitter. Different varieties have different tastes, and some are sweet enough to eat as raw fruit. They make good fruit preserves. 
This species has been crossed with its relative, the common guava. The resulting fruits are small, but numerous. 
The wood of the plant is hard and sturdy and can be used as lumber and to make durable objects like tool handles. The bark has tannin and can be used in tanning. 
There are a few medicinal uses for the plant. Extracts of the bark and roots are used to treat diarrhea in Brazil. Extracts of the leaves are used to ease the common cold in Costa Rica. Laboratory studies show that extracts have some activity against methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus, particularly when combined with antibiotics. Flavonoids identified in the plant include quercetin, avicularin, and guaijaverin. 
This article about a location in the Yukon-Koyukuk Census Area, Alaska is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This Passaic County, New Jersey state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
John Reagan (born August 5, 1946) is an American politician who has served in the New Hampshire Senate from the 17th district since 2012. He previously served in the New Hampshire House of Representatives from the Rockingham 1 district from 2006 to 2012. 
Reaganmade vulgar comments to fellow Senator Sharon Carson during an early 2021 Zoom Call. Carson, a fellow Republican from Londonderry, was leading the meeting of the Executive Departments and Administration Committee when she briefly paused the committee's work. Unaware he was unmuted during the remote hearing Wednesday, Reagan called Carson a bitch, after saying, "Nobody else can do anything, right?" 
Group B of the men's football tournament at the 2012 Summer Olympics took place from 26 July to 1 August 2012 in Cardiff's Millennium Stadium, Coventry's City of Coventry Stadium, London's Wembley Stadium and Newcastle's St James' Park. The group contained Senegal, Mexico, South Korea and Switzerland. 
Assistant referees: Bechir Hassani (Tunisia) Sherif Hassan (Egypt) Fourth official: Juan Soto (Venezuela) 
Assistant referees: Matthew Cream (Australia) Hakan Anaz (Australia) Fourth official: Ravshan Irmatov (Uzbekistan) 
Assistant referees: Abdukhamidullo Rasulov (Uzbekistan) Bakhadyr Kochkarov (Kyrgyzstan) Fourth official: Gianluca Rocchi (Italy) 
This is a list of Tajik League winter transfers for the 2012 season, by club. Thirteen clubs participated. Shodmon Ghissar quit the league before the start of the competition.[citation needed] 
In:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Out:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
In:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Out:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
In:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Out:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
In:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Out:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
In:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Out:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
In:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Out:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
In:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Out:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
In:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Out:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
In:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Out:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
In:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Out:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
In:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Out:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
In:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Out:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
In:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Out:  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
The PFF National Challenge Cup is an annual semi-professional knockout football competition in men's domestic Pakistani football within the Pakistan football league system. It is organized by and named after Pakistan Football Federation. Pakistan Army are the current champions of the National Challenge Cup, winning the 2019 National Challenge Cup, thus winning the competition for a third time. 
Since its establishment, the National Challenge Cup has been won by 14 different teams. Teams shown in italics are no longer in existence. 
Lamptey is a native of Jamestown, Accra. He was born in Accra on 3 June 1932 to Maa Kowa and Akwete Aku. He had his secondary education at the Accra Academy from 1948 to 1951 and continued at Achimota College for his Higher School Certificate. He later proceeded to the United Kingdom to pursue further studies at the University of Durham from 1955 to 1958. He had his solicitor's education in Newcastle upon Tyne completing in 1961 and returning to Ghana that same year. 
Born at Presteign in Radnorshire, on 4 May 1822, he was fourth son in a family of ten children of Thomas Phillips and Elizabeth, daughter of James Cross. After receiving some education at a school at Presteign, Phillips was apprenticed to his elder brother James, a tailor, in High Street, Shrewsbury, with whom and another brother, Edward, he went in due course into partnership. In 1859 he joined the Shrewsbury volunteers, and became a colour-sergeant. 
Phillips was elected a fellow of the Linnean Society in 1875, and was fellow of the Society of Antiquaries of London. He became a borough magistrate in 1886, and was presented with the freedom of the borough on 17 August 1903. He died of heart-disease at his residence in Canonbury, Shrewsbury, on 23 October 1905, aged 83, and was buried in the general cemetery in Longden Road, Shrewsbury. 
In 1878 Phillips published a Guide to the Botany of Shrewsbury, and before his death completed for the Victoria County History an account of the botany of the county. In 1887 he published his major work, A Manual of the British Discomycetes, in the International Scientific series (with twelve plates drawn by himself). 
In 1896 Phillips, a Methodist and at one time a local preacher, published Early Methodism in Shropshire. 
Phillips married in 1846 Sarah Ann, daughter of Thomas Hitchins of Shrewsbury, who died in 1895. Two sons and two daughters survived him. 
Phillips was involved in the conversion of the Shrewsbury Free School buildings into Shrewsbury Library (from 1882), and he became its curator of botany. Manuscript volumes by him on antiquarian subjects were preserved there. His botanical manuscripts and drawings, including his correspondence with botanists at home and abroad, were purchased at his death for the botanical department of the British Museum. 
Houck was born in Smyth County, Virginia on September 11, 1950. He attended the local public schools and graduated from Marion Senior High School. He then attended Wytheville Community College, then Concord University and received his bachelor's degree. He also earned a master's degree in Education from the University of Virginia. 
He married Dana Kee Blankenship, and is a member of Christ Episcopal Church. Their son Todd died in 2015. Their daughter Greta died in 2012. 
Houck chose a career in education, rising to become the supervisor of special and vocational education in the Fredericksburg city schools before voters elected him in 1983 to the Virginia State Senate. 
Houck also served on the board of directors of the University of Virginia School of Education Foundation, and the University's Continuing Education Advisory Council, as well as the Virginia High School League Northern Virginia 4-H Educational Center, the Spotsylvania 4-H, V-QUEST, and as chancellor of the Ruritan Club and once president of Pi Kappa Alpha. He was also active in the Izaak Walton League, the Fredericksburg Area Chamber of Commerce and Phi Delta Kappa. 
On November 8, 2011, Republican Bryce Reeves defeated incumbent Democrat Houck by a margin of 226 votes in his attempt, and was re-elected by a larger margin against Democrat Ned Galloway in 2015. 
The following is a list of characters that first appeared in the New Zealand soap opera Shortland Street in 1998, by order of first appearance. 
Mark Shawn was the paramedic who replaced Donna Heka (Stephanie Tauevihi) as Rangi's (Blair Strang) ambulance partner. A few weeks after Mark's arrival, several homes in the area began to get broken into and several elderly women were badly beaten. The evidence pointed to Rangi and he fled. However Donna soon discovered the real culprit was Mark and he was arrested. 
In 2012 Park announced her intention to eventually return to the soap, so as to clear Mackenzie's villainous name. She stated, "what did she ever do that was so bad? So she got rid of Oscar Henry, big deal. Heck, she was doing the world a favour. That guy was one bad egg." 
Oscar Henry was the manipulative and controlling replacement business manager for Jenny Harrison (Maggie Harper). Oscar was portrayed by Christopher Brown and most famous for his rape of Minnie Crozier (Katrina Devine). 
Music of Hawaii is a compilation album containing five 78rpm records of Hawaiian music issued by Decca Records. 
The first album issued by Decca Records, probably in 1938, was Moussorgsky Songs by Vladimir Rosing, on catalogue number A-1.  Another early concept album was Music of Hawaii and eight songs were recorded for this in 1938. Possibly to boost its commercial appeal, two Hawaiian songs by Bing Crosby, which had been recorded two years earlier, were added to the album. 
The 2018 Estonian Football Winter Tournament or the 2018 EJL Jalgpallihalli Turniir is the fifth edition of the annual tournament in Estonia.  This tournament is divided into five groups of 6 teams. 
Michael Faulds (born November 11, 1983) is a former Canadian football quarterback and the current head coach for the Wilfrid Laurier Golden Hawks football team. After serving three years as the offensive coordinator for the York Lions, he was hired as head coach for Wilfrid Laurier on January 8, 2013. 
An unusual aspect of Spetses is that no private automobiles are allowed within the town limits. The most common modes of transport are walking, horse-drawn carriages, bicycles, mopeds, and motorcycles. Only taxis and delivery vehicles are allowed in the downtown area. Ferries and high-speed hydrofoils arrive regularly from the Athenian port of Piraeus. 
After the collapse of the State of Lerna, Spetses suffered a period of decline. Artefacts in the areas of Saint Marina and Saint Anargyroi are characteristic of the existing settlements belonging the late Mycenaean period; the 12th to 13th century BC. At the time of the Peloponnesian War, stone observatories were built at the sites of Prophet Elias and Zogeria. 
Mention of the island of Spetses was made both by Strabo in the 1st century BC and Pausanias in the 2nd century AD, referring to the island as Pitiousa. The raid by the Goths in the Eastern Roman empire caused a wave of refugees to flee to Spetses, resulting in the re-settlement of the island. They were concentrated in the Old Port, which became one of the three largest cities of Argolis (including Argos and Hermione). 
In the 15th century, the Venetians, who had ruled the island since 1220, named it Spezia ("Spice") for its position on a major traderoute that dealt in spices. Over time the name was Hellenised to Spetsai (Spetse/Spetses). 
After the re-occupation of Spetses, the settlement began to expand beyond the Kastelli region. This growth stimulated a corresponding increase in the maritime economic activities of the island. 
Several ships have been named after the island, including modern Hydra class frigate F 453 Spetsai, the World War 2-era Greek destroyer Spetsai (D 98), and the historic Greek battleship Spetsai. 
Package tours to Spetses declined and eventually ceased during the 1990s. In the early 21st century, the island's holiday clientele is of a higher economic class and largely Greek. 
The main Athenian tourist season lasts for only two months of the year, although most hotels and restaurants are open from Easter until October.[citation needed] Efforts are being made by officials to extend the season, by adding major events to attract visitors: 
In September 2013, Dr Marina Lyda Coutarelli, President of the Organizing Committee and CEO of Communication Lab, was named "Honorary Citizen" of Spetses island. She was honored for her work and effort, with regard to the island's development.[citation needed] 
In the early 21st century, there was a distinct shift away from package tourism on Spetses and the island once again became fashionable among  wealthier Greeks.[citation needed] Nowadays, the majority of visitors are Greek or independent travellers from around the world. Whilst it is still possible to find traditional lower cost rooms to rent and tavernas to eat in on the island there are now many higher priced restaurants and 'boutique' hotels around the town. 
According to general descriptions, the battle consisted in distant and ineffectual cannonade between the two fleets. An Algerian brig was damaged by fire, having boarded by mistake a Greek fireship. 
Spetses is one of nine European cities that participates in the European Network of Historical Reconstructions (Brussels, Belgium; Dublin and Cork, Ireland; Bailen, Spain; Slavkov, Czech Republic; Tewkesbury, UK; and Hydra and Spetses in Greece).[citation needed] 
Spetses was the basis for the island of Phraxos in John Fowles' 1965 novel The Magus. Many locations described in the book actually existed, including the "Lord Byron School" (the private Anargyrios & Korgialenios School of Spetses) and the "Villa Bourani" (located on the south side of the island above a popular public beach). Both the school and villa still exist, although the house is under private ownership. Fowles himself taught English at the school between the years 1951 and 1953. 
This biographical article relating to an American ice hockey center is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Comitas kirai is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusc in the family Pseudomelatomidae, the turrids and allies. 
The following table lists the minimum number of hat-tricks scored by players who have scored two or more hat-tricks. 
He was a Member (MP) of the Parliament of England for Great Bedwyn in 1421, for Old Sarum in 1423, for Melcombe Regis in 1427 and for Dorset in 1435. 
This article about a 15th-century Member of the Parliament of England is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
of varieties is a kind of 'large' subvariety of     X   {\displaystyle X}   which is 'crushed' by     f   {\displaystyle f}  , in a certain definite sense. More strictly, f has an associated exceptional locus which describes how it identifies nearby points in codimension one, and the exceptional divisor is an appropriate algebraic construction whose support is the exceptional locus. The same ideas can be found in the theory of holomorphic mappings of complex manifolds. 
where the sum is over all exceptional subvarieties of     f   {\displaystyle f}  , and is an element of the group of Weil divisors on     X   {\displaystyle X}  . 
Consideration of exceptional divisors is crucial in birational geometry: an elementary result (see for instance Shafarevich, II.4.4) shows (under suitable assumptions) that any birational regular map that is not an isomorphism has an exceptional divisor. A particularly important example is the blowup 
This European road or road transport-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Frankfurter Berg is a quarter of Frankfurt am Main, Germany, situated on a hill above the river Nidda. It is becoming one of the richest areas of Frankfurt for living standards. It is part of the Ortsbezirk Nord-Ost. 
Pseudophytoecia is a genus of longhorn beetles of the subfamily Lamiinae, containing the following species: 
Genoa is a city in the north-east corner of DeKalb County, Illinois, United States. It is located on the historic Galena-Chicago stagecoach route. At the 2010 census the city had a population of 5,193, up from 4,169 in 2000. 
Genoa was settled as early as 1835 by Thomas Madison, an American Revolutionary War soldier from Ashtabula County, Ohio. He named Genoa after a town of the same name in New York.  Genoa was incorporated as a village in 1876 and as a city on September 9, 1911. 
There were 1,555 households, out of which 41.0% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 57.6% were married couples living together, 10.5% had a female householder with no husband present, and 28.0% were non-families. 24.3% of all households were made up of individuals, and 9.7% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.68 and the average family size was 3.21. 
In the city the population was spread out, with 30.6% under the age of 18, 8.2% from 18 to 24, 36.0% from 25 to 44, 16.1% from 45 to 64, and 9.1% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 32 years. For every 100 females, there were 97.5 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 95.2 males. 
The median income for a household in the city was $48,125, and the median income for a family was $53,523. Males had a median income of $42,054 versus $28,060 for females. The per capita income for the city was $19,239. About 2.1% of families and 3.3% of the population were below the poverty line, including 3.9% of those under age 18 and 8.6% of those age 65 or over. 
Genoa is governed by a mayor and eight-member City Council. The city is divided into four wards, with two aldermen representing each ward. The mayor and aldermen serve four-year terms. The terms of the City Council are staggered such that one alderman from each ward is elected every two years. 
A City Clerk is also elected at-large and serves a four-year term.  The current city clerk is Kim Winker, whose term began in 2017. 
Girls athletics include basketball, cheer leading, cross country, dance team, golf, soccer, softball, track and field, and volleyball.  Boys athletics include football, baseball, basketball, cross country, golf, soccer, track and field, and wrestling. Genoa-Kingston High School competes in the Big Northern Conference (BNC), while Genoa-Kingston Middle School competes in the Mid-Northern Conference (MNC). 
Some of the town's well known attractions include the annual Genoa Days, Cruisin' to Genoa car show, Volksfest, The Duck Race, The Easter Egg hunt, Genoa Township park district,  Prairie State Winery, Latsis Bakery, Karlsbad Tavern, Minnihan's, Russell Woods Forest Preserve, Knute Olson Jr. Forest Preserve, Kishwaukee River, Kishwaukee Valley Heritage Society, and Pioneer Day. 
The church has been a Grade II listed building since 2009. Historic England consider it a "good example" of a church of its period, which "embodies the late flowering of Arts and Crafts principles with [the] Romanesque style". They praised the "accomplished and distinctive design" and display of "high standard craftsmanship". 
A shrine representing the Lourdes grotto was dedicated in the grounds of the church in 1949. It was erected by Fr. Ketele following his pledge to do so if the church escaped air raid damage during World War II. It also acted as a war memorial and contains a tablet listing the local Catholic men who lost their lives during the conflict. A parish hall was opened behind the church in 1951, which was designed by Mr. G. C. Wilkins and built by Messrs A. E. Whettham and Son. 
Unio auricularius Spengler, 1793 Pseudunio auricularia (Spengler, 1793) Pseudunio auricularius auricularius (Spengler, 1793) Unio sinuata Lamarck, 1819 
Margaritifera auricularia is a species of European freshwater mussel, an aquatic bivalve mollusk in the family Margaritiferidae, the freshwater pearl mussels.  Formerly found throughout western and central Europe, the species is now critically endangered, being confined to a few rivers in Spain and France. M. auricularia is commonly known as Spengler's freshwater mussel in honour of Lorenz Spengler, who first described this species. 
The fish hosts for the glochidium larvae of this species are: Salaria fluviatilis, Gambusia holbrooki, Acipenser baerii, Acipenser naccarii and Acipenser sturio. 
The hosts for this species were unknown for a long time: as recently as 1998 they were still not known. 
Araujo, R., Bragado, D. & Ramos, M. A. 2001. Identification of the river blenny, Salaria fluviatilis, as a host to the glochidia of Margaritifera auricularia. Journal of Molluscan Studies, 67: 128-129. 
Harrison Williams was born in Avon Township, Ohio in 1873 to Everett Williams and Laurett A. Williams. He graduated from Elyria High School in 1890. 
Williams abandoned an unsuccessful bicycle manufacturing business in Lorain in 1903. He went to New York City and took a job with a carpet sweeper company. 
In 1906 he created American Gas & Electric Co., and six years later created another holding company, Central States Electric Corp. 
During World War I he served as an assistant to Bernard Baruch, at the War Industries Board, in Washington D.C., through Baruch he was introduced to attorney John Foster Dulles, who represented Williams throughout his business career. 
When the Prince of Wales (later Edward VIII) visited the United States on various occasions, he was Williams' guest at Glen Cove, Long Island, in the house Williams rented from banker J. P. Morgan Jr., and later at Williams' own estate, Oak Point, located just a few miles east, in Bayville, on Pine Island. 
The couple had several residences: one in Manhattan, one just outside New York City, and one in Florida. They bought the Willard D. Straight House at 94th Street and Fifth Avenue from steel magnate Elbert Gary. They bought "Blythedunes", designed by Maurice Fatio, at 513 North County Blvd., in Palm Beach, Florida. 
In 1927, Williams commissioned muralist Jose Maria Sert to create paintings depicting tightrope walkers and acrobats to decorate the Art Deco lounge of the sports pavilion. Mona Williams later had these removed to her villa, "Il Fortino", on Italy's isle of Capri. 
By 1929, Williams had accumulated a fortune estimated at a $680 million (equivalent of about $10.2 billion in 2020) in public utilities, making him the one of the wealthiest men in the country.[citation needed] He also began a business partnership with Waddill Catchings of Goldman Sachs & Co. 
In 1937 he was investigated regarding investment trusts by the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Also that year he began an affair with Coco Chanel. 
Born in Pointe Coupee Parish, Louisiana, Provosty was educated at the Poydras Academy, and at Georgetown University. 
He was a district attorney from 1873 to 1876, and served in the Louisiana State Senate from 1888 to 1892, and as a member of the Constitutional Convention of 1898. He was a referee in bankruptcy from 1898 to 1901. 
Provosty died in his home in New Orleans on his 72nd birthday. He was survived by a son and four daughters. 
This biography of a state judge in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
John Pendleton Kennedy (May 17, 1871 - February 23, 1944) was the first State Librarian for the Commonwealth of Virginia. He also served as the first President of the Virginia Library Association, which was organized in the first State Library building in Capitol Square on December 6, 1905. 
This article about a person involved with library and information science is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
On July 23, 1777, following months of preparation and some preliminary maneuvers in New Jersey, General Howe and his brother, Admiral Richard Howe, launched a fleet carrying most of the New York-based army south in an effort to capture the American capital, Philadelphia.  The army was to land at the upper end of Chesapeake Bay and march north. 
General Smallwood's column was led by its guide to the front of the Loyalist battalion of Abraham van Buskirk, instead of its rear.  He ordered the attack anyway, and Buskirk's men fled until they were rallied by General Skinner, and the tables were then turned on the Americans.  They beat a hasty retreat, although they had time to destroy camp supplies and equipment, and managed to seize a battle standard. 
The British loss was given by the Loyalist publication Gaine's Mercury of September 1, 1777 as 5 killed, 7 wounded and 84 missing. Sir Henry Clinton wrote that the British took 259 prisoners in the engagement, whereas historian Douglas Southall Freeman gives the number of men captured as 150. Twenty-one of the American prisoners were officers, one of whom was wounded; the ranking officer captured was Lieutenant Colonel Edward Antill. 
Sullivan's remaining forces marched south after the battle, and were able to join Washington's defensive arrangements south of Philadelphia in time to participate in the key Battle of Brandywine on September 11. General Sullivan was later subjected to a court martial over accusations that he mismanaged the expedition in a variety of ways.  A generous court exonerated him of all charges. 
Mercer was born to James H. and Laura Ann Search Mercer on August 4, 1880, in Kerr Township, Champaign County, Illinois, where his father farmed and attended school in nearby Paxton, Illinois. 
Mercer began his career as a printer's apprentice with the St. Louis Republic. He later wrote for the St. Louis Post-Dispatch, before the St. Louis Browns hired him as their road secretary in 1906. The following year, Mercer was hired at the New York Evening Globe. He later wrote for the New York Evening Journal and William Randolph Hearst's American (later known as the New York Journal American). He was a charter member of the Baseball Writers' Association of America (BBWAA). 
Mercer died on June 19, 1945, in New York City. In 1946, Mercer was named to the Honor Rolls of Baseball by the National Baseball Hall of Fame and Museum. In 1969, he was voted the J. G. Taylor Spink Award, the highest award bestowed by the BBWAA. 
Annette M. Cleveland is an American politician of the Democratic Party. She is a member of the Washington State Senate from the 49th legislative district. She was first elected to that office in November 2012 for a term beginning in January 2013. She was elected with nearly 60% of the vote, against Republican Eileen Qutub. 
This article about a politician from the state of Washington is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The H-2B visa nonimmigrant program permits employers to hire foreign workers to come temporarily to the United States and perform temporary nonagricultural services or labor on a one-time, seasonal, peakload or intermittent basis. 
Although capped at 66,000 per year, the H-2B numerical cap was increased in 2017 by then United States Secretary of Homeland Security John Kelly. These visas were made available only to American businesses which attested that they would likely suffer irreparable harm without the ability to employ all the H-2B workers requested in their original petition. 
Below are H-2B visas issued each year as released by the U.S. Department of State - Bureau of Consular Affairs. 
Stephen T. McClellan is a prominent American securities analyst. He was a first vice president at Merrill Lynch for 18 years, and ranked on the Institutional Investor All-American Research Team 19 consecutive years, the Wall Street Journal Poll for seven years, and is in the Journal's Hall of Fame. 
McClellan published his second book, Full of Bull, an insider's guide to Wall Street research and investing, in 2007. He then produced an updated, soft-cover version, subtitled Unscramble Wall Street Doubletalk to Protect and Build Your Portfolio in 2009. 
Michaloliakos was born in Athens in 1957. According to his party, he completed his studies at the Faculty of Mathematics of the National and Kapodistrian University of Athens. 
After he was released, he launched the Golden Dawn magazine. The politics of the magazine were, initially, closely aligned with Nazi beliefs. The publication of the magazine ceased in April 1984, when Michaloliakos joined the National Political Union, and took over the leadership of its youth section, after a personal order of Georgios Papadopoulos. In January 1985, he broke away from the National Political Union and founded the "Popular National Movement - Golden Dawn". 
In April 2015, the trial of Michaloliakos and 68 other defendants began at the high-security Korydallos prison in Athens, but was adjourned a number of times for technical reasons and to find a more suitable setting. Michaloliakos was one of 68 Golden Dawn leaders who were found guilty in October 2020. 
He is the husband of fellow Golden Dawn member Eleni Zaroulia. His daughter Ourania was one of six people arrested during a motorcycle attack against immigrants; all six were later released. 
In a televised interview, Michaloliakos publicly insulted Milwaukee Bucks forward and 2019 and 2020 NBA Most Valuable Player Giannis Antetokounmpo after he was selected as the 15th overall pick in the 2013 NBA draft, calling him a "chimpanzee". He even publicly stated that Antetokounmpo and his family should have been detained and deported immediately after their meeting with then-Prime Minister Antonis Samaras. 
In 1973, Smith joined Ottawa television station CJOH-TV as the station's 6 p.m. sports anchor, a position he held until his death. He also participated in charitable activities, especially the Ottawa Boys and Girls Club. 
Gunman Arenburg was found to be not criminally responsible due to his mental disorder and was sentenced to a mental institution in 1997. He had previously been sentenced to a mental institution but had never reported. An inquest into Smith's killing recommended there should be more public protection and significant changes to the Mental Health Act of Ontario. The end result, Brian's Law, was passed on June 21, 2000 by the Ontario Legislature. 
Sahara Club (Pokhara) have been running a football-based academy for under-privileged children from the profit of the tournament and donations from various individuals and organisations. At present, there are 30 children at the academy 
On the 13th edition of the tournament, English non-league side Aldershot Town FC entered in the tournament, and thus became the first European (UEFA) club to compete in the tournament's history. 
Telling Tales is a 2004 anthology of works celebrating life, edited and organized by Nadine Gordimer as a fundraiser for South Africa's Treatment Action Campaign, which lobbies for government funding for HIV/AIDS prevention and care. 
It includes 21 short stories by award-winning writers, including five Nobel laureates. Authors include: 
She is one of four ships built by Flensburger Schiffbau-Gesellschaft, Germany. Seatruck Power is the second newbuild to be completed. 
Seatruck Power was launched in October 2011 and was christened by Niamh McManus, the wife of Surefreight's Brian McManus. The ship was completed and handed over on 3 February 2012. Seatruck Power entered service on the Liverpool-Dublin route on 14 February 2012. 
Seatruck Power is one of four RoRo 2200 freight ferries, which are the largest ships in the Seatruck fleet. They are the largest ships to operate out of the port of Heysham. 
The RoRo 2200 vessels have a freight capacity of 2,166 lane metres over four decks, carrying 151 trailers. Propulsion is provided by two MAN engines and twin screws. 
Kip attended the Churchill Military Academy at Sing Sing, and was appointed Cadet at the United States Military Academy at West Point in June 1853. 
Following his graduation from West Point, he was commissioned a Second lieutenant, Third Artillery in June 1857 and became part of the expedition under General Wright against the northern Indians.  During this campaign, he reportedly distinguished himself in the Battle of Four Lakes and Spokane Plains and acted as Adjutant of the Artillery Battalion.  In 1859, Kip published an account of the campaign in a book entitled Army Life on the Pacific. 
From June 25 to July 1, 1862 during the Seven Days Battles, he was acting Adjutant General of General Sumner's Corps.  Following the battles, Sumner recommended him for brevet Captain and brevet Major to the War Department for gallantry, however, the Senate failed to act on any recommendations from General George B. McClellan's campaign. 
After the death of General Sumner in March 1863, Kip went to work on the staff of General John E. Wool and was assigned to the Headquarters of the Department of the East, as Assistant Inspector General of the Artillery.  Six months later, he again joined the Army of the Potomac and was assigned to the staff of Brevet Major General Robert O. Tyler, as Inspector of the Artillery Reserve, taking part in the Battle of Rappahanock Station. 
He was later appointed aide-de-camp on the staff of Major General Philip Sheridan where he fought in the Battles of Trevilian Station in 1864, where he was wounded, Cedar Creek, where he was slightly wounded again in 1864.  On June 11, 1864, he was brevetted Captain "for gallant and meritorious service at the battle of Trevillian Station, Va." 
In 1892, Kip and his wife Eva were included in Ward McAllister's "Four Hundred", purported to be an index of New York's best families, published in The New York Times.  Conveniently, 400 was the number of people that could fit into Mrs. Astor's ballroom. 
Kip, who was deeply interested in horse breeding and racing, served as president of the Coney Island Jockey Club, the first turf racecourse in the United States, president of the Suburban Riding and Driving Club, and vice-president of the National Show Horse Association.  He was also a member of the Union Club of the City of New York, the Metropolitan Club, and the Tuxedo Club. 
Moore was owner and CEO of Las Vegas-based entertainment firm, WBMM Enterprises, and co-owner, with Miracles member Billy Griffin, of music publishing company, Grimora Music. Moore and his wife Tina have two grown daughters, Monette and Monique. 
In 2007 Moore reunited on stage with original Miracles Bobby Rogers, Claudette Robinson, and Smokey Robinson to celebrate the group's 50th anniversary. In 2009, the Miracles received a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame. Pete was also inducted with the rest of The Miracles into the Vocal Group Hall of Fame in 2001. 
All California sheephead are born female and morph into their male form at various stages in their lifecycle, determined by environmental conditions and pressures. Because of this, they are considered to be protogynous hermaphrodites which have planktonic larvae. Their coral and kelp-heavy habitat provides protection from predators, which is important as this species is diurnal, foraging during the day and seeking shelter at night. 
The California sheephead is considered vulnerable due to high fishing rates off of the coast of southern California. Since fisheries tend to remove the largest fish, they end up removing the males. This skews the male-to-female ratio and affects the fishes' lifecycle, which can negatively affect populations. 
Semicossyphus is Greek; semi means half and kossyphos means a kind of fish. Pulcher is the Latin word for beautiful. In French, the fish is called the labre Californien, and in Spanish it is called the vieja de California. 
The California sheephead lives in kelp forests and rocky reefs, where it feeds on sea urchins, molluscs, lobsters, and crabs. Fertilized eggs are released into the water column and hatch, resulting in planktonic larva. 
Like many wrasse species, sheephead are protogynous. All are born female, and the largest individuals become male due to hormonal changes triggered by social cues. The two sexes have extremely different appearances, so this transition is among the most dramatic among the wrasses. Because only large individuals are male, setting minimum catch sizes has made populations mostly female, with a negative effect on population sizes. 
The California sheephead is a monandric protogynous hermaphrodite and is a commercially and recreationally valuable labrid. It is a prominent species occupying the southern California rocky reef and kelp bed fish assemblage. Both the ecology and life history patterns of California sheephead have been shown to vary with local environmental conditions. 
Gorgoroth is a Norwegian black metal band based in Bergen. It was formed in 1992 by guitarist Infernus, who is also the only original member remaining, and the band have since released nine studio albums. Gorgoroth are a Satanic band and have drawn controversy due to some of their concerts, which have featured impaled sheep heads and mock crucifixions. The band is named after the dead plateau of darkness in the land of Mordor from J. R. R. Tolkien's fantasy novel The Lord of the Rings. 
After a successful South American tour of Brazil, Chile and Argentina, and a performance at Norway's Inferno Festival, it was announced in April 2004 that drummer Kvitrafn had decided to leave the band. For the band's European and Central American headlining tours of October and November 2004, drummer Dirge Rep (ex-Enslaved, Gehenna) and guitarist Teloch (Nidingr) were recruited. 
After various shows around Europe in the first half of 2005, including the With Full Force Festival in July, Gorgoroth then went out on a month-long European tour with 1349 in November 2005, this time with Skagg (Gaahlskagg) replacing Teloch as live guitarist. On December 10, 2005, Gorgoroth played live in Trondheim, Norway, a gig which was to be their last live performance until summer 2007. 
In July and August 2007, Gorgoroth returned to the live arena with performances at festivals in Norway, Germany and the Czech Republic. In September 2007, the band went on a South American tour of Brazil, Colombia, Argentina, Ecuador and Chile with Belphegor. These would be the last Gorgoroth concerts to feature Gaahl and King. 
In April 2008, Infernus announced he was to depart for Stockholm, Sweden, where the next few months were spent rehearsing the material for Quantos Possunt ad Satanitatem Trahunt in Tomas Asklund's Monolith Studio. 
Infernus also announced in August that a pre-recording for Quantos Possunt ad Satanitatem Trahunt was made with guitars, bass and drums. After having spent the previous few months rehearsing in Monolith Studio, Infernus said that he was working on arrangements with assistance from former Gorgoroth guitarist Tormentor. 
In May 2009, it was announced that Gorgoroth would play live again on August 29, 2009, at the 10th anniversary edition of the Hole in the Sky festival in Bergen, Norway. This would be the band's first live appearance since September 2007. 
In late June 2009, it was announced that the vocals on True Norwegian Black Metal - Live in Grieghallen were rerecorded by Pest. A week later the release dates and track listing for Quantos Possunt ad Satanitatem Trahunt were revealed. 
It was announced in October 2010 that the band was about to put the finishing touches on a re-recording of their 1997 release Under the Sign of Hell. The re-recording, with Pest on vocals and Tomas Asklund on drums, was released as Under the Sign of Hell 2011 in December 2011. 
Please note that I am writing on behalf of Prophecies Publishing (PP) and as their business manager. PP is the official music publishing company of the band Gorgoroth. 
Herewith we request you to remove any lyrics of the band Gorgoroth from your systems immediately, but not later than 18th Feb 2004. 
This is nothing against you and your business or dedication, but you will understand that we as music publisher of the band will have to enforce the copyright as desired by the songwriters. 
Gaahl explained his use of Satanic and anti-Christian themes: "We live in a Christian world and we have to speak their language ... When I use the word 'Satan' it means the natural order, the will of a man, the will to grow, the will to become the superman and not to be oppressed by any law such as the church, which is only a way to control the masses." 
Gaahl and Infernus were openly supportive of the church burnings perpetrated by members of the black metal scene in the early 1990s. Gaahl further said, "there should have been more of them, and there will be more of them". 
Two kilometres to the north is the Hermitage of the Virgen de los Enebrales, the local Patron saint. Built in the 16th century, it was extended in the 18th century. 
The Cartagena Naval Museum is a military museum near the city port of Cartagena, Spain. It presents exhibitions related to naval construction. It is a subsidiary of the Naval Museum of Madrid. 
Isaac Peral: Room dedicated to Isaac Peral, which shows flat documents and personal objects that are part of the National Heritage, as well as model paintings of the submarine and a portrait of Isaac Peral. 
Marine Infantry Room: Contains collected tables that show the actions and battles in which the marine infantry actions throughout Spanish history. There are also photographs of the marines and a section dedicated to their bands, weapons and uniforms. 
Cartography and Navigation Room: Copies of manuscripts of maps, letters and objects such as a rudder of a nineteenth-century war steamer, telegraphs, sextants, navigation publications, a collection of logs, and two ships. 
The Navy Diving Room: Reviews the history of diving in the Navy, and displays various objects on this subject and its evolution. 
19th Century: Shows the agitation that occurred in nineteenth century Cartagena, dealing with political issues, military campaigns to Cuba, and remains of the bombing suffered in Cartagena in 1873. 
Submarine room: Exhibits models of almost all the submarines that participated in the navy, objects such as: batteries, submarine planes, recovery bells, rescue, torpedoes of the Spanish submarine Narciso Monturiol (S-35) . 
History of the submarine weapon: Exhibits objects that show the development of the Spanish submarine fleet: torpedoes, propellers, pictures, crockery, cutlery, periscopes, rudders. 
Armament room: This room displays the armament of the Navy, including weapons, ammunition and ammunition. 
Hall flags and uniforms: Flags are displayed that are linked to the former Maritime Zone of the Mediterranean, as well as uniforms and models of ships 
Naval Health Room: Various objects of the old hospital of nuns: a Sacred Heart, portraits of doctors, heroes of war, ancient documentation, ordinances of the College of Surgery, uniforms of the eighteenth century, models. 
Tere Sheher Mein is an Indian television drama series which aired on Star Plus from 2 March 2015 to 14 November 2015. The show starred Hiba Nawab, Dhruv Bhandari, Anjum Fakih, Gautami Kapoor, Isha Mishra, Sana Amin Sheikh,  Kinshuk Mahajan and S. M. Zaheer. It was produced by Rajan Shahi's Director's Kut Productions. 
Meanwhile, Mantu (Dhruv Bhandari), a tourist guide in Banaras, lives with his younger brother Chiklu (Arsh Khan). Uma (Mrinal Kaur) is Mantu's best friend, but she secretly loves him and aspires to marry him. Rishi's friend Hari (Iqbal Azad) is imprisoned due to Rishi's bankruptcy crisis. Hari's son, Rudra (Aarya Dharamchand Kumar), hates the Mathur's for keeping his father away from his family, and he and his mother start creating problems for them without their knowledge. 
Hiba Nawab and Dhruv Bhandari were initially cast as the main leads of the series. However, after Bhandari quit, recurring cast Rafi Malik became the main lead opposite Nawab. 
Initially Anjum Faikh auditioned for character Amaya, but did not get accepted due to her height and later got cast for Rachita.<ref"Meeting the Tere Sheher Mein girls". Rediff.com.</ref> 
Putri Pascualy is an author and credit strategist. She is the author of Investing in Credit Hedge Funds, a book focused on the topic of alternative investing in corporate credit markets. 
Pascualy is a managing director for PAAMCO, an institutional investment firm focused on hedge funds.  Prior to joining PAAMCO in 2006, Pascualy was an economist with Cornerstone Research.  She speaks at industry panels and conferences, and her comments and contributions have appeared in The Wall Street Journal, Bloomberg News, and U.S. News & World Report. 
Pascualy received undergraduate and MBA degrees from the Haas School of Business at the University of California, Berkeley. 
Chong was born in Vancouver on July 15, 1911. He had little formal education and was employed as a cook and houseboy. 
Chong was visiting Hong Kong when Japan invaded in 1941. He escaped to free China where he joined the British Army Aid Group, a paramilitary unit of MI9. Chong then was a British spy, known as Agent 50, who operated behind Japanese lines in occupied China. After the war Chong returned to Canada and operated a cafe on Vancouver Island. 
Chong travelled back and forth between free and Japanese-occupied areas of China. Chong's main tasks were to smuggle medical supplies into the occupied area, and smuggle people and intelligence out. He dressed as a beggar and always travelled on foot, often walking 30 miles per day. His walking cane hid medicines and documents.  
The people Chong smuggled were British and Commonwealth subjects and stranded Allied aviators. Chong did not recognize two of his charges as the chief justice and prosecutor of Hong Kong, until after the war when he was called as a witness in a trial of a collaborator.  
Chong was captured by the Japanese and escaped twice. One time he escaped from the hold of a fishing boat. The other time he escaped immediately before execution when his compatriot spoke in Japanese and displayed the business card of a Japanese officer. 
The 2010 Atlantic Sun Conference Baseball Tournament was held at Ken Dugan Field at Stephen Lee Marsh Stadium on the campus of Lipscomb University in Nashville, TN from May 25 through 28. Mercer won its fourth tournament championship, and first since 1983, to earn the Atlantic Sun Conference's automatic bid to the 2010 NCAA Division I Baseball Tournament. 
This was the first of two Atlantic Sun Conference Baseball Tournaments to be hosted by Lipscomb University after eight years at Stetson University's in DeLand, FL. It was also the first year of postseason eligibility for three new conference members: Florida Gulf Coast, Kennesaw State, and North Florida, who replaced the departed Florida Atlantic, FIU, and UCF as members by transitioning to Division I. 
Customs and regulations for shopping hours (times that shops are open) vary between countries and between cities. 
Some countries, particularly those with predominantly Christian populations or histories, do not allow Sunday shopping. In Islamic countries some shops are closed on Fridays for noontime prayers. In Israel many shops are closed on Friday evenings and Saturdays during the daytime for Shabbat (the Jewish Sabbath). 
Each state in Australia sets its own standard trading hours, but in most of the country the shops are open seven days a week for at least part of the day. 
For some shops and other businesses in culturally Christian countries, Christmas Day is the only day in the year that they are closed. 
In Israel, many shops are closed on religious holidays other than Shabbat, especially on Yom Kippur when nearly all businesses are closed. 
Melbourne generally has the most relaxed rules. Almost all shopping centres in Melbourne now trade until 9pm on Thursdays and Fridays as well as being open longer hours on Sundays. Interstate late night trading only occurs on either Thursday or Friday rather than both. 
Melbourne is also famous for beginning the trend of 36-hour overnight trades in the lead-up to Christmas. Some of the larger shopping centres will open from 8 am December 23 until 6 pm on Christmas Eve. Centres often open to 10pm or midnight on most other nights in the fortnight before Christmas, and the first few days of the annual Boxing Day Sales. 
Trading hours in the Australian Capital Territory have been deregulated since the repeal of the Trading Hours Act 1996 [ACT] on 29 May 1997. 
In all areas of Queensland, trading hours of major supermarkets are Monday to Saturday from 7am to 9pm and Sundays and public holidays from 9am to 6pm. Most major shopping centres close at 5pm every day, except for "late night shopping" on one night a week. Supermarkets in major shopping centres must still cease trading at 9pm, with special access for just the supermarket. 
Store hours in Canada are regulated by each province or territory and, in some provinces, individual municipalities as well. 
As a general rule, there is little regulation of shopping hours across the country. In the provinces of British Columbia, Alberta, and Saskatchewan, as well as all three territories (Yukon, Northwest Territories and Nunavut), there are no restrictions at all and stores can open 24/7 every day. Nova Scotia permits any store to open every day of the year except Remembrance Day (November 11). 
The province of Quebec is the only province in Canada that regulates shopping hours outside of Sundays and holidays. As a general rule, stores are permitted to open only between 8am and 9pm weekdays and 8am - 5pm weekends, excluding holidays. There are several exceptions, however, notably several supermarkets in Montreal, which are open later hours or 24 hours a day. 
Trading hours in China, including Hong Kong and Macau special administrative regions, are commercial decisions and are not regulated. Most shops are open on public holidays. Some convenience stores are open twenty-four hours and every day of the year, but only a few large supermarkets are open twenty-four hours a day. 
During the Chinese New Year, many shops in China close for a few days, from Chinese New Year's Eve to the first day of the Chinese New Year. Or more often, to the third day of the Chinese New Year. Some shops in Hong Kong and Macau operate on Chinese New Year holidays, especially supermarket chains. 
Shopping hours in Croatia are currently unregulated after the Constitutional Court struck down a ban on Sunday shopping, which had been in effect from mid-2008 until mid-2009. 
Most large out-of-town supermarkets are open between 07:30/08:00-21:00/22:00, Monday to Sunday. Shopping malls usually open at 09:00 and also close at 22:00, every day. Smaller supermarkets close earlier on Sundays, typically at 13:00. Other shops in urban areas are generally closed on Sundays. 
Bakeries and newspaper kiosks often open very early in the morning, at 05:30 or 06:00, and open every day but not twenty-four hours. Gas stations and convenience stores along major roads as well as some pharmacies (at least one in each major city, five in Zagreb) operate twenty-four hours. 
In 1989 shops were allowed to be open on Sundays in sparsely populated areas. In the autumn of 1994 the law was extended to apply to the conurbanations i.e. densely populated areas, but only in December and on six specifically designated Sundays. 
In 1997 it was legislated that the grocery shops could be open on Sundays during the whole summer. At the same time the closing hour was set at later; 21:00. 
On 15 December 2015, the Finnish parliament voted to remove all opening hour restrictions for all retailers. The law came into effect on 1 January 2016. 
Many stores are open every day. Larger supermarkets and hypermarkets are open from 7:00 or 8:00 to 21:00 or 22:00, and smaller shops from 10:00 to 18:00 or 19:00. 
The only stores with regulated hours are the nationally owned Alko alcohol shops, which are open from 9:00 to 21:00 on weekdays and from 9:00 to 18:00 on Saturdays. On Sundays all Alko stores are closed. 
The federal Ladenschlussgesetz still applies in Bavaria and Saarland, which have not passed their own laws. Under this law, shops may not open prior to 6 am and may not stay open later than 8 p.m. from Monday to Saturday. Shops must also stay closed on Sundays and public holidays (both federal and state), and special rules apply concerning Christmas Eve (December 24) should that day fall on a weekday. 
States where shops can open between 6 a.m. and 10 p.m. from Monday to Saturday; regulations for Sunday vary: 
Shops in Ireland may, with few exceptions (such as those involved in the sale of alcohol), open whenever they want, including Sundays and public holidays. 
Many supermarkets are open twenty-four hours or have longer opening hours (like 8:00 - 22:00) everyday. 
Large shopping centres are typically open longer hours everyday (e.g. 09:00 - 21:00/22:00 weekdays, 09:00 - 19:00 Saturdays, 10:00 - 19:00 Sundays). 
In the two weeks running up to Christmas, it is common for many shops to have extended opening hours; some may operate twenty-four hours however the 24 hr openings are extremely uncommon and would be mainly in the large cities. On Christmas Eve most shops have shut their doors by 6pm, some close by 3pm. 
Most shops (other than petrol stations or convenience stores) in smaller towns and villages don't open at all on Sundays. Almost all shops (except certain petrol stations, convenience stores) are closed on Christmas Day, though most are open on all other holidays. 
Convenience stores and some chemists (drugstores) normally open at 09:00 and close between 18:00 and 21:00. New Year's Day is also Sunday hours. 
In rural areas or in traditional trades, Businesses used to take a half day on Wednesdays, however this no lingers happens. 
Alcohol is allowed to be sold only between 10:30 and 22:00 from Monday to Saturday and 12:30 to 22:00 on Sundays, but this does not affect opening hours (supermarkets will often block access to alcoholic products outside of these times). Alcohol can now  be sold on Good Friday as-well as having the pubs open. 
In Japan, most shops open at 10:00, and close at 20:00 (8 pm). Banks are open from 09:00-15:00 on weekdays, and closed on weekends; post offices are open from 09:00-17:00 on weekdays, and closed on weekends. Convenience stores are open round the clock. 
In Mexico City, in large shopping centers, stores are generally open from 11 A.M. to 8 P.M., and on Sundays from 11 A.M. to 8 P.M. Restaurant and cinema hours are different, as are those of independent shops and markets. 
Regular opening hours are Monday 11:00 - 18:00; Tuesday-Friday: 09:30 - 18:00; Saturday: 09:30 - 17:00; Sunday (Amsterdam, Rotterdam, The Hague, Utrecht, Almere, Leiden and smaller tourist towns): 12:00 - 18:00. In many other towns shops are open every first Sunday of the month (koopzondag). 
A regular size supermarket that is open until midnight seven days a week is the Albert Heijn at Schiphol Airport near Amsterdam (in the landside area of the airport, not just for air travelers). 
On public holidays, shops that close on Sundays are usually also closed, and other shops tend to have Sunday opening hours. On Christmas Day and New Year's Eve almost all shops are closed. 
Shopping hours in Serbia are unregulated. Large supermarkets are usually open from 07:00/07:30/08:00 to 22:00 from Monday to Sunday. Shopping malls open at 09:00 or 10:00 and also stay open until 22:00. Smaller supermarkets close earlier on Sundays, at 15:00 or 16:00. 
Unlike neighbouring Croatia, many fast food outlets, bakeries, kiosks and convenience stores in urban areas operate twenty-four hours. Even some hypermarkets, like Tempo and Metro, are open twenty-four hours. 
Shopping hours for shopping malls are usually from 10:00 to 22:00 from Monday to Sunday. Automotive shops like tire outlets are usually from 09.30 to 19:00. Some supermarkets are open twenty-four hours. Most stores do not open on the first day of Chinese New Year because of low demand patronage. 
In Great Britain, many retail stores are open every day. Some large supermarkets are open for twenty-four hours, (except on Sundays in England and Wales). Most stores do not open on Easter Sunday, New Year's Day or Christmas Day and have reduced hours on other public and bank holidays. 
Supermarkets usually open at earlier hours, between 6 or 7 a.m. to 10 p.m. (7:00 - 22:00) every day.  Boutiques and smaller shops often close early at 5 or 6 p.m. (17:00 or 18:00), and usually close once or twice a week, most often on Sunday. 
Nearly all stores are closed on Easter, Thanksgiving Day and Christmas Day. In recent years, however, several department stores and discount stores have started opening during the evening on Thanksgiving Day; see Black Friday for more details. Early closing (half days) occur on Christmas Eve and New Year's Eve. Some stores might have reduced hours on other major holidays. 
All malls and department stores, as well as most other stores remain open longer hours between Thanksgiving weekend and Christmas Eve for Christmas and holiday shopping. Many are open until 11 p.m. (23:00), and a few even longer. 
Few stores remain open twenty-four hours; the main exceptions to this rule are most Walmarts throughout the country (especially Supercenters, which combine a discount store and full supermarket); many convenience stores, especially those that also sell motor fuel; and some drug stores like CVS, especially in larger cities like New York City and Las Vegas. 
Some stores, especially in suburban and rural areas, might remain closed on Sundays for any reason (such as most retail in Bergen County, New Jersey due to the blue law, which is next to New York City, and home to four major malls and has the largest retail in the nation). 
Pinker earned a B.A. degree from McGill University in 1979 and a M.A.Sc. degree from the University of Waterloo in 1981. 
She spent 25 years in clinical practice and teaching psychology, first at Dawson College, then at McGill University. 
Pinker writes about new findings in behavioral science in the Mind and Matter column, which appears Saturdays in the Wall Street Journal. Her Globe and Mail columns,  Problem Solving and the Business Brain, applied the latest evidence from the fields of neuroscience, behavioral economics and social psychology to the world of business. They appeared weekly in The Globe and Mail from 2003 to 2011. 
Her 2008 book, The Sexual Paradox, was awarded the William James Book Award by the American Psychological Association in 2009. Her 2014 book, The Village Effect, was selected as an Apple Nonfiction Best Pick in 2014.[citation needed] 
In 2014, Susan was given the Holden Award by the International Society for Intelligence Research. In 2015 she was a Poynter Fellow in Journalism at Yale University. 
Her writing has also been recognized in awards from the Canadian Medical Association (2000), the Professional Writing Association of Canada (2002, 2010), and she has been nominated for the John Alexander Media Award (2000), the Aventis Pasteur Medal for Excellence in Health Research Journalism (1999), the YWCA Woman of Distinction Award (2007), and the BC National Award for Canadian Non-Fiction (2009). 
Pinker is married and has three children. She lives in Montreal. She is the sister of evolutionary psychologist Steven Pinker. 
Marriott's Grande Vista is a Marriott Vacation Club resort, located off of International Drive in Orlando, Florida. The timeshare resort is the largest within the Marriott Vacation Club portfolio and has 1616 guest studios, one, two and three-bedroom villas, located in 24 mission-style buildings. 
The property is home to 24 buildings, four pool areas, several restaurants and bars, a convenience store dubbed "The Marketplace," a lake, fitness center and a spa built in the summer of 2009. 
The Marriott Vacation Club's Headquarters is located on Westwood Boulevard about one mile away from the property. In 2009, the resort was awarded Green Lodging certification by the Florida Department of Environmental Protection. It has won Southeast/Caribbean Resort of the Year multiple times and was also named Marriott Vacation Club's Resort of the Year in 2003 and 2010.[citation needed] 
Bruce F. Webster reviewed Space and Sport Games in The Space Gamer No. 35. Webster commented that "There are nine games in all on this diskette, all of the same quality. I suspect all nine were placed there because the folks at Creative Computing couldn't justify selling them in smaller groups. I'm not sure they can justify selling them in this large group. Don't buy it." 
Manohar Mouli Biswas is the pseudo-name of Manohar Biswas, a popular and most likely the best known bilingual poet, essayist and writer of Dalit Literature from Bengal. 
Warfare In the flesh alive of my body The worms eat up, bit by bit. Why does the cancer spread in streets of the whole body? Red flag has thirst for blood; A rose of revolt. All my decaying cells Restore the spirit I have To live as rails of protest. 
  A by-election was held for the British House of Commons constituency of Vale of Glamorgan on 4 May 1989 following the death of Conservative MP Sir Raymond Gower. 
The result was a Labour gain, the party's first by-election gain of this parliamentary term, which came at a time when it was starting to match and even overtake the Conservative government in the opinion polls, just after the controversial poll tax was announced. 
Notonomus arthuri is a species of ground beetle in the subfamily Pterostichinae. It was described by Sloane in 1890. 
Sonia Benedito  (born (1978 -01-19)19 January 1978) is a retired Brazilian female volleyball player, who played as a wing spiker.  
She was part of the Brazil women's national volleyball team at the 2002 FIVB Volleyball Women's World Championship in Germany. On club level she played with Fluminense Rio de Janeiro. 
This biographical article relating to volleyball in Brazil is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Williamson-Dickie Mfg. Co. is an apparel manufacturing company primarily known for its largest brand, Dickies. The company was founded in Fort Worth, Texas, in 1922 by C. N. Williamson and E. E. "Colonel" Dickie, who began a denim bib overall company selling workwear to farm and ranch hands around the Southwest. Today, Dickies is a global brand found in more than 100 countries designing, manufacturing and selling workwear to the automotive, hospitality, construction and medical industries. 
C. N. Williamson and E. E. "Colonel" Dickie began their business careers in the "vehicle and harness" business in Bryan, Texas. In 1918, they and a few friends established the U.S. Overall Company. Then, in 1922, C. Don Williamson joined with his father and cousin to buy 100% of the Overall Company on a one-third-each basis and renamed it Williamson-Dickie Manufacturing Company. 
Dickies is currently sold in all 50 U.S. states and throughout the world in countries such as Saudi Arabia, South Africa, Australia, Russia, Chile, South Korea, Japan, Taiwan, Iceland, Canada, Germany, France, Italy, Ireland with COH Sales Ltd, Croatia, the Philippines, Poland and Mexico. 
In 2008 Williamson-Dickies acquired the Canadian Kodiak Group Holdings Inc. In 2013 Dickies acquired Walls. 
Williamson-Dickie Europe Ltd is based in the UK in Westfield, Somerset. Previously known as Dickies UK, this division of the company now operates across the entirety of Europe and the Middle East for both the workwear and streetwear product ranges. 
The Dodge Intrepid is a full sized front-wheel drive four-door sedan that was produced by Dodge for model years 1993 to 2004. It is related to the Chrysler 300M, Chrysler Concorde, Chrysler LHS, Chrysler New Yorker, and Eagle Vision which were all built on Chrysler's new "cab forward" LH platform. 
The Intrepid was sold in Canada as the Chrysler Intrepid.  In the United States, it replaced the Dodge Monaco as Dodge's largest car.  With Dodge's introduction to Mexico during that time, it was badged as a Dodge, replacing the Dynasty which had been sold there under the Chrysler brand. 
The first generation of LH cars debuted at the 1992 North American International Auto Show in Detroit as three 1993 models: the Chrysler Concorde, Dodge Intrepid (badged as a Chrysler in Canada), and the Eagle Vision (also badged as a Chrysler in Europe). 
The Intrepid's launch marked a new image for the Dodge brand, which began to market itself as "The New Dodge" with a marketing campaign featuring actor Edward Herrmann, who would go on to serve as the brand's spokesperson for the rest of the decade. 
Intrepids were built at American Motors' Brampton Assembly facility, originally established to manufacture the Eagle Premier, in Brampton, Ontario, Canada; and at the Chrysler plant at Newark, Delaware. 
In the late 1990s, Chrysler used the Intrepid as a research platform for a hybrid electric vehicle in a diesel-electric configuration. Three variations were built, the Intrepid ESX, ESX II, and ESX III. The first vehicle was built in a series hybrid configuration, while the next two were considered mild hybrids. These were attempted in the time frame of 1997 to 1998. 
The Intrepid and Concorde were on Car and Driver magazine's Ten Best list for 1993 and 1994. The second-generation Intrepid again made the list for 1998 and 1999. Both generations won Consumer Guide's "Best Buy" award. 
In chemistry, the oxygen reduction reaction refers to the reduction half reaction whereby O2 is reduced to water or hydrogen peroxide.  In fuel cells, the reduction to water is preferred because the current is higher. The oxygen reduction reaction is well demonstrated and highly efficient in nature. 
In fuel cells, platinum is the most common catalyst. Because platinum is expensive, it is dispersed on a carbon support.  Certain facets of platinum are more active than others. 
The Migil Five (sometimes styled The Migil 5) were a British pop, rhythm and blues and (originally) jazz group in the early to mid-1960s, whose biggest hit was a bluebeat version of "Mockin' Bird Hill". 
"The Migil Five were an improbable outfit on the early-'60s London rock music scene. Five guys who were already in their late '20s and skilled in jazz, R&B, blues, folk, and pop, Lambert was balding and sported a beard and the others looked more like veterans of the '50s trad jazz scene. Watson brought a harder R&B sound that made them more appealing to teenagers, but they all looked more like music teachers than rock & rollers."
Mike Felix later worked as a comedian, after dinner speaker and actor, appearing in the TV series Widows and The Bill.  Lucas moved into pub management and continued to play in local London bands until his death in the 1990s.  Watson and Blanche also moved into the pub and restaurant business. 
Samay  is a 1975 Indian Odia film directed by Ganesh Mahapatra. The movie stars Shriram Panda, Prashanta Nanda, Tripura Misra, Dhir Biswal and George Tiadi in the leading roles. For the first time in the history of Odia film, some parts of this film are in colour. 
A newly-wed Odia couple's life is disrupted when the husband is overcome with amnesia. The wife gets sympathy from a doctor friend, but the relationship is misunderstood and ridiculed by others, including the doctor's Bombay-born wife who gets involved with another good-for-nothing Bombayite. 
Fernando Madeira (born 12 May 1932) is a Portuguese former freestyle swimmer. He competed in two events and the water polo tournament at the 1952 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article related to a Portuguese swimmer is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to a Portuguese water polo figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Conda is a town and municipality in Cuanza Sul Province in Angola. The municipality had a population of 89,479 in 2014. 
Duregi is located 15 km southwest of Madzhalis (the district's administrative centre) by road. Shilyagi and Kulidzha are the nearest rural localities. 
Radio 5RPH (1197 kHz) is a volunteer manned AM band community radio station in Adelaide, South Australia Australia for the blind. 
Radio 5RPH is a member of the Radio Print Handicapped Network. Its stated mission is to "provide a quality reading and information service to those within its broadcast area who are unable (for whatever reason) to access daily printed material". 
Newspapers, magazines, books, and other printed material are read to air.  The station also hosts a morning sports show weekday mornings and broadcasts matches from the South Australian National Football League. 
Pinheirodontidae is a poorly known family of fossil mammals which belong to the informal suborder "Plagiaulacida" within the order Multituberculata. Remains are known from the Late Jurassic to earliest Cretaceous of Europe, (predominantly Portugal and Spain), but are so far restricted to teeth. 
The family Pinheirodontidae was named by Hahn G. and Hahn R. in 1999, after the locality of Porto Dinheiro, in central west Portugal. 
Mingus Moves (Atlantic SD 1653) is one of the late works of jazz bassist, composer, and bandleader Charles Mingus. He hired three new musicians for the recording: Don Pullen, piano; Ronald Hampton, trumpet; and George Adams, tenor saxophone. Drummer Dannie Richmond, a stalwart of Mingus's bands in the 1950s and '60s, rejoined the band on the first day of recording after not working with the bassist for several years. 
The other tunes include "Moves," a composition written and sung (along with Honi Gordon) by Doug Hammond, Richmond's predecessor; "Wee," composed and arranged by Sy Johnson, who also worked with Mingus on Let My Children Hear Music (1971) and Mingus and Friends in Concert (1972); "Flowers," written by Adams; and "Newcomer" by Pullen, dedicated to his newborn daughter. 
The CD released in 1993 contains the bonus tracks "Big Alice" and "The Call," which were recorded during the same sessions. 
Born in Gujranwala, now in Pakistan as Susheel Kumar Chadha on 29 May 1942. He settled in Moradabad, Uttar Pradesh after independence and later shifted to Mumbai. He completed his B.Sc. and later an MA in Hindi. 
He shifted to Mumbai in 1977, where he lived for the rest of his years. He also wrote lyrics for Hindi satirical film Nasbandi directed by I. S. Johar, released after the Emergency in 1978. He also acted as a comedian in films Bandhan Baahon Ka (1988) and Santosh (1989). 
Moradabadi has written Itni uchi mat chodo, kya karegi chandni, Ye ander ki bat hai, Triveni, Tathakathit bhagwano ke naam (awarded), Hullad ka Hullad,:Hazam ki hazamat and Aacha hai per kabhi kabhi. 
He had several records produced by H.M.V and T-Series and he has been to Hong Kong, Bangkok, Canada, Australia, London, Manchester and America for various Kavi Sammelans. 
He died aged 72 on 12 July 2014 in Mumbai after suffering diabetes and a thyroid problem. He left behind a wife, a son-Navneet Chaddha and two daughters. 
USS Ara (AK-136) was a  Crater-class cargo ship commissioned by the US Navy for service in World War II. Ara is named after the constellation Ara. She was responsible for delivering troops, goods and equipment to locations in the Asiatic-Pacific Theater. 
Ara was laid down on 17 July 1941, under a Maritime Commission (MARCOM) contract, MC hull No. 69, as the Liberty ship SS Daniel Boone, by California Shipbuilding Corporation, Terminal Island, Los Angeles, California; launched on 14 January 1942; sponsored by Mrs. J. K. Doolan; acquired by the Navy under a bare-boat charter on 3 December 1943; renamed Ara (AK-136); and commissioned on 4 January 1944, Lieutenant Commander William B. Hudgins in command. 
On 23 July, Ara was ordered to proceed to Guam to deliver US Army personnel to that island. She remained offshore until 3 August, and then disembarked troops and unloaded equipment. Ara got underway for Eniwetok on 20 August, and arrived four days later. After a reprovisioning period, the transport sailed for Hawaii and moored at Pearl Harbor on 9 September. 
The transport left the west coast on 6 October, bound, via the Panama Canal, for Norfolk, Virginia, and arrived there on 27 October. 
She was decommissioned on 26 November, and turned over to the War Shipping Administration (WSA) in whose custody she resumed the name Daniel Boone. The name, Ara, was struck from the Navy List on 5 December. Ara was placed in the MARCOM National Defense Reserve Fleet, and was laid up in the James River, Lee Hall, Virginia. 
On 26 October 1971, she was sold to Hierros Ardes, S.A., of Bilbao, Spain, for $71,520, to be scrapped. She was removed from the fleet 6 January 1972. 
Ara won one battle star for her World War II service. Her crew was eligible for the following medals and campaign ribbons: 
A list of films produced in the Cinema of Portugal ordered by year of release in the 1990s. For an alphabetical list of Portuguese films see Category:Portuguese films 
The CHR/Hot AC format continued until November 1991, when WJRZ moved to a classic hits format, but went back to CHR by the middle of 1992. In December 1998, WJRZ dropped Hot AC in favor of country as "Jersey Shore Country." The country format had a mixed reaction from area listeners and failed to attract a significant number of listeners. 
In June 2000, they switched to oldies and rebranded as "Oldies 100," and in 2002 ownership changed to Greater Media. 
WJRZ-FM started broadcasting using HD Radio in November 2007. WJRZ-FM's HD2 subchannel was to be "Classic Oldies," however a launch date had not been established at that time. 
WJRZ-FM re-branded as "100.1 WJRZ - The Greatest Hits Of the '60s & '70s" in early 2008, simply using "Jersey's Greatest Hits" and dropping all pre-Beatles music except for Sunday nights. The station dropped one of its signature programs- Jukebox Saturday Night with Joe Stephens in June 2009. 
In 2010, Jeff Rafter was relieved of his duties at WJRZ-FM. He remains OM/PD at WMGQ. Glenn Kalina overtook the OM/PD role and became host of the station's new local morning show. 
On January 6, 2015, longtime Program Director/Afternoon host Glenn Kalina announced his resignation of the positions and retirement from full-time radio. Assistant Program Director Matt Knight was elevated to Program Director/Afternoons while TJ Bryan fills the Assistant Program Director/Mornings role. Glenn continued to host "The Beatles: From Us To You" on Sunday mornings with Beatles authority Richie V. 
On July 19, 2016, Beasley Media Group announced it would acquire Greater Media and its 21 stations (including WJRZ) for $240 million. The FCC approved the sale on October 6, and the sale closed on November 1. 
Clean and Sober is a 1988 American drama film directed by Glenn Gordon Caron and starring Michael Keaton as a real estate agent struggling with a substance abuse problem. This film served as Keaton's first dramatic departure from comedies. The supporting cast includes Kathy Baker, M. Emmet Walsh, Morgan Freeman, Luca Bercovici and Tate Donovan. 
Ron Howard, who previously directed Keaton in the comedies Night Shift (1982) and Gung Ho (1986), served as co-producer. 
The film received generally favorable reviews at the time. The film critic Roger Ebert praised the "superb supporting performances" and noted, "Although the subject matter of this film is commonplace in our society...the actual process of surrender and recovery is hardly ever the subject of films, maybe because it seems too depressing." Variety wondered if the film was "perhaps too grim."  The film currently holds a 57% "rotten" rating on Rotten Tomatoes and 6.7/10 at IMDb 
Michael Keaton won the 1988 National Society of Film Critics Award for Best Actor for his performances in both Clean and Sober and Beetlejuice. 
Pony Express is an American western television series about the adventures of an agent in the 1860s of the Central Overland Express Company, better known as the Pony Express. The half-hour program starring Grant Sullivan was created by California National Productions. Pony Express ran for thirty-five episodes in syndication from the fall of 1959 until May 1960. 
The series featured two recurring roles: Grant Sullivan as Brett Clark, a roving investigator for the company, and Don Dorrell as Donovan, a young Pony Express rider. The majority of the weekly episodes involved Clark and Donovan solving various Pony Express mysteries. 
The Pony Express pilot, the first Western television pilot shot in colour, was shot in February 1957 with James Best in the lead. This version did not sell (although Best was included in a TV Guide photo feature on upcoming TV westerns in June of that year) but was later aired, slightly re-edited, as an episode of the syndicated series. 
This article about a television show originating in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
As part of his research Mirel used board of education proceedings, papers written by persons involved in the educational politics, and Detroit-area major newspapers. 
The book's primary content involved politics related to school financing, including expenditures and taxation, with less emphasis going to changes in curriculum. Mirel argued that the social classes and races need to come together and cooperate so that the Detroit school system can be properly funded and maintain its academic standards; the author makes this view known in the epilogue. The second edition has a new epilogue that covers the late 1980s and the 1990s. 
Arthur Zilversmit of Lake Forest College wrote that how Mirel relates national trends in desegregation relate to the local issues are a "real strength" of the book. 
Jon C. Teaford of Purdue University wrote that the book's author "allocates blame and praise with a fairly even hand and appears unwilling to bend his data to conform to a preconceived end." Teaford stated that the lack of jargon and how it was "clearly written" were beneficial for the book. 
For creating this book, Mirel won the 1994-95 "Outstanding Book Award" from Stanford University and the American Educational Research Association, and he also won the 1994 "Critics' Choice Award" from the American Educational Studies Association. 
Daniel Perlstein of the University of California at Berkeley wrote that the book "thus demonstrates how historical scholarship on the decline of urban school systems can illuminate the relationship of critical educational issues to the broader political questions troubling America." 
Harvey Kantor of the University of Utah argued that Mirel was correct in saying that divisions and race in class contributed to the downfall of the schools, but that Kantor argued that the necessity to restructure the education system to accommodate black stakeholders was the true underlying reason, and not due to any declining standards of education. 
Teaford concluded that the book is "a superb account of the Detroit schools, and his study is a model for other scholars." Teaford argued that Mirel should have covered the period after 1981 (he had reviewed the first edition), included opinions and viewpoints from students, and included more "critical scrutiny" on school administrators and teachers. 
Q. Cathy Towtongie is a Canadian Inuk politician from Rankin Inlet, Nunavut. She was elected to the Legislative Assembly of Nunavut in the 2017 general election to represent the electoral district of Rankin Inlet North-Chesterfield Inlet. 
Prior to her election to the legislature, Towtongie served two terms as president of Nunavut Tunngavik from 2001 to 2004 and from 2010 to 2016. In this role, she faced criticism when she publicly objected to Iqaluit City Council's decision to raise a rainbow flag during the 2014 Winter Olympics in protest against the Russian gay propaganda law. 
Al Rafaah is the name of a settlement in Umm Al Quwain, United Arab Emirates (UAE). It is a popular beach for camping and leisure activities. 
Han Fei's primary goal in telling the story was to caution courtiers against getting too close to fickle rulers, but in later Chinese literature Mizi Xia became more alluded to for his beauty and his homosexuality.  The phrase "bitten peach" became a byword for homosexuality and Mizi Xia became a byword for a young man desired as a sexual partner.  Similar allusions would be later be applied to the "passion of the cut sleeve" and the Han dynasty courtier Dong Xian. 
By the 12th century, male companions no longer tended to wield great power at the ducal or imperial courts, and the name Mizi Xia had become associated with common male prostitutes.  The narrowing of gender roles under the Qing dynasty and the influence of homophobic attitudes from the West would eventually make mention of "the bitten peach" completely taboo, so that today Mizi Xia is mostly unknown inside China. 
Mizi Xia's story became known to the broader world through the writings of Europeans such as in Sexual Life in Ancient China by Robert van Gulik.  This book quotes from the early-20th century Xiangyan congshu or "Collected writings on fragrant elegance", which itself drew on earlier precedents such as those mentioned above. 
Unsinn was coach of the German national team on three occasions, 1964, 1975 to 1977 and, again, from 1981 to 1990, coaching the team in 221 internationals. 
He is a member of the IIHF Hall of Fame and has also been awarded the Order of Merit of the Federal Republic of Germany. 
Paulo Freire Social Justice Charter School is a public charter high school in Chicopee, Massachusetts.  Its main focus is the social and emotional well-being of its students. 
Yu began her career as a saleswoman in a department store. She took part in the repertory theatre, and once featured in The Taming of the Shrew.  
In 1950, Yu became an actress in Hong Kong films. Yu appeared in The Elderly Gentleman Searches for Romance, a 1950 Comedy film directed by Wong Hok-Sing. Yu's recent film is All's Well Ends Well 2020, a 2020 Comedy film directed by Raymond Wong Pak-Ming. Yu is credited with over 145 films. 
In 2004, Yu donated 80,000 yuan for building an elementary school in Guizhou Province, China and the school is entitled Yu Mu Lian Hope School. On 22 June 2006, she acted as the ambassador of the charitable activity called 'Cascc famine eight hours'. 
 With the adoption of the 1995 constitution & the establishment of ethnic federalism system in Ethiopia, parts of the expanded Wollo province, which were mostly inhabited by Afar people were given to the new Afar Region. The new Amhara Region absorbed the remainder of the province in the Ethiopian Highlands and kept the name Wollo for its two new zones (South Wollo Zone & North Wollo Zone). Wollo is known to be the origin of the four melodic-modes (kignits) of Ethiopia.[citation needed] 
The Second Ganzouri Cabinet was led by Egyptian prime minister Kamal Ganzouri from 7 December 2011 to 26 June 2012. 28 ministers were sworn into Ganzouri's cabinet. The Cabinet headquarters in Cairo were the site of protests in mid-December 2011. 
Arctostaphylos tomentosa is a species of manzanita known by the common name woollyleaf manzanita or woolley  manzanita. This shrub is endemic to California. 
It is a resident of chaparral canyons, foothills, and lower-elevation mountains. One specialized habitat in which A. tomentosa is found is the Monterey Cypress forests at Point Lobos and Del Monte Forest in Monterey County, California. 
This is a low-lying, spreading manzanita, generally quite a bit wider than it is tall. It is a variable species and even some of the subspecies can vary in appearance across individuals. The stems may be red or gray or both, with smooth, rough, or shreddy bark, hairless to quite bristly. The leaves may be oval to lance-shaped and sometimes toothed, but the upper surface is generally darker and shinier than the lower. 
The flowers are white to pink and may be hairy or hairless inside. The fruits are fuzzy reddish drupes under a centimeter in diameter. 
Newsbooks were the 17th-century precursors to today's newspapers. Originating in England and Scotland, they are distinct from the earlier news periodicals, known as corantos, which were sourced from Europe.  
The first newsbook was published in November 1641, and in the years 1641-2 there were 171 different editions available. The newsbooks were strongly partisan until Parliament regained control of the press in September 1649.  
In social psychology, the pratfall effect is the tendency for interpersonal appeal to change after an individual makes a mistake, depending on the individual's perceived competence. In particular, highly competent individuals tend to become more likable after committing mistakes, while average seeming individuals tend to become less likable even if they commit the same mistake. 
Originally described in 1966 by Elliot Aronson, numerous studies have since been conducted to isolate the effects of gender, self-esteem, and blunder severity on change in appeal and likability. Occasionally referred to as the blemishing effect when used as a form of marketing, generalizations of the pratfall effect are often used to explain the counterintuitive benefits drawn from making mistakes. 
Effects of pratfall are most directly applicable to males. Women tend to prefer the non-blunderer regardless of gender, and although findings of pratfall cannot be readily generalized to female populations, neither population preferred the mediocre blunderer. 
Research by Mettee and Wilkins reveals that severity of pratfall plays a major role on determining attractiveness after a pratfall is committed. Experimentally, each condition was conveyed by changing the response of the interviewer and blunderer:  
An alternative explanation is that the pratfall effect is due to increased attention to the target individuals, which in turn results in better realization of their appropriateness and/or inappropriateness given the evaluation criteria. 
Notably attributed to Kennedy in the aftermath of the Bay of the Pigs Invasion and to Apple's unsuccessful endeavors in  mapping/navigation services. 
Jan Soukup began his karate training in Shotokan at the age of eleven before moving to Kagoshima, Japan in April 2001 to study Kyokushin in an uchi-deshi program. After training for four years and attaining the rank of second dan black belt, which he earned by completing a twenty-man kumite among other tests, he returned to the Czech Republic and opened his own Kyokushin dojo in August 2005. 
Making the transition to professional kickboxing, Jan Soukup debuted in his native Czech Republic in 2008 with a first round knockout of Tonda Ungerman. Following this, he was recruited by K-1 and returned to Japan to train under Jayson Vemoa at the Ichigeki Academy where his sparring partners included Glaube Feitosa, Takumi Sato and former foe Ewerton Teixeira. 
In his first K-1 match, Soukup faced reigning K-1 Heavyweight Champion Keijiro Maeda in non-title bout at the K-1 World Grand Prix 2009 in Tokyo Final 16 Qualifying GP in Tokyo, Japan on August 11, 2009. He was dropped with a short right hand towards the end of round two before being knocked out with a right hook in three. 
McArthur Lake, formerly Clowey Lake, is a lake in the Northwest Territories, Canada. It is on the  Taltson River to the east of Great Slave Lake, and is just south of the tree line. In the past it may have been a center for canoe building. 
A 2014 analysis of mercury in twenty specimens of lake trout found that 75% were over the commercial guideline and 100% over the frequent consumption guideline.  Analysis of four specimens of lake whitefish found that all were within the guidelines. 
Gleat (stylized as GLEAT) is a Japanese professional wrestling promotion, founded in 2020 by former Pro Wrestling Noah (NOAH) parent company Lidet Entertainment after the acquisition of NOAH and DDT Pro-Wrestling by CyberAgent. The promotion is overseen by Hiroyuki Suzuki and former mixed martial artist and professional wrestler Kiyoshi Tamura. The promotion emphasizes the use of the UWFi combat sports-based wrestling style. 
The list of cast members who have appeared as recurring cast members in Stanley Kubrick films has been relatively short. Some of the actors who have appeared in more than one film are listed in the table included in this section. The individual films may be consulted for the precise casting details in specific films. 
Other observers of this similarity include Internet film critic Tim Dirks who has also noted that Sellers's smooth German-like accent and the chair-bound pose in this scene are similar to that of Dr. Strangelove. Finally, Barbara Wyllie, writing in Julian Connelly's anthology The Cambridge Companion to Nabokov, speaks of "Quilty's visit to the house in Beardsley, masquerading as Dr. Zempf, a German psychologist (a Sellers character that prefigures Dr. Strangelove in Kubrick's film of 1964)." 
Miguel Santisteban (born 22 February 1960) is a Mexican swimmer. He competed in two events at the 1980 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article related to a Mexican swimmer is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Keg Purnell (January 7, 1915 - June 25, 1965) was an American swing jazz drummer. His influences include Chick Webb and Big Sid Catlett. 
The Russian development of the city by necessity involved the uprooting of the location's original Chinese inhabitants. In the summer of 1899, this sparked an angry riot in which Chinese attacked the railway office with stones, dragging away the Chinese clerks and interpreters working for the Russians. Nevertheless, the city's development also brought opportunities, and during the years of Russian tenureship tens of thousands of Chinese migrated into the area. 
In terms of the railroad, construction linking Dalniy with Harbin was begun apace and by January 1903 the rail link between the two cities was complete. In February 1903 the first express train arrived in Dalniy from Harbin and by that August Dalniy was successfully linked by rail to the Russian homeland. 
In WWII Dalian was occupied by Japan. After WWII, with the unconditional surrender of Japan in September 1945, the city passed to the Soviets, following the Soviet invasion of Manchuria. Described in 1949 as "New China's model metropolis" by the Communist Party of China, the former colonial city was occupied by the Soviet military from 1945 to 1950. Soviet-inspired policies were enacted in the city and contributed to ideas of socialist urbanization. 
Zing finger protein 644 (ZNF644) also known as zinc finger motif enhancer-binding protein 2 (Zep-2) is a protein that in humans is encoded by the ZNF644 gene. 
The 2013 ACC Women's Championship was an international women's cricket tournament held in Chiang Mai Province, Thailand, from 23 to 31 January 2013. It was organised by the Asian Cricket Council (ACC). 
The top five runscorers are included in this table, ranked by runs scored and then by batting average. 
The top five wicket takers are listed in this table, ranked by wickets taken and then by bowling average. 
CBFX-FM (100.7 MHz) is a public non-commercial radio station in Montreal, Quebec. It is the flagship station of the Ici Musique Network and broadcasts in French. 
In 1998, CBF-FM changed its call sign. Its AM sister station, CBF, moved to the FM band and picked up the CBF-FM call letters. That required the former CBF-FM to switch to a new call sign, CBFX-FM. 
In 2004, the network was renamed Espace Musique. And in 2014, it became Ici Musique, still with 100.7 CBFX-FM as its originating station. 
Though CBFX-4 and CBFX-5 are technically rebroadcasters of CBFX, on-air idents show they actually rebroadcast Ottawa's CBOX-FM. 
Lunghua Civil Assembly Centre was one of the internment camps eventually established by the Empire of Japan in Shanghai for European and American citizens, who had been resident under Japanese occupation since December 1941. Many had formerly lived in Shanghai within the Shanghai International Settlement before its occupation by the imperial Japanese army. 
J. G. Ballard was interned in the camp as an adolescent. His experiences there inspired the book (and subsequent movie) Empire of the Sun. 
"The camp was large, containing seven concrete buildings, five large wooden barracks (originally built as stables by the Japanese), and numerous outbuildings. There were fifty nine dorms and 127 rooms for families."
The recreation ground contained a football pitch and was in the area of ground between the Assembly Hall and Building D. 
There were persistent issues with water supply and drainage.  The presence of malaria and typhoid were also a threat to public health. 
Children interned in the camp attended classes at a school on the site which was called Lunhgwa Academy. The adults had jobs and a self-elected council. There were also various social activities such as parties and lectures. 
Buildings A, B and C are no longer there, one of the Staff Residences has been demolished and one of the kitchens no longer exists. The ruined building adjacent to the Assembly Hall appears to have been rebuilt the same shape and there are several new buildings built on the site of the other ruined building. There are several new buildings between Building G and the Staff Residences. In addition, there is a road now between Building H and the rest of the site. 
These descriptions were written by Richard Grimes from maps and documents produced by his grandfather Bertram John William Grimes who was interned in the camp from 17 March 1943 and was released on 20 October 1945. Richard's grandmother, Ethel Mary Grimes, and his father, Norman William Grimes, were also interned at Lunghua on 17 March 1943 and were released on 31 August 1945. 
The statue depicts Wouters' wife and muse, Nel Deurinckx, in a dynamic and ecstatic dancing pose. Wouters very often painted, drew and sculpted his wife in charming, everyday settings, while she was sleeping, reading, or doing domestic chores. The Mad Maiden is exceptional because it shows her in such an unusually carefree way. With this sensual sculpture, Wouters clearly distanced himself from the emotionlessness of academic art of his time. 
Wouters became inspired for this sculpture when he and Nel visited a 1907 performance by the American modern dance pioneer Isadora Duncan in the Muntschouwburg in Brussels. 
Several copies of the sculpture were made, also after the artist's early death in 1916. Casts of the sculpture are part of the following art collections: 
Minister of Finance (Estonian: Rahandusminister) is the senior minister at the Ministry of Finance (Rahandusministeerium) in the Estonian Government. The Minister is one of the most important members of the Estonian government, with responsibility for coordinating the government's policies on national finances. The position was originally established in 1918. 
The Minister of Finance is chosen by the Prime Minister as a part of the government. The current Finance Minister is Keit Pentus-Rosimannus. 
During the 1980s, Lloyd undertook work on several film productions, doing scene painting for Chariots of Fire, Flash Gordon, Breaking Glass and The Mirror Crack'd. In the 1990s, she published two books, including one on the art of making garlands and wreaths. Lloyd had several solo exhibitions at the Barbican Centre in London and had a solo exhibition at the Austin/Desmond Gallery in London in 1990 and examples of her paintings are held by the Nuffield Foundation and the Gulbenkian Trust. 
In 1952, Lloyd married Jeff Hoare, a fellow artist who she had met while they were both students at the Chelsea School of Art. Together they had four children, the youngest of whom also became an artist. Father and daughter had a joint exhibition in 1999. 
Before the Australian cricket team was scheduled to tour India and play a series of Test matches, one-day internationals and Twenty20 matches, it was doubtful if the Australian cricket team would tour India after the terror attacks in Delhi and the press briefing given by India's National Security Advisor M. K. Narayan that raised issues of security concern in the minds of Australia's cricketers. 
Australia batted first and centuries from Ricky Ponting and Michael Hussey makes them put a score of 430 Indian pacer Zaheer Khan took five wickets. India reply with 360 with half centuries from Zaheer Khan and Harbhajan Singh . Australia declared their second innings at 228/6 setting up India a target of 299 in the final day of play and India batsmen played carefully to end the match to draw.     
India batted for almost two days to set themselves up in a dominant position. However the Australians were able to bat for another two days and save the test. The Indians declared late on the final day to give the retiring Anil Kumble a few final overs. 
The flowers are located on the end of branches that have no leaves. These flowers have a bright pink to lilac color that is tinged with white. A pale yellow spot is usually at the flower's base. 
G. sepium is native to tropical dry forests in Mexico and Central America. In addition to its native range it is cultivated in many tropical and subtropical regions, including the Caribbean, northern parts of South America, central Africa, parts of India,parts of Sri Lanka, parts of Myanmar and Southeast Asia. 
The tree grows well in acidic soils with a pH of 4.5-6.2. The tree is found on volcanic soils in its native range in Central America and Mexico. However, it can also grow on sandy, clay, and limestone soils. 
G. sepium was spread from its native range throughout the tropics to shade plantation crops such as coffee. Today it is used for many other purposes including live fencing, fodder, firewood, green manure, intercropping, and  rat poison. Its use expanded following the widespread defoliation of Leucaena by psyllid in the 1980s.  In the charsutri method of paddy cultivation, leaves of glyricidia are incorporated in soil during ploughing. 
G. sepium is used as cut and carry forage for cattle, sheep, and goats. Its high protein content allows it to complement low-quality tropical forages. G. sepium can tolerate repeated cutting, every 2 to 4 months depending on the climate. Cutting G. sepium causes it to retain its leaves during the dry season when many forage crops have lost their leaves. In some cases it is the only source of feed during the dry season. 
G. sepium trees are used for intercropping in part because they fix nitrogen in the soil and tolerate low soil fertility, so when they are interplanted with crops they can boost crop yields significantly, without the need of chemical fertilizers. 
G. Sepium tolerates being cut back to crop height, and can even be coppiced, year after year. When the trees are cut back, they enter a temporary dormant state during which their root systems do not compete for nutrients needed by the crops, so the crops can establish themselves. 
G. sepium is a fast-growing ruderal species that takes advantage of slash and burn practices in its native range. Because it is easily propagated and grows quickly, it is also planted to prevent topsoil erosion in the initial stages of reforesting denuded areas, and as an intermediate step to be taken before introducing species that take longer to grow. 
The common name madre de cacao (literally "mother of cacao" in Spanish) used in Central America and the Philippines is in reference to its traditional use as shade trees for cocoa tree plantations. 
G. sepium is widely used in the form of poles for live fencing in Cuba and India. This is one of the best plants used for traditional live fencing to protect agriculture and fruit bearing plantations from animals such as goats, cow, and buffalo. As a Caribbean native, G. sepium has traditionally been used for live fencing in Cuba.  
As in India, during the recent past one could see many living fences around mango and cashew orchards and agricultural properties in Goa, Maharashtra and Karnataka, erected with G. sepium and tied with bamboo rafters. 
G. sepium is also used for its insect repellent properties. Farmers in Latin America often wash their livestock with a paste made of crushed G. sepium leaves to ward off torsalos (botflies). In the Philippines, the extract obtained from its leaves is made into anti-mange dog shampoo. 
G. sepium seems to be toxic to non-ruminants. The generic name Gliricidia means "mouse killer" in reference to the traditional use of its toxic seeds and bark as rodenticides. 
Some palatability challenges have been reported; animals seem to refuse the leaves on the basis of smell, but this depends on management and geography. 
Another limitation is frost intolerance and the lack of adaptation to a cool season: it is a tropical plant. 
In terms of cultivation, it requires the presence of pollinators, and it needs a dry season to germinate. 
Further, it has invasive potential: its swift propagation has caused it to be considered a weed in Jamaica. 
Until now G. sepium has remained free of serious diseases; only a number of insect problems are reported in exotic environments, but there are issues with defoliation under humid conditions. 
In Indonesian Gliricidia sepium is known as gamal, which is an acronym for Ganjang Malaysia (Down with Malaysia.)  
A notable addition to the Pilgrims' squad was former England international Paul Gascoigne, who joined the club on a short-term basis, as a player-coach. Assigned his famous number 19 shirt for the forthcoming season, Gascoigne was presented in front of the media against his former club Newcastle, a game which he started. Gascoigne went on to make 10 appearances for Boston before leaving in October. 
It was a season of mixed results, with the team only winning 14 of a possible 46 league games. This saw Boston finish in a comfortable 16th position, but this was disappointing to the fans, considering what many had predicted in August. 
Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
 Punginipatti  is a village in the Annavasal revenue block of Pudukkottai district, Tamil Nadu, India. 
As per the 2011 census, Punginipatti had a total population of 1912 with 925 males and 987 females. It has an average literacy rate of 64.86%. 
This article related to a location in Pudukkottai district, Tamil Nadu, India is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article related to members of the fly subfamily Tachininae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
By The Hand of the Father is an original theatrical work that combines spoken word, music, and video to dramatize the unique 20th century journey of the Mexican-American father. 
The productions original music by singer/songwriter Alejandro Escovedo, is interwoven with stories written by Theresa Chavez, Oscar Garza, Eric Gutierrez and Rose Portillo; and video by Janice Tanaka. It is directed by Theresa Chavez, Artistic Director of About Productions; and produced by About Productions, a Los Angeles-based theater company; and Paula Batson Productions, an independent production company focusing on music projects. 
Escovedo returned to the production in 2006 for performances at University of Texas, Brownsville (April, 2006), and University of Texas, Austin (April, 2006). 
In 2002, the CD of songs and stories from the original theaterwork was released and included guest artists Pete Escovedo, Rosie Flores, Ruben Ramos and Cesar Rosas (of Los Lobos). 
The remarkable characters were beautifully performed by Rose Portillo and Kevin Sifuentes on the tour and album as well.  By the Hand of the Father (album) 
Stephen O'Shaughnessy (born 13 October 1967) is a Welsh former professional footballer who is manager of Airbus UK Broughton. As a player, he made more than 200 appearances in the Football League. 
O'Shaughnessy or "Shaughssa" as he is affectionately known was born in Wrexham and started his career as an apprentice at Leeds United, before moving onto Bradford City, where he made one league appearance. 
In 1988, O'Shaughnessy was signed by former Leeds United midfielder and manager Eddie Gray for Rochdale. In three seasons at Spotland, O'Shaughnessy enjoyed arguably the most successful spell in his career scoring 16 goals in 109 League appearances and reaching the 5th Round of the 1990 FA Cup . During this time, O'Shaughnessy earned the nickname the "Master Blaster" for his skill at taking long distance free-kicks. 
After this, Steve went to a roundabout of clubs, including Stalybridge Celtic and Buler Rangers in Hong Kong, before returning to play in the League of Wales. 
In 153 League of Wales appearances, O'Shaughnessy played for Inter Cardiff, Barry Town, Holywell Town, Rhyl, Caernarfon Town, T.N.S. Llansantfraid, Bangor City, Oswestry Town and NEWI Cefn Druids. 
On 27 September 2006, O'Shaughnessy was named as the new manager of Caernarfon Town.[citation needed] 
In June 2008, O'Shaughnessy left Caernarfon Town and joined Connah's Quay Nomads as manager, but left the club after one season in charge. 
Tsai obtained her bachelor's degree in biology from National Taiwan Normal University, master's degree in natural resource management from Ohio State University in the United States and doctoral degree in geography from National Taiwan University. 
Ari-Pekka Heikkinen (born 8 April 1957) is a Finnish footballer who competed in the men's tournament at the 1980 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to Finnish football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ducks and Drakes is a 1921 American silent comedy film produced and released by Realart Pictures, an offshoot of Paramount Pictures. It was directed by stage producer/director Maurice Campbell and stars Bebe Daniels (also a producer on this film) and Jack Holt. Elmer Harris provided the story and screenplay. A copy is held at the Library of Congress. 
This article about a silent comedy film from the 1920s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Rafael Soto (born 14 October 1957) is a Spanish equestrian and Olympic medalist. He was born in Jerez de la Frontera. He won a silver medal in dressage at the 2004 Summer Olympics in Athens. 
This biographical article related to Spanish equestrianism is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
After five seasons in the National League (formerly Conference Premier), Woking acrimoniously parted company with Garry Hill after six-and-a-half years at the helm. 
Woking play their home games at Kingfield Stadium (currently The Laithwaite Community Stadium for sponsorship reasons), Kingfield Road, Woking, GU22 9AA. 
For many years Woking's main rivals have been Stevenage and Aldershot Town, where games attract larger than average crowds. Stevenage are Woking's historic rivals due to animosity in the 1990s, while the rivalry with Aldershot is a more recent rivalry due to locality. Torquay United have also become minor rivals due to intense games and competition in the past couple of years despite their distance from one another. 
Aldershot Town and Woking have met competitively on 30 occasions. Aldershot Town have won 17 times, Woking 7 times and there has been 6 drawn matches. 
Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
1. Players that have gone onto play in the football league or any foreign equivalent to this level (i.e. fully professional league). 2. Players with full international caps. 3. Players that hold a club record 
A design competition or design contest is a competition in which an entity solicits design proposals from the public for a specified purpose. 
An architectural design competition solicits architects to submit design proposals for a building, bridge, or other structure. Such competitions may be open, receiving bids internationally, domestically, or regionally. The competition may occur in a single stage, or involve two stages, the first of which eliminates non-viable candidates. 
Famous early examples of design competitions were for the Acropolis of Athens in 448 BCE, and the dome of the Florence Cathedral in 1418. 
Coin and stamp design contests solicit designs to appear on the face of stamps and usually the obverse of coins. In 1998, the Royal Canadian Mint held the Millennium Coin Design Contest, a competition for the design of 24 quarters, one for each month of 1999 and 2000. 
The design of artistic objects and monuments is a common subject in design competitions. A well-known example is the Vietnam Veterans Memorial in Washington D.C. designed by Maya Lin. 
Urban and landscape projects may solicit design proposals in a competition. Among them are projects for urban parks, streetscapes, and rehabilitation of natural areas. 
Specific rules are included in the EU's Directive on Public Contracts for the conduct of a design contest organised as part of a procedure leading to the award of a public contract or a design contest with prizes or payments to participants. 
A student design competition is a student competition to introduce students to real-world engineering practices and design. 
His hometown was Khanh Tien commune, Yen Khanh district, Ninh Binh province. He was ordained at the age of 5. 
This article about a member of the Buddhist clergy is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Paul Manners (born 27 September 1953) is a British singer, musician, composer and producer best known for being the vocalist of the Italian pop band I Cugini di Campagna from 1978 to 1985. He is the founder and leader of Grammar School, a rock band based in Italy since 1986 and has produced many international stars including, Tina Arena, Sylvie Vartan and Kelly Joyce. 
Brown was born in Kingston, Jamaica, to Janette Smellie (who was listed as a free woman of colour on his baptism) and Major Gustav Heinrich Gottlieb Braun (Brown), a German-born officer in the King's Royal Rifle Corps. 
Brown was commissioned into the 24th Regiment of Foot. Having served as a brigadier-general at Aldershot, he was promoted to major-general and made commander of British Troops in China and Hong Kong in 1863. During his term in command he put down a disturbance at Taitsan; allegations were made at the time about cruelty by British troops but were subsequently dismissed as groundless. 
This biographical article related to the British Army is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The first two modern instruments were built by Besson on the suggestion of American Bandmaster John Philip Sousa, who toured using one in his band from 1896-1898. One of this pair, the only known playable instrument of its kind, is owned by the Harvard University Band and is still played periodically in concerts. 
Reveille is a historic mansion in Pulaski, Tennessee. It was built in 1868 for Benjamin Franklin Carter, a veteran of the Confederate States Army. It was designed in the Italianate architectural style. It has been listed on the National Register of Historic Places since October 28, 1994. 
This article about a property in Giles County, Tennessee on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ezmo was a free, online music player launched on 8 June 2007 which allowed users to stream and share their personal music collections. Ezmo was in its beta phase when it was discontinued on 14 March 2008 due to a lack of funding. The service used technology from Fast Search & Transfer and Adobe Flex. Ezmo was a fully owned subsidiary of Fast Search & Transfer. 
Users could upload music from iTunes or Windows Media Player to their Ezmo accounts, and share their songs with up to ten friends. 
A crop (sometimes also called a croup or a craw, ingluvies, or sublingual pouch) is a thin-walled expanded portion of the alimentary tract used for the storage of food prior to digestion. This anatomical structure is found in a wide variety of animals. It has been found in birds, and in invertebrate animals including gastropods (snails and slugs), earthworms, leeches, and insects. 
Cropping is used by bees to temporarily store nectar of flowers. When bees "suck" nectar, it is stored in their crops. Other Hymenoptera also use crops to store liquid food. The crop in eusocial insects, such as ants, has specialized to be distensible, and this specialization enables important communication between colonial insects through trophallaxis.  The crop can be found in the foregut of insects.  
In a bird's digestive system, the crop is an expanded, muscular pouch near the gullet or throat.  It is a part of the digestive tract, essentially an enlarged part of the esophagus.  As with most other organisms that have a crop, it is used to temporarily store food.  Not all bird species have one.  In adult doves and pigeons, it can produce crop milk to feed newly hatched birds. 
Scavenging birds, such as vultures, will gorge themselves when prey is abundant, causing their crop to bulge. They subsequently sit, sleepy or half torpid, to digest their food. 
Most raptors, including hawks, eagles and vultures (as stated above), have a crop; however, owls do not. Similarly, all true quail (Old World quail and New World quail) have a crop, but buttonquail do not. Chickens, turkeys, ducks[citation needed] and geese possess a crop, as do parrots. 
In the Sherlock Holmes story "The Adventure of the Blue Carbuncle" (1892), author Arthur Conan Doyle hid a valuable gem inside a goose's crop.   
"Craw" is an obsolete term for "crop", and this is still seen in the saying "it sticks in my craw" meaning "I can't [metaphorically] swallow it", that is, that a situation or other entity is unacceptable, or at any rate annoying. 
In its human form it is said to appear as a handsome man, and can be recognised as a mythological creature only by the water weeds or profuse sand and mud in its hair. Because of this, people in the Highlands were often wary of lone animals and strangers by the water's edge, near where the each-uisge was reputed to live. 
Along with its human victims, cattle and sheep were also often prey to the each-uisge, and it could be lured out of the water by the smell of roasted meat.  One story from John McKay's More West Highland Tales runs thus: 
The aughisky or Irish water horse is similar in many respects to the Scottish version. It sometimes comes out of the water to gallop on land and, despite the danger, if the aughisky can be caught and tamed then it will make the finest of steeds provided it is not allowed to glimpse the ocean. 
The cabyll-ushtey (or cabbyl-ushtey), the Manx water horse, is just as ravenous as the each-uisge though there are not as many tales told about it. One of them recounts how a cabbyl-ushtey emerged from the Awin Dhoo (Black River) and devoured a farmer's cow, then later it took his teenaged daughter. 
The appearance of the each-uisge on the Isle of Skye was described by Gordon in 1995 as having a parrot-like beak, and this, with its habit of diving suddenly, could be from real-life encounters with a sea turtle such as the leatherback sea turtle. 
Beilschmiedia insignis is a species of plant in the family Lauraceae. It is a tree endemic to Peninsular Malaysia. 
The diocese encompasses a Diocesan Serbian Sisters Association which was founded on February 2, 1985, in Mississauga. 
The British Thomson-Houston Company War Memorial is a First World War memorial in Rugby, Warwickshire, in the West Midlands of England. It was erected by the British Thomson-Houston Company in memory of the firm's employees who left to fight in the First World War and were killed in service. Designed by Sir Edwin Lutyens, it was unveiled in 1921 and is now a grade II* listed building. 
British Thomson-Houston was an engineering firm based in Rugby, majority owned by General Electric. During the First World War, the Rugby factory produced components for the Royal Navy, including signalling and radio equipment. The memorial is dedicated to the 243 company employees who were killed fighting in the First World War and was later rededicated to include 175 employees killed in the Second World War. 
The British Thomson-Houston memorial was one of six war memorials designed by Lutyens for a private company, the others being the large Midland Railway and North Eastern Railway memorials in Derby and York respectively, and smaller indoor memorials for Imperial Tobacco, the London Assurance Company, and Lloyd's of London. 
When unveiled, the memorial sat at the former entrance to the British Thomson-Houston factory on Mill Road. The site was redeveloped in 2010 and the memorial was relocated to a site around 400 metres (1,300 feet) away on Technology Drive, formerly occupied by the firm's electrical engineering works. 
Tashkooh which also named Atashkooh (in Persian means Fire Mount), is known for its permanent flames. This mount is always firing, because of the sulfur vapors rising from the porous layer of mountain surface and firing affected by the sublimation and nebulization. 
Protesting and riots took place on 21 and 22 May 2019 in Jakarta, the capital of Indonesia, mainly around the Tanah Abang district of Central Jakarta and in West Jakarta. The unrest followed former general Prabowo Subianto's refusal to accept defeat in the 2019 Indonesian presidential election to incumbent President Joko Widodo, also known as Jokowi. 
Prabowo's campaign team had called for protests after preliminary results showed Jokowi's victory. The protests commenced on the day of the official announcement of the election result on 21 May. Tense protests around the election agencies' buildings were followed by rioting on the night of 21 May in several areas. Eight people were reported killed by security officers through extrajudicial killings, while hundreds other were injured. 
Amnesty International released a report which condemning the brutal treatments on protesters as "grave human rights violations." 
Prabowo's supporters and campaign team planned for a demonstration at the KPU office on the expected announcement date of 22 May 2019, calling for the disqualification of Jokowi, and stated they intended the protests to be peaceful. Prabowo insisted he would not accept the election result, and his campaign team requested KPU to stop tallying votes. Opposition figure Fadli Zon indicated that Prabowo would not challenge the results at the Constitutional Court, citing Prabowo's loss in 2014. 
The U.S. and Singaporean embassies in Jakarta issued security notices warning their citizens to avoid the protests. Ahead of the protests, Polri put Jakarta at Siaga 1, the highest security alert, for the period between 21 and 25 May. 
Early on 22 May, a group of unidentified individuals burned down cars parked in front of a Brimob dormitory in KS Tubun road of Petamburan, Tanah Abang. There were no casualties from the event. Police officers deployed water cannons and tear gas to disperse the mob, which was at the location. The group was then reported to have dispersed into nearby residential areas. The streets leading to the location were then closed off by police. 
Authorities announced on 22 May that the sending of images and videos via social media applications, such as WhatsApp, would be restricted temporarily to prevent the spread of hoaxes and provocative content. 
Riots continued in the night, with one fire truck being hijacked by a mob and its crew coerced to spray the anti-riot police. A rioting mob in Slipi, Palmerah was encountered by Indonesian Marine Corps troops, who negotiated with the group. The following day, Prabowo called on his supporters to "go home, rest and put their trust in the law", stating his intent to contest the election results. 
The Tanah Abang textile market, the largest such market in Southeast Asia, was temporarily closed due to access towards the location being blocked by the riots. The exchange rate for the Indonesian Rupiah dropped due to political concerns. TransJakarta suspended 14 of its routes passing through the Tanah Abang area due to the unconducive situation. In Surabaya, mayor Tri Rismaharini instructed that pupils be given a day off school on 22 May partly due to safety concerns from parents. 
Roadhouse was born in Sheffield, but lived in Moss Side, Manchester from an early age. He taught himself how to play the saxophone. Originally an aircraft fitter with Metropolitan-Vickers at Trafford Park, he began to play with local dance groups during his spare evenings. He got his first big break when he became a member of the Teddy Foster orchestra in 1948. He later went on to join the BBC Northern Variety Orchestra in 1953. 
He opened up his music store, Johnny Roadhouse Music in 1955 on Oxford Road in the Chorlton-on-Medlock area of Manchester. His store became a cornerstone for Manchester music and was used by several famous musicians and groups including Paul McCartney, Oasis and The Smiths. In his retirement he passed the running of the store over to his son, John Roadhouse. 
He was presented with a Lifetime Achievement award by the Lord Mayor of Manchester in 2005. He died on 11 April 2009. 
The Panama Canal Authority is established under Title XIV of the National Constitution, and has exclusive responsibility for the operation, administration, management, preservation, maintenance, and modernization of the canal. It is responsible for the operation of the canal in a safe, continuous, efficient, and profitable manner. 
The Organic Law of the Panama Canal Authority, passed on June 11, 1997, provides the legal framework for the canal's organization and operation. 
Because of its unique nature, the ACP has financial autonomy, as well as ownership of the canal's assets. 
The Board of Directors is responsible for establishing policies for the operation, improvement, and modernization of the Canal, as well as supervising its management pursuant to the National Constitution, the Panama Canal Authority Organic Law, and the Regulations thereto appertaining. 
The Directors shall serve in their posts for a term of 9 years, and may only be removed for the reasons set forth in Article 20 of the Panama Canal Authority Organic Law. 
The Panama Canal is defined by law to be an inalienable patrimony of the Republic of Panama. Therefore, it may  not be sold, assigned, mortgaged, or otherwise encumbered or transferred. 
The Panama Canal Authority Board of Directors is responsible for establishing policies for the operation, improvement, and modernization of the Canal, as well as supervising its management. 
According to the medieval Georgian chronicles, the Donauris originated in the district of Gardabani and grew up to virtual independence as the princes of Kakheti with the title of k'orepiskoposi (a title adapted from the Greek chorepiscopus, normally a rural bishop). The two princes of the Donauri family were: Samuel (r. 839-861) and Gabriel (r. 861-881). 
This article about a member of the Georgian nobility is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to a college football coach first appointed in the 1920s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Milton Cuyler, Jr. (born October 7, 1968) is a former major league outfielder drafted by the Detroit Tigers in the second round of the 1986 amateur draft. He finished third behind Juan Guzman and winner Chuck Knoblauch for the 1991 American League Rookie of the Year award. 
This biographical article relating to an American baseball outfielder born in the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
KSCW-LP is a low-power radio station ("103.1 on your FM dial") located in Sun City West, Arizona. KSCW's license is owned by Recreation Centers of Sun City West, Inc., and the station is run entirely by a volunteer staff (through the Sun City West Broadcast Club) and is funded primarily through fundraisers. KSCW features a wide variety of programming. 
Nina Wedell is a professor of evolutionary biology at the University of Exeter in the United Kingdom. She is known for her research on female multiple mating, polyandry.  
Wedell has a B.Sc. (1984), an M.Sc (1986), a Ph.D. (1993), and D.Sc (1997) from Stockholm University. Following her Ph.D, she was a postdoc at the University of Liverpool from 1993 until 1996. Subsequently she held research positions at Stockholm University and the University of Leeds, before taking a position at the University of Exeter in 2004. She was promoted to professor in 2009. Since 2018, she has also been the Associate Dean for Research. 
She was awarded the Australian Laureate Fellowship as recongition for her work in evolutionary biology. She received the Royal Society Wolfson Award in 2011. The European Molecular Biology Organization elected her as a life-long member in 2014. 
Merici Academy was an all-girls school in Havana, Cuba, run by North American Ursuline nuns.  The school was in existence from 1941 to 1961, when it was closed as a result of the Cuban Revolution. 
Merici Academy was an elementary and secondary school.  Teaching at the academy was conducted in English, with the exception of classes in Language, History and Geography of Cuba, and Civics, which were required by law to be conducted in Spanish. Merici Academy was accredited by the U.S. Southern Association of Colleges and Secondary Schools. 
When the United States broke diplomatic relations with Cuba in January 1961, the American nuns returned to the United States.  Merici Academy remained open until May 1961, when it was confiscated by the Cuban government.  Many Merici Academy students were sent to New Orleans and other cities in the United States to finish their education. 
In 1966, the Merici Academy Alumnae Association, sometimes also referred to as Merici Academy Alumnae in Exile, was founded in Miami, FL. 
Lowell Murray, PC (born 26 September 1936) is a former Canadian senator and long-time activist with the federal Progressive Conservative Party. 
Murray graduated from St. Francis Xavier University in 1955. He met 16-year-old Brian Mulroney there; the two became close friends and associates in the PC Party.  He later earned an MPA from Queen's University. 
In 1961, he became an assistant to federal justice minister Davie Fulton. Later, he served as chief of staff to Progressive Conservative leader Robert Stanfield and then was New Brunswick premier Richard Hatfield's senior advisor. 
In 2003, Murray joined with Clark to oppose the merger of the Progressive Conservative Party with the Canadian Alliance to form the Conservative Party of Canada. When the new party was created, he refused to join the new Conservative caucus, and, until his retirement remained one of two senators (the other being Elaine McCoy) to sit as "Progressive Conservatives" even though the federal Progressive Conservative Party had been formally dissolved. 
Murray was the last senator appointed on the advice of Prime Minister Clark to sit in the Senate. He was the longest-serving member of the body upon his mandatory retirement from the Senate on 26 September 2011, when he attained the age of 75. 
Ma Janine Hansen (born 5 July 1989), known as Janine Hansen, is a Luxembourger former footballer who played as a forward. She has been a member of the Luxembourg women's national team. 
This biographical article related to women's association football in Luxembourg is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Stephen Duprey is a prominent figure in New Hampshire Republican politics and a Republican National Committee member from Concord, New Hampshire. He and his wife Susan Duprey have participated in 30 campaigns since 1970. At age 19, he became the country's youngest state representative. Duprey served as chair of the New Hampshire Republican Party for four terms. In January 2020, he resigned after being defeated by Hillsborough County Republican Chair and conservative activist Chris Ager. 
Duprey is a graduate of Cornell Law School. His wife Susan Duprey is a graduate of Northeastern University School of Law. They have three children. 
Washington Van Duzen patented the first marine railway in Philadelphia, in 1834.  It was subsequently built by J. & W. Van Dusen & Co., at Kensington, Philadelphia in 1834-35. 
Mathew Van Dusen was mentor to Domingo Marcucci who later became an important early shipbuilder in San Francisco. 
The series launched on Channel 4 on 28 May 2004 and ended on 6 August 2004. It lasted 71 days - the longest series of Big Brother at the time and the eighth longest series to date. Davina McCall returned as presenter for her fifth consecutive year. Twelve housemates entered on launch night, with one additional housemate being introduced in the fifth week. 
The series was watched by an average of 5.1 million viewers, the second highest viewed series of the show to date (after Big Brother 3). 
For the first time ever, housemates were selected via open auditions rather than via home video. The open audition process would go on to feature in each subsequent series until the thirteenth series in 2012. 
The series followed the same format as previous series of the programme. Twelve housemates lived in isolation from the outside world in a custom built house for a period of 71 days, hoping to be the last one to leave the house as the winner, and walk away with a large cash prize. 
The series premiered on 28 May 2004, on Channel 4. The contestants were recorded 24 hours a day with cameras fixed around the house, and had to wear portable microphones. Big Brother 5 was the third of the main series to feature a live launch. The launch night saw Davina give a house tour, as well as discuss rumors that had been going on about the series. She then introduced the new Housemates, and they entered the house live. 
Spin-off programme Big Brother's Little Brother returned for a fourth year and second year on Channel 4, and was hosted once again by Dermot O'Leary. Live coverage continued to be a major part of E4's daily and nightly schedule. 
The Saturday Night Live spin-off series, first introduced in Big Brother 3, saw Housemates competing in live tasks. It would last until midway through this, when it was axed due to poor ratings. 
On Day 20 in the House, a series of altercations began in the House, which eventually escalated and became physical. The incident was subsequently referred to as "Fight Night" by the press, by fans of the show, and, in a live episode the night after the incident was shown, by presenter Davina McCall. 
On Day 15, Emma and Michelle were sent to a secret room in the House named "the Bedsit" as part of a fake eviction. They were given access to live streaming from the House, were able to observe housemates' conversations and play pranks on them. Under the impression that they had been evicted, some of the remaining housemates spoke poorly of Emma and Michelle. 
On 16 June, which was Day 20 in the House, Emma and Michelle were returned to the House from the Bedsit. Upon their return, the housemates were provided with fancy dress costumes, party food and alcohol. 
In the early hours of 17 June, some of the housemates engaged in a playful food fight, leaving the communal living area in a mess. When Jason insisted that they tidy up their mess, Marco refused, prompting an argument between the pair. Nadia and Emma intervened in defence of Marco, with Nadia flipping over a table and, at one point, she slapped Jason. 
The arguments led to Shell becoming very emotional, and she hid in the bathroom where she was comforted by Vanessa. Nadia entered the bathroom with the intent of apologising for upsetting Shell, but ended up having an argument with Vanessa. 
At the beginning of the altercations, Big Brother placed security guards into the camera runs surrounding the House. Approximately twenty minutes after the altercations began, Big Brother sent the guards into the House via the bedroom. Housemates were then separated and monitored throughout the night by guards stationed within the House. 
The events of the night led Jason to decide to walk from the game, though he was later talked out of it.[citation needed] Emma was placed back in the Bedsit, in an attempt to separate her from the rest of the housemates. Housemates Jason, Marco, Nadia, Vanessa, and Victor were all given formal warnings by Big Brother as a result of their behaviour during the incident. 
Professor David Wilson, a criminologist working as a consultant on the series, decided to leave Big Brother. 
On 19 June, two days after the incident, Hertfordshire Constabulary released a joint statement with Channel 4 and Endemol, noting that they were "happy with the steps that Channel 4 and Endemol have taken since [the incident] to guarantee the safety of the housemates". 
On the same day as Ofcom's adjudication was published, Channel 4 responded, stating: "The producers at the Elstree studio were very confident that the situation in the house was under their control [...] they decided that the events in the house should be relayed to viewers until the shouting had abated to reassure viewers that the outcome was not as bad as they might otherwise have imagined. Ofcom took a different view and we must accept their decision." 
The fight was later spoofed on the MTV series TRL, during which Emma, Marco, Vanessa, and Victor were present. 
This figure of speech is mostly used in connection with expressions derived from equality, such as uniqueness or count. For example, x is unique up to R means that all objects x under consideration are in the same equivalence class with respect to the relation R. 
Equivalence relations are often used to disregard possible differences of objects, so "up to R" can be understood informally as "ignoring the same subtleties as R does". In the factorization example, "up to ordering" means "ignoring the particular ordering". 
Further examples include "up to isomorphism", "up to permutations", and "up to rotations", which are described in the Examples section. 
In informal contexts, mathematicians often use the word modulo (or simply "mod") for similar purposes, as in "modulo isomorphism". 
The regular n-gon, for given n, is unique up to similarity. In other words, if all similar n-gons are considered instances of the same n-gon, then there is only one regular n-gon. 
In computer science, the term up-to techniques is a precisely defined notion that refers to certain proof techniques for (weak) bisimulation, and to relate processes that only behave similarly up to unobservable steps. 
The Khor Virap State Sanctuary is a wetland and protected area that was established within the administrative borders of Pokr Vedi village of the Ararat Province of Armenia, on the left bank of the Khor Virap Church of the Arax River and on 50.28 hectares of moist land of the right-hand side of Artashat, formerly the capital of Armenia. 
The main purpose of the organization of the Sanctuary is to ensure the preservation, normal development, reproduction and sustainable use of the ecosystem of wetlands of international significance, flora and fauna, especially for waterfowl and their habitats, rare plant species and their habitats. The specially protected objects of the Sanctuary area are the unique wildlife and water-swamp flora of the ecosystem of the Arax wetlands. 
The Khor Virap water-swamp ecosystem is distinguished by the rare species of flora and fauna, which are endangered to disappearance. In this area and its surroundings, there are such rare species as Falcaria falcarioides, Inula aucheriana, Sonchus araraticus, from the Chenopodiaceae species - Alhagi pseudoalhagi, Amberboa iljiniana, Tamarix octandra and so on. 
The Khor Virap water-swamp area is of great importance as a habitat for a number of watering and waterfowl birds and as a resting place during the seasonal flight of birds.  In particular, marbled duck (Marmaronetta angustirostris) and white-headed duck (Oxyura leucocephala)  live here among the world-endangered birds, while the Dalmatian pelican (Pelecanus crispus) during the flight. 
In addition to the birds, the bats of the Red Book of Armenia, i.e. Mehely's horseshoe bat (Rhinolophus mehelyi), the Levant barbastelle (Barbastella leucomelas) and the Schreibers' long-fingered bat, search for food here in the hot months of the year.[full citation needed] 
The water-swamp area creates a unique moist microclimate that is evidenced by dry climatic conditions during the summer drought and even in winter when the green color of the water-swamp flora gives a special beauty to the environment. 
Thus, the Khor Virap water-swamp area is distinguished by its high ecological, scientific and recreational significance, the loss of which, in particular, as an area for waterfowl birds, will cause irreversible damage to Armenia's biodiversity. 
Geir Ludvig Aasen Ouren (born August 26, 1974) is a Norwegian cross-country skier who has competed since 1999. His best World Cup finish was fifth on four occasions between 2004 and 2009. 
This biographical article relating to Norwegian cross-country skiing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Battle of Tarentum of 209 BC was a battle in the Second Punic War. The Romans, led by Quintus Fabius Maximus Verrucosus, recaptured the city of Tarentum that had betrayed them in the first Battle of Tarentum in 212 BC. This time the commander of the city, Carthalo, turned against the Carthaginians, and supported the Romans. 
Fabius drew Hannibal away from Tarentum by sending the garrison of Rhegium to plunder the lands of the Bruttians and to take Caulonia. Hannibal went to the aid of the Bruttians. 
On the sixth day of the siege it was arranged that the commander would help the Romans gain entry to Tarentum. Fabius took a cohort to the appointed place while the rest of the army attacked the walls, luring the cities defenders away. The Bruttian gave the signal and Fabius and his men scaled the walls and took the city. (Plutarch does not mention what the Bruttian commander does to aid the Romans) 
According to Plutarch (Life of Fabius Maximus 23.1), Hannibal was within five miles when Tarentum fell to the Romans. He is said to have remarked in public that "It seems that the Romans have found another Hannibal, for we have lost Tarentum in the same way we took it." 
This article about a battle or war of Ancient Roman history is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Azaly Ben Marofo (born 1946) is a former Malagasy foreign minister. In February 2002, when President Marc Ravalomanana won election, Ben Marofo was his initial choice as foreign minister. However, he was replaced in May by Marcel Ranjeva. He was the second of three foreign ministers in 2002. He was the 14th person to hold the position since independence. 
Adriana Albini (born 1955) is an Italian pathologist and cancer researcher. She developed the concept of angioprevention which can be used to control cancer development. She is a competitive fencer and six of her novels have been published. In 2000 she was the Scientific Director at the Fondazione MultiMedica Onlus in Milan. 
In 1985 she had her doctorate and she was employed in research at the Max-Planck Institute for Biochemistry. 
Albini has written six novels under a nom de plume. She is also a competitive fencer and in May 2015 she won the silver medal at the 2015 European Veteran Fencing championship in her age class behind Marja-Liisa Someroja of Finland. 
Jay Sebring....Cutting to the Truth is a 2020 American documentary film that studies Jay Sebring's life as the first international pioneer in the industry of men's style and hair.  Cited as the inspiration for Warren Beatty's character in the 1975 film Shampoo, Jay Sebring's life ended at age 35 when he and four others were killed by the Manson family in what would become known as the Tate murders. 
The Jay Sebring....Cutting to the Truth musical score was created by Jeff Beal, who is noted for his Blackfish documentary soundtrack, among others. 
Jordan Raup of The Film Stage noted the film's revelation of Jay Sebring as a "great influence on a generation of Hollywood stars, from Marlon Brando to Bruce Lee," while USA Today included the documentary in its exclusive "All the Fall Movies You'll Want To Stream". 
William Friedkin, director of The French Connection and the original Exorcist said, "Jay Sebring....Cutting to the Truth is an important, wonderful film and should be seen by as many people as possible." 
In enzymology, an isonocardicin synthase (EC 2.5.1.38) is an enzyme that catalyzes the chemical reaction 
Thus, the two substrates of this enzyme are S-adenosyl-L-methionine and nocardicin E, whereas its two products are 5'-methylthioadenosine and isonocardicin A. 
This enzyme belongs to the family of transferases, specifically those transferring aryl or alkyl groups other than methyl groups.  The systematic name of this enzyme class is S-adenosyl-L-methionine:nocardicin-E 3-amino-3-carboxypropyltransferase. This enzyme is also called nocardicin aminocarboxypropyltransferase. 
Herman Roosdorp was a Dutch racing driver who lived a long period of his life in Belgium. He was born on 19 April 1895. He started as a house painter before becoming a car dealer. He was the first Dutch man to buy a Ferrari. In Antwerp (Borgerhout) he owned a garage and was dealer for Vanguard. His daughter Anni Roosdorp did also pursue a racing career. 
The Swingin'est is an album by American trombonist Bennie Green and saxophonist Gene Ammons recorded in 1958 and released on the Vee-Jay label. The album has also been released under the title Juggin' Around. 
The Allmusic review by Scott Yanow awarded the album 2 stars and stated "The emphasis is on the blues and very basic chord changes on this relaxed jam session... Due to the similarity of the material plus three alternate takes that have been added to augment the original program, it is advisable to listen to this CD in small doses". 
The FA Charity Shield was founded in 1908 as a successor to the Sheriff of London Charity Shield. It was a contest between the respective champions of the Football League and Southern League, and then by 1913 teams of amateur and professional players. In 1921, it was played by the Football League champions and FA Cup winners for the first time. After a ten-year absence due to the suspension of football during the Second World War, the Charity Shield made a return in 1948. 
Loughborough MCC University (previously known as Loughborough University Centre of Cricketing Excellence) is a cricket coaching centre based at Loughborough University in Loughborough, Leicestershire, England, and the name under which the university's cricket team plays. 
The former Loughborough University Centre of Cricketing Excellence played 27 first-class matches from 2001 to 2009. As Loughborough Marylebone Cricket Club University, the team has played fourteen first-class matches from 2010 to 2015. 
The coaching centre is largely funded by the Marylebone Cricket Club (MCC).  It is also the location of England's National Cricket Academy and is frequently used by the England team as a training base. 
Since obtaining first-class status in 2003, the university has produced a large number of cricketers who have obtained professional county contracts, while others such as Monty Panesar have gone on to play international cricket. 
Protein prenylation involves the transfer of either a farnesyl or a geranylgeranyl moiety to C-terminal cysteine(s) of the target protein. There are three enzymes that carry out prenylation in the cell, farnesyl transferase, Caax protease and geranylgeranyl transferase I. 
In addition to GTPases, the protein kinase GRK1 also known as rhodopsin kinase (RK) has been shown to undergo farnesylation and carboxyl methylation directed by the carboxyl terminal CVLS CaaX box sequence of the protein. The functional consequence of these post-translational modifications have been shown to play a role in regulating the light-dependent phosphorylation of rhodopsin, a mechanism involved in light adaptation. 
FTIs can also be used to inhibit farnesylation in parasites such as trypanosoma brucei and malaria. Parasites seem to be more vulnerable to inhibition of farnesyltransferase than humans are. In some cases, this may be because they lack geranylgeranyltransferase I. Thus, it may be possible for the development of antiparasitic drugs to 'piggyback' on the development of FTIs for cancer research. 
In addition, FTIs have shown some promise in treating a mouse model of progeria, and in May 2007 a phase II clinical trial using the FTI lonafarnib was started for children with progeria. 
Small molecules can also undergo prenylation, such as in the case of prenylflavonoids. Prenylation of a vitamin B2 derivative (flavin mononucleotide) was recently described. 
A 2012 study found that statin treatment increases lifespan and improves cardiac health in Drosophila by decreasing specific protein prenylation.  The study concluded, "These data are the most direct evidence to date that decreased protein prenylation can increase cardiac health and lifespan in any metazoan species, and may explain the pleiotropic (non-cholesterol related) health effects of statins." 
Bianca Latupapua (born October 6, 1983), professionally known as Lady Bee, is a Dutch electronic musician, MC, DJ and producer. She first got involved in music as an MC at the age of 17, before becoming a DJ and producer. She has worked with a number of major Dutch musicians, including Hardwell, Laidback Luke and Sidney Samson. Many of which she featured on the vocals for. 
Lady Bee also has her own solo career, most notably with the track, "Return of the Mack". The track reached number one on the Netherlands dance chart.[citation needed] 
Lady Bee is responsible for an annual event at Amsterdam Dance Event. Lady Bee Invites showcases not only her own music but the music of other artists within the same wide genre as Lady Bee. 
KAKT (105.1 FM, "The Wolf") is a radio station broadcasting a country music format. Licensed to Phoenix, Oregon, United States, the station serves the Medford-Ashland area.  The station is currently owned by Stephens Media Group, through licensee SMG-Medford, LLC. 
Syndicated programming includes After Midnite with Blair Garner hosted by Blair Garner from Premiere Radio Networks. 
On April 15, 2019, KAKT launched a classic country format on its HD2 subchannel, branded as "95.1 The Wolf" (simulcast on translator K236CI 95.1 FM Medford). 
In 2009, North Carolina Specialty Hospital was named the top hospital in North Carolina, and among the top 10 in the United States, for its patient care ratings, per the Hospital Consumer Assessment of Healthcare Providers and Systems (HCAHPS), a division of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services (CMS). 
NCSH is jointly owned by National Surgical Hospitals (NSH), and physicians from North Carolina Eye and Ear Associates and Triangle Orthopaedic Associates. 
Hoover is best known for having claimed six times (1997, 2005, 2007, 2008, 2011, and 2013) to have discovered fossilized microorganisms in a collection of select meteorites. 
Since 1997, Richard B. Hoover has published numerous papers describing controversial evidence and claims for the existence of indigenous microfossils of cyanobacteria and other filamentous microorganisms in the CI1 (Ivuna and Orgueil) and CM2 (Murchison and Murray) carbonaceous meteorites, as well as the Polonnaruwa meteorite. 
Hoover's interpretations and claims for fossilized bacteria in meteorites were published in 1997, 2005, 2007, 2008, 2011, and 2013. 
Dinwoodie was commissioned a second lieutenant (on probation) in the 3rd Battalion of the Dorset Regiment on 8 June 1915, and following training was confirmed in his rank on 14 December. He was seconded to the 1/76th Trench Mortar Battery on 6 April 1916. 
During the First World War he won the Military Cross (MC) in May 1916 while attached to the 1/76th Trench Mortar Battery: 
2nd. Lt. Hubert Dinwoodie, 3rd Battalion Dorset Regiment (attached. 1/76th Trench Mortar Battery) For conspicuous gallantry. During an attack by the enemy, although his gun emplacement was destroyed by a shell and the gun partially buried, he immediately got it into action again, and, after firing till his ammunition was exhausted, removed the gun into safety. He then, though partly incapacitated, led parties with ammunition and bombs up to the firing line.
Dinwoodie was promoted to the temporary rank of lieutenant on 9 June 1916, and to the acting rank of captain on 15 October. He was appointed an assistant instructor at a trench mortar school on 7 November, with the acting rank of captain, and relinquished his temporary lieutenancy on 8 November. He was promoted to the permanent rank of lieutenant on 1 July 1917. 
Dinwoodie was commissioned a pilot officer (on probation) in the RAFVR on 28 March 1939. He was confirmed in his rank and promoted to flying officer on 28 August 1939, and was promoted to flight lieutenant (war substantive) on 16 May 1941. As an acting squadron leader, Dinwoodie was appointed an Officer of the Order of the British Empire, Military Division (OBE) in the 1942 Birthday Honours list. He was promoted to temporary squadron leader on 1 January 1943. 
Awarded the George Cross on 4 February 1947, the citation in the London Gazette praised Dinwoodie for displaying 
...cold-blooded heroism and initiative in extremely critical circumstances. He was ably assisted by Corporal Garred who showed courage and devotion to duty of a very high order. Although both were aware that they were in great personal danger, they completed a task which probably averted a serious disaster to the port of Lubeck.
Dinwoodie relinquished his commission in the RAFVR with effect from 10 February 1954, retaining the rank of wing commander. His medals and some photographs are held by the RAF Museum at Hendon, London. 
K. Ram writing for Andhra Patrika on 21 August 1989, stated that director Sharath, has filled the film with comedy with a good dosage of stunts and suspense. 
Randy John Read FRS (born 9 June 1957) is a Wellcome Trust Principal Research Fellow and Professor of Protein Crystallography at the University of Cambridge. 
Read was educated at the University of Alberta in Edmonton, Canada where he was awarded a Bachelor of Science degree in 1979 followed by a PhD in 1986 for X-ray crystallography of serine proteases and their protein kinase inhibitors supervised by Michael N. G. James. 
Margaret Lewis is an Australian politician. She was a Labor member of the Victorian Legislative Council for Northern Victoria at 11 June 2014, she was appointed to a casual vacancy caused by the resignation of Candy Broad. 
This article about an Australian Labor Party member of the Parliament of Victoria is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
It is to the west of the Federal Highway 1. This ranch is where the famous "Leche el Caracol" (El caracol brand milk) is produced. 
The airfield is used solely for general aviation  purposes. Some times the COL code is used as identifier. 
Leesville Lake  is a reservoir in Virginia used for hydroelectric power generation in conjunction with Smith Mountain Lake as a pump storage project. It is located southeast of Roanoke, and southwest of Lynchburg. 
Initial proposals were made in the late 1920s to dam the Roanoke River and the Blackwater River at the Smith Mountain gorge to generate electricity.  Construction of the Smith Mountain Dam began in 1960 and was completed in 1963. 
The dam produces hydro-electric power mostly during hours of peak demand on the American Electric Power system. Water passes from Smith Mountain Lake through generators to Leesville Lake, producing power. In times of low demand, the generators are used as pumps to reverse the flow and return the water to Smith Mountain Lake. 
Since the 1960s, the area around Leesville Lake has remained relatively rural and remote with mostly corn, tobacco, small family farms and other agriculture.  The limited early residential developments around the lake consisted largely of family farms. Since about 2004, however, residential growth has begun to expand rather quickly and lakefront homes and communities now dot the shoreline. Boat traffic on the lake remains low relative to nearby Smith Mountain Lake, Kerr Lake and Lake Gaston. 
Leesville Lake is becoming a popular recreational area.  Fishing is very popular, especially for striped bass. The state record striped bass was caught out of Leesville Lake in 2000.  Boating, water skiing, wakeboarding, and riding personal watercraft are also common activities. 
Access to Leesville Lake is primarily by way of U.S. Route 29, although State Route 43 and State Route 40 provide access to the north and south sides of the lake, respectively. 
It occurs in South Asia, Southeast Asia, as well as Afghanistan and Australia. The southernmost limit of natural distribution is Mount Keira, south of Sydney. The species name refers to the type specimen being collected in the Philippines, where it is known as banato. 
Mallotus philippensis is used to produce yellow dye and herbal remedies. It produces rottlerin, a potent large conductance potassium channel opener.[citation needed] 
Visitors to Egypt must obtain a visa from one of the Egyptian diplomatic missions unless they come from one of the visa exempt countries or countries that are eligible for visa on arrival. Visitors must hold passports that are valid for at least 6 months from the date of arrival to Egypt. 
In March 2015 it was announced that all foreigners travelling to Egypt for tourism will require visas in advance as of May 15, 2015. The only exemption will be for organized groups visiting through an Egyptian travel agency. In April 2015 Egyptian authorities announced that they have reversed the decision until an electronic visa system is in place. 
Citizens of the following 10 countries and territories may visit Egypt without a visa for 3 months (unless otherwise noted): 
The visa-free regime also applies to the citizens of the following countries under certain conditions: 
Travel document issued by Egypt, Lebanon, Jordan and Syria to female Palestinian or to male Palestinian who are older than 40 years or younger than 18 years. 
If travelling as part of the tourist group that consists of at least 5 persons citizens of  Azerbaijan, Barbados, Belize, China, Costa Rica, El Salvador, Guatemala, Honduras, India, Jordan, Kazakhstan, Lebanon, Moldova (except females aged between 15 and 35), Nicaragua, Russia, Saint Vincent and the Grenadines, and Turkey who hold a return ticket, booked accommodation, and a signed guarantee letter from a travel agency, do not require a visa for Egypt. 
Visa exemption also applies to sons and daughters born to an Egyptian father (except nationals of Syria, Iraq, Yemen, and Qatar), to an Egyptian mother if born after 25 July 2004 (except nationals of Syria, Iraq, Qatar, and Yemen), and to wives of Egyptian nationals holding proof of marriage (except nationals of Syria, Iraq, Morocco, and Qatar). 
According to the Egyptian Consulate General in the United Kingdom, citizens of the following countries can obtain visa upon arrival at any of the Egyptian ports of entry: 
1 - Nationals of Belgium, France, Germany, Italy and Portugal can enter with a national ID card. They must bring a passport photo to be affixed to the visa. 
On 17 December 2020, Ministry of Tourism and Antiquities of Egypt announced the activation of a decree that allows tourists holding valid visas from the US, the UK, or Schengen countries to apply for visa on arrival at airports in Egypt. 
Passengers with a residence permit issued by a GCC Member State can obtain a visa on arrival for a maximum stay of 30 days. The residence permit must be valid for a minimum of 6 months from the arrival date.[citation needed] 
From 3 December 2017 citizens of 46 countries may apply for tourist or business types of visa for 30 days online through the eVisa system. 28 countries more were added from July 1, 2021, with North Korea apparently being removed back in 2018. 
According to the Egyptian Consulate General in the United Kingdom citizens of all European Union countries, the United States, and Israel (only through Taba Border Crossing) do not require a visa prior to travelling as a free entry permission stamp will be granted upon arrival if they are travelling to Sharm El Sheikh, Dahab, Nuweiba and Taba resorts only without leaving them and for a maximum of 14 days: 
Citizens of the following countries need a prior approval from the Egyptian State Security Authorities in addition to holding a visa: 
Holders of the following diplomatic, official, service or special passports do not require a visa for Egypt: 
Otto and Isa Degener were in Edinburgh in August 1964 for the 10th International Botanical Congress. 
They were commended by the Hawaiian Senate for their conservation work. Many of the plants collected by Otto Degener belong to species that are now extinct. 
Eddie Rickenbacker took the lead at the start, and led the first nine laps until dropping out with steering problems. Dario Resta led 103 of the 120 laps, and claimed the victory. Resta was accompanied by riding mechanic Bob Dahnke. 
Seven of the cars were entered by the Speedway or its owners, in order to ensure a strong field during the war. None of them finished in the top five. Despite the promoter's entries, the field consisted of only 21 cars, the smallest in Indy history. 
Three months after the 1916 race, on Labor Day weekend of 1916, the Speedway held a second event, the Harvest Auto Racing Classic. The 1917 race was scheduled to return to 500 miles, but a dispute with the local hoteliers and the escalation of World War I intervened. On March 23, 1917, Speedway management cancelled the 1917 Indianapolis 500, and halted racing at the facility for both 1917 and 1918. 
The track was offered as a landing strip and maintenance/refueling station for military aircraft traveling between Wilbur Wright Field and Chanute Air Force Base. It was referred to as the Speedway Aviation Repair Depot, and the 821st Aero Repair Squadron was stationed there. In addition, several experimental aircraft were tested at the grounds. At least one test pilot was fatally injured in a plane crash at the track. 
No racing of any kind took place at the Indianapolis Motor Speedway in 1917-1918. Likewise, the National Championship was suspended in both 1917 and 1918. There were, however, AAA races (non-championship races) conducted during the war years at other tracks. On Memorial Day 1917, a 250-mile race was held at Cincinnati. 
Indrella is a monotypic genus containing the single species Indrella ampulla, a tropical terrestrial air-breathing gastropod mollusk in the family Ariophantidae. It is endemic to the Western Ghats of India. 
I. ampulla is the only species in the genus Indrella, however the animal color is polymorphic: the visible soft parts of the snail can be various colors, including red and pale yellow. 
The shell of this species is like that of Vitrina, imperforate, with few whorls and with a very large aperture. The shell consists mainly of proteins with only small amounts of calcium carbonate. 
The jaw is straight, with a slight convexity on the cutting-edge and no median projection. The radula is broad, with about 100 rows of teeth: 145 .17 .1 .17 .145; median tooth and the 17 on each side (admedians) long, broadly pointed, straight-sided, lateral cusps indistinct; laterals curved, aculeate, outer laterals bicuspid. 
"The animal, as represented in a drawing for which I am indebted to Sir Walter Elliot, is greenish yellow, but according to Col. Beddome it is black. It probably varies." 
The color of soft parts has great color diversity, (color polymorphism) including white, cream, pale yellow, orange, red and black. 
Colonel Richard Henry Beddome of the British Indian forest service found this snail feeding on large fungi. 
He is an academician, a critic, art historian, and is engaged in restoration and preservation of Tamil and other south Indian Vintage movies. He is now involved in ground work for spawning Independent movies in India. 
He is a native of Oothukadu, Tamil Nadu, India. He completed a Bachelor of Commerce degree and finished post-graduate studies in political science. 
He was awarded a gold medal during his time at the Film and Television Institute of Tamil Nadu for his student project film, The Rhetoric of the Continuity, which had the distinction of being the only Indian film selected among 45 other international entries at the 1984 International Film Festival of India in New Delhi and Music,courtesy by Satyajit Ray. 
In the 1960s, he helped contribute to research on gustation and is credited with discovering the association between the ability to taste PROP (6-n-propylthiouracil) with food preferences and body weight, and its relationship to alcohol use and smoking.  His early work in taste science contributed to later research on supertasting. 
This biographical article related to a football midfielder from Mexico is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In the Chicago mayoral election of 1867, incumbent Republican John Blake Rice won reelection, defeating Democrat Francis Cornwall Sherman by a nearly ten-point margin. 
The election was held on April 16. It was ultimately a rematch of the previous election. This was Chicago's first mayoral election held after the conclusion of the American Civil War. 
The third series of Promi Big Brother started on 14 August 2015 and ended on 28 August 2015. It was the third series of the Big Brother franchise on Sat.1, after it left RTL II. 5 celebrity housemates ("promis") entered the house on Day 1 and the other 7 celebrities entered on Day 3. The show was hosted by Jochen Schropp. 
Promis had participated in tasks and matches for treats or to avoid punishments. Daily nominations also took place (from Day 8 to 14). Furthermore, the house consists of two floors, the upper luxury floor and the lower poverty floor. Housemates on the luxury floor will choose of the poor housemates to join them upstairs, whilst the public will vote one of the 7 downstairs. 
This year's Promi Big Brother contains two floors, each floor having their separate living areas, bathrooms, bedrooms and diary rooms. The upper floor will be luxurious, whilst the lower floor is meager with no beds or real seating. 
Big Brother respectively determines a housemate of "upstairs", which must compete on the Duel Arena. This candidate from "upstairs" must choose one of the housemates of "Downstairs" who competed against him. In the Duel Arena both compete in a game and the loser must face the consequences for his residential area. With a draw always win the housemate from the "Upstairs" area. 
The conflict was caused by proposed layoffs and cuts to pay and benefits by Inco management, with low nickel prices as a justification. 
Around 11,600 workers were involved in the strike, which affected the wages sustaining 43,000 people, or about 26% of the population of metropolitan Sudbury. By the end of the strike, the company had been starved of over twenty-two million hours of labour, smashing records for the longest strike in both Canadian and Inco history. 
Community support for the union was strong, with local politicians such as future mayor and then-Member of Parliament John Rodriguez as well as other New Democrats vocally supporting the strikers. A major role was played by women's support committees, which had also existed during the 1958 strike. 
The role of women in the community during the strike was profiled in the 1980 documentary film A Wives' Tale (Une histoire de femmes). 
Concessions won as a result of the strike included Inco's "thirty-and-out" policy, whereby workers with thirty years at the company could retire with a full pension, regardless of age. As well, most miners received a dollar an hour wage increase. 
A study on alcohol consumption showed that over 35% of strikers and over 40% of their wives reportedly stopped drinking alcohol or drank dramatically less during the course of the strike, while a small minority drank much more, hypothesized as being stress-induced. Overall, alcohol sales declined by 10% during the strike as compared to the previous winter, likely due to economic reasons. 
This effect was mirrored in the rest of the local economy, which was catastrophically affected. This would later play a critical role in spurring new economic development efforts in the city into the 1980s and 1990s; when a longer strike hit the same operations, now owned by Vale, in 2009, the action had a much more modest effect on the city's economy than the 1978 strike, with the local rate of unemployment declining slightly during the strike. 
This article about a Swiss lawyer, judge or jurist is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
A post office was established at Lozier in 1880, and was discontinued in 1882. With the construction of the railroad, business activity shifted to nearby Pierson, and the town's population dwindled. 
This article about the geography of Woodbury County, Iowa is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Blue Water Dokken is a multi-purpose indoor arena in Esbjerg, Denmark. Its best known tenant is the women's handball club Team Esbjerg, one of the top teams of the Danish championship, that also regularly plays in Europe, having reached the EHF Cup final in 2014. Beside handball it also hosts other indoor sports as well as concerts, shows and others. 
The CAA Centre (formerly the Brampton Centre for Sports & Entertainment and the Powerade Centre) is a 5,000-seat multi-purpose arena in Brampton, Ontario, Canada. It was built in 1998, and officially opened the same year on October 7. Its main arena was home to the Brampton Beast of the ECHL and the Brampton Excelsiors lacrosse teams. 
In the main arena the seats are purple, with private suites located around the top of seating area. The club seats are on the penalty box side of the arena. There is a video scoreboard that was added for the Brampton Beast's inaugural season. The concourse is horseshoe-shaped.  
The main arena is part of larger community complex that includes three smaller ice pads and outdoor softball diamonds. It is located at 7575 Kennedy Road, on the south-side of the city, between Steeles Avenue and 407 ETR. 
The stadium also annually hosts the Canadian International Kabaddi tournament, also called the Canada Kabaddi World Cup. 
Marc Schnatterer (born 18 November 1985) is a German professional footballer who plays for Waldhof Mannheim. 
This biographical article related to association football in Germany, about a midfielder, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Verbal Behavior Milestones Assessment and Placement Program (VB-MAPP) is an assessment and skills-tracking system to assess the language, learning and social skills of children with autism or other developmental disabilities. A strong focus of the VB-MAPP is language and social interaction, which are the predominant areas of weakness in children with autism. 
The VB-MAPP is based on the principles and procedures of Applied Behavior Analysis (ABA), B.F. Skinner's behavioral analysis of language, verbal behavior and establishment of developmental milestones. 
The VB-MAPP was developed by Mark Sundberg, Ph.D., BCBA-D and is a continuation of the author's 30+ year research in language assessment and intervention as it applies to individuals with autism. A contributing author to the VB-MAPP is Barbara Esch, Ph.D, CCC-SLP, BCBA-D, a speech and language pathologist who includes an assessment of speech sounds with a guide for developmental progression called the Early Echoic Skills Assessment (EESA.) 
The VB-MAPP set contains an individual scoring protocol and a users guide. The main components of the VB-MAPP are: 
At Level 1, the child is tested for Mand, Tact, Listener Responding, Visual Perceptual Skills and Matching-to-Sample, Independent Play, Social Behaviour and Social Play, Motor Imitation, Echoic, Spontaneous Vocal Behaviour. 
Level 2 adds Listener Responding by Function Feature and Class, Intraverbal, Classroom Routines and Group Skills, Linguistic Structure. 
The VB-MAPP has objective measurement criteria that makes it effective for use in both treatment and research outcomes, as demonstrated in studies in the Journal of Applied Behavior Analysis, The Analysis of Verbal Behavior and Education and Treatment of Young Children. 
The VB-MAPP has been used as a measurement tool in published studies to measure the participants' verbal or social skills: 
Tarrik Jumaan Brock (born December 25, 1973) is an American former professional baseball player and current coach. He is the first base coach for the Pittsburgh Pirates of Major League Baseball (MLB). An outfielder who batted and threw left-handed, he played part of one season in MLB for the Chicago Cubs. He has coached in MLB for the Houston Astros and San Diego Padres. 
Brock was originally drafted by the Detroit Tigers in the 2nd round of the 1991 amateur draft. Of the eleven second-round draftees who made the major leagues, he was the last to make his debut. After six years in the Tigers' system, spent mostly at the A-ball level, Brock was selected by the Seattle Mariners in the Rule 5 draft. Brock spent two seasons in Seattle's minor league system before being released in January 1999. 
On April 8 of that year, Brock was signed by the Colorado Rockies and assigned to their AA affiliate, Carolina. He was sent to the Cubs on July 7 as the player to be named later in a trade made on March 28, before he was even under contract with the Rockies. The Rockies in return obtained two prospects, John Cotton and Kevin Rawitzer, neither of whom made the major leagues. 
Brock hit only .217 in 54 games with the Cubs' AA affiliate at West Tennessee that season, but nevertheless made the Cubs' major league roster in spring training of 2000. He made his major league debut on March 29, 2000, appearing as a left fielder in the Cubs' Opening Day game against the New York Mets in the Tokyo Dome in Japan. He faced Rich Rodriguez in his first major league at bat and singled to right field. Sammy Sosa was thrown out at home on the play, ending the inning. 
In 2006, he served as a coach with the Ogden Raptors. From 2007 through 2013, Brock worked as the Florida Marlins' outfield and baserunning coordinator. During 2010, he served as interim first base coach. 
In 2014, Brock was the first base coach for the Houston Astros. He joined the San Diego Padres organization as a minor league coordinator for the 2015 season, before becoming their first base coach before the 2016 season. 
Godney is a village and civil parish near Glastonbury on the River Sheppey on the Somerset Levels in the Mendip district of Somerset, England. 
Near the village are the sites of the Iron Age Glastonbury Lake Village, and the now drained Meare Pool. 
During the Second World War, Godney was incorporated into the GHQ Line. Several pillboxes were constructed in the area. Natural obstacles to tanks were supplemented with an anti-tank ditch and bridges in the area were prepared for demolition at short notice. 
The village falls within the Non-metropolitan district of Mendip, which was formed on 1 April 1974 under the Local Government Act 1972, having previously been part of Wells Rural District, which is responsible for local planning and building control, local roads, council housing, environmental health, markets and fairs, refuse collection and recycling, cemeteries and crematoria, leisure services, parks, and tourism. 
Somerset County Council is responsible for running the largest and most expensive local services such as education, social services, libraries, main roads, public transport, policing and  fire services, trading standards, waste disposal and strategic planning. 
It is also part of the Wells county constituency represented in the House of Commons of the Parliament of the United Kingdom. It elects one Member of Parliament (MP) by the first past the post system of election. 
To the north west of the village are the Westhay Moor and Somerset Levels National Nature Reserves. Westhay Moor is a  biological Site of Special Scientific Interest and part of the Somerset Levels and Moors Special Protection Area under the EU Birds Directive and as a Ramsar site, and a national nature reserve. It is part of the Brue Valley Living Landscape conservation project. 
The Church of the Holy Trinity, by G.D. Manners, dates from 1839 and was built on a medieval site. It was restored in 1903, with an added chancel, by E. Buckle. It is a Grade II listed building. 
Carrie Moyer is an American painter and writer living in Brooklyn, New York. Moyer's paintings and public art projects have been exhibited both in the US and Europe since the early 1990s. 
Carrie Moyer is a painter and writer who has been showing her work since the mid-1990s. Her work has been widely exhibited at national and international venues including MoMA PS1 the Tang, Worcester Art Museum, Weatherspoon Art Museum, Cooper-Hewitt National Design Museum of the Smithsonian Institution and American University Museums; Shedhalle (Zurich) and Project Art Space (Dublin) among others. 
In October 2019 Carrie Moyer was elected as a full member of the NAD (National Academy of Design). Her most recent shows include a solo exhibition, Carrie Moyer: Interstellar , at the Worcester Art Museum, and Carrie Moyer: Pirate Jenny at the Tang Museum. In 2020, Carrie Moyer and Sheila Pepe were the subject of a two-person exhibition, Carrie Moyer and Sheila Pepe: Tabernacles for Trying Times at the Portland Museum of Art, Maine. 
Throughout the 1990s, Moyer designed agitprop, graphics and posters for a number of gay and lesbian activist organizations based in New York City. These include Queer Nation, the Lesbian Avengers, the Irish Lesbian and Gay Organization (ILGO) and the New York City Anti-Violence Project. 
The Mopani Copper Mines COSAFA Under-20 Championship will be the 24th edition of the COSAFA U20 Cup, an international youth competition open to national associations of the COSAFA region. 
The suborder Asellota comprises these families: Some classifications also include the Microcerberidea within Asellota. 
Audrey Zarif (born 23 July 1998) is a French table tennis player. Her highest career ITTF ranking was 99. 
This biographical article relating to a French table tennis figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He recently released the sixth and seventh albums by Led Bib on Cuneiform Records, The People in Your Neighbourhood and The Good Egg. 
In June 2015, Holub collaborated with modular synthesist James Holden and guitarist Marcus Hamblett. The project was recorded at Maida Vale Studios for BBC Radio 3's Late Junction. 
Krasnoyarsk was unanimously elected as the host city of the 29th Winter Universiade 2019 by an Executive Committee meeting in Brussels on 9 November 2013. At the Opening Ceremony the fire was lit by two of the event's ambassadors, bandy player Sergey Lomanov and former artistic gymnast Svetlana Khorkina. 
During the whole year, each applicant worked on the preparation of application dosier. On 14 September 2013, Krasnoyarsk presented its Bidding Book at the FISU headquarters and received the status of a candidate city. The only competitor at this stage, the Canton of Valais, withdrew from candidacy. 
On 9 November 2013, in Brussels, FISU members elected Krasnoyarsk as the host city of the 29th Winter Universiade 2019 by a closed vote. 
The "U" letter in the logo of the Winter Universiade Krasnoyarsk 2019 symbolizes the ice block, the irregular facets of which demonstrate the severe character of Siberian nature, peaks of rocks and snow-covered slopes. 
The official mascot of the Winter Universiade 2019 is "U-Laika", a Siberian dog of the Laika breed, the symbol of loyalty, friendliness, joy and unbridled energy. Laika is a friend always ready to help in hard times and support in striving to any, even the most trying goal. 
On 5 June 2016, the countdown clock of the Winter Universiade 2019 was launched on the Yenisei river embankment in Krasnoyarsk. The countdown started from 1,000 days. The screen shows the exact number of days, hours, minutes and seconds before the official opening ceremony of the Games in Krasnoyarsk. 
The management system of the Winter Universiade 2019 consists of four main levels: Organising Committee, Executive Directorate, Supervisory Board, Coordinating Council. 
The budget of the 2019 Universiade in Krasnoyarsk equalled 67.8 billion rubles (1.021 billion US dollars): 43.3 billion rubles from the federal budget and 24.5 billion rubles from the budget of the Krasnoyarsk Krai. 
The Organising Committee for the preparation and delivery of the 2019 Winter Universiade was created by the Resolution of the Government of the Russian Federation from 18 February 2014, No. 219. 
Initially the Organising Committee was headed by the Deputy Prime Minister of Russia Vitaly Mutko. He was replaced by Olga Golodets in December 2018. 
The Organising Committee was formed by representatives of the state authorities of the Russian Federation and the Krasnoyarsk Krai. The Organizing Committee made important decisions regarding the Universiade organization and preparation; it approved the plan of organizational measures and the list of the Winter Universiade 2019 venues. 
The organizational and technical support of the Organising Committee was entrusted to the Ministry of Sport. 
The Universiade Village located on the territory of the campus of the Siberian Federal University, close to Nikolayevskaya Sopka and most alpine skiing venues: 
There were events in eleven sports. Athletes competed for 76 sets of awards in 11 sports: alpine skiing, bandy, biathlon, cross-country skiing, curling, figure skating, freestyle skiing, ice hockey, short track, ski orienteering, snowboarding. 
For the first time in Universiade history, bandy and ski-orienteering were included as optional sports. Freestyle skiing was another optional sport at this Universiade. 
58 national university sports federations sent at least an athlete for the 2019 Winter Universiade. The Philippines and the United Arab Emirates made their debut in Winter Universiade while Ukraine boycotted the event due to the Ukrainian government refusal to fund Ukrainian athletes competing in tournaments being held in Russia. 
Russia won a record of 41 gold and 111 overall medals, while South Korea placed second with 6 and 14, respectively. Japan was third, winning 5 gold and 13 overall medals. 
 On 2 March 2018 four postage stamps from the "29th Winter Universiade 2019 Krasnoyarsk. Sports venues" series were issued by the Russian Post. In addition to sports arenas, each stamp depicts the emblem of the Winter Universiade 2019.
The Opening ceremony was held at Platinum Arena and ran from 20:19 to 22:47 pm local time (Krasnoyarsk Time). It was officially opened by President of Russia Vladimir Putin. 
The opening ceremony featured scenes with paintings of Vasily Surikov, who was born in Krasnoyarsk. In one of those his "Capture of a Snow Town" was used. The folk song "Valenki" was performed by Nyusha for the upcoming Maslenitsa. Then, singer Zara sang a lullaby on a golden moon. Also in the ceremony famous Siberians such as writer Viktor Astafyev, painter Andrey Pozdeyev and opera singer Dmitry Khvorostovsky were mentioned. The final part featured figure skater Alexei Yagudin. 
The closing ceremony was held at the Platinum Arena from 20:00 to 21:30 pm local time (Krasnoyarsk Time) on 12 March 2019 which handed over the FISU flag to the next host city of Lucerne, Switzerland for the next edition in 2021. 
On review aggregator website Rotten Tomatoes, the film has a "certified fresh" approval rating of 91% based on 79 reviews, and an average rating of 7.5/10. The website's critical consensus reads, "It isn't necessarily an easy watch, but thanks to Netzer's interesting direction and a riveting performance from Gheorghiu, Child's Pose is rewarding." On Metacritic, the film has a weighted average score of 77 out of 100, based on 23 critics, indicating "generally favorable reviews". 
The film was initially refused financing by the Romanian film board due its controversial depiction of the Hungarian minority in Romania. After an intervention by the Minister of Culture, Hunor Kelemen the ruling of the film board was overruled. 
Island Number Ten was an island in the Mississippi River near Tiptonville, Tennessee and the site of a major eponymous battle in the American Civil War. 
Bernard Roy is widely recognized as the father of the ELECTRE method, which was one of the earliest approaches in what is sometimes known as the French School of decision making. It is usually classified as an "outranking method" of decision making. 
There are two main parts to an ELECTRE application: first, the construction of one or several outranking relations, which aims at comparing in a comprehensive way each pair of actions; second, an exploitation procedure that elaborates on the recommendations obtained in the first phase. The nature of the recommendation depends on the problem being addressed: choosing, ranking or sorting. 
Usually the Electre Methods are used to discard some alternatives to the problem, which are unacceptable.  After that we can use another MCDA to select the best one. The Advantage of using the Electre Methods before is that we can apply another MCDA with a restricted set of alternatives saving much time. 
Criteria in ELECTRE methods have two distinct sets of parameters: the importance coefficients and the veto thresholds. 
Filomina Hanisi (born 9 March 2001) is an Australian rugby league footballer who plays as a prop for the Sydney Roosters in the NRL Women's Premiership and Mounties RLFC in the NSWRL Women's Premiership. 
Hanisi was born in Sydney and played her junior rugby league for the Concord Burwood Wolves. She is of Tongan descent. 
In 2018, Hanisi played for the Parramatta Eels in the Tarsha Gale Cup. In 2019, she joined the St George Dragons Tarsha Gale Cup side. 
In 2020, Hanisi joined the Wests Tigers NSWRL Women's Premiership team. On 23 September, she was announced as a member of the Sydney Roosters NRL Women's Premiership squad. 
Runic inscription U 46 is the Rundata catalog listing for this runestone which is approximately two metres in height and is made of gneiss. It contains a runic text within a serpent surrounding a stylized Christian cross in the upper centre of the stone. 
The runestone was located outside of the church's weapons house in the 17th century, and was covered with earth when the weapons house was demolished in 1798. The runestone was uncovered in 1935 during restoration work at the church and it was then placed in its present position. 
Runic inscription U 48 contains runic text within a serpent that is beneath a cross. It is classified as being carved in runestone style Pr4, which is also known as Urnes style. The stone is 1.75 meters in height and is grey gneiss. A portion of one side of the runestone has broken off and this part of the inscription is missing. 
The runestone was uncovered in 1932 during trenchwork and moved approximately 60 meters away from a road to its present location in 1951. 
Runic inscription U 49 has runic text within a serpent that surrounds a cross. It is classified as being carved in runestone style Pr3, or Urnes style. It is believed to have been carved by the same runemaster as inscription U 50. 
Runic inscription U 50 has runic text within a serpent that surrounds a cross. It is believed to have been carved by the same runemaster as inscription U 49. 
The runestone was found being used as a cornerstone of a church tower and was removed to its current location in 1935. It is composed of red sandstone and is about one meter in height. As noted above, it has been suggested that U 49 and U 50 were once a coupled monument that was located in a cemetery with their text intended to be read together. 
Arlington is a town in Shelby County, Tennessee, United States. The population was 2,569 at the 2000 census and 11,517 at the 2010 census, for a gain of 348.3% during the decade.  The 2010 US Census shows that Arlington is the 2nd fastest growing community in the State of Tennessee.  It is one of the seven municipalities in Shelby County. 
Arlington "follows a general law Mayor-Alderman charter" according to the official website of the town. The current mayor is Mike Wissman. Arlington has six alderman. 
In 1883 the town's name was changed to Arlington due to the post office being unable to use the name Haysville. In 1900 the town was incorporated again. Captain Henry Pittman, who lived in Haysville, had visited Washington, D.C. and Arlington National Cemetery and was inspired to call the town Arlington. 
The economic crash of 1929 led to a small economic depression in the town, but Arlington's economy gradually grew out of it due to the major change of highway 70 opening the town to outside businesses. 
The towns first school was opened up in 1884. "Memphis District High School", which was located on what is now known as "College Hill." The school only taught up to a high school level, but locally it was named "The College". 
At the 2010 census there were 11,517 people, and 3,739 households.  The population density was 565 people per square mile (48.6/km2).  The racial makeup of the town was 81.24% White, 13.84% African American, 0.16% Native American, 1.80% Asian, 0.86% from other races, 2.08% from two or more races, and .02% from Native Hawaiian and Other Pacific Islander. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 2.98%. 
Of the 3,907 households 35.23% were 1-2 person occupied, 48.02% were 3-4 person occupied, 15.32% were 5-6 person occupied, 1.42% were 7 or more person households and 4.2% were listed as unoccupied. With the 3,907 households owned in Arlington, they are estimated to have a median value of $217,300. 
The age distribution was 37.53% under the age of 18, 3.47% from 18 to 24, 35.62% from 25 to 44, 19.20% from 45 to 64, and 4.19% 65 or older. The median age was 32.2 years. The population was 49% male and 51% female. 
From 2013 to 2017, Arlington's estimated household income was predicted to be $99,404. This has increased since 2009, when the household income was estimated to be $85,779. 
At the 2000 census there were 2,569 people, 794 households, and 669 families in the town. The population density was 125.8 people per square mile (48.6/km2). There were 928 housing units at an average density of 45.4 per square mile (17.5/km2).  The racial makeup of the town was 74.23% White, 23.01% African American, 0.47% Native American, 0.62% Asian, 0.54% from other races, and 1.13% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 1.13%. 
Of the 794 households 42.8% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 67.1% were married couples living together, 13.5% had a female householder with no husband present, and 15.7% were non-families. 12.2% of households were one person and 5.7% were one person aged 65 or older. The average household size was 2.88 and the average family size was 3.15. 
The age distribution was 26.1% under the age of 18, 5.8% from 18 to 24, 37.6% from 25 to 44, 22.6% from 45 to 64, and 8.0% 65 or older. The median age was 36 years. For every 100 females, there were 97.5 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 92.8 males. 
The median household income was $52,870 and the median family income  was $55,602. Males had a median income of $38,438 versus $29,138 for females. The per capita income for the town was $19,569. About 3.1% of families and 11.3% of the population were below the poverty line, including 4.4% of those under age 18 and 23.2% of those age 65 or over. 
Dunlop Manufacturing, Inc. is a manufacturer of musical accessories, especially effects units, based in Benicia, California, United States. Founded in 1965 by Jim Dunlop Sr., the company grew from a small home operation to a large manufacturer of music gear. Dunlop has acquired several well-known effects pedal brands, including Cry Baby, MXR and Way Huge. 
Scottish immigrant Jim Dunlop founded the Jim Dunlop Company in 1965 as a part-time business while working as a processing and chemical engineer at Barr and Stroud in Glasgow. He was an apprentice of creator of the first hip replacement, William "Bill" Wallace. His first product was the Vibra-Tuner, a small device that attached to a guitar with a suction cup and displayed whether the guitar was in tune with the vibration of a small reed. 
While visiting music stores to sell his new product, someone told him that musicians needed a good capo, remarking that anyone who made a good capo that could handle a 12-string guitar would make a lot of money. Using his engineering background, Dunlop created the toggle capo, and then worked with a local machine shop to build the first capo dies, manufacturing what eventually became the long running "1100 series" capo. 
Starting from his living room, Dunlop later moved construction to his garage, and then to a location outside the house. 
Also in 1972, Dunlop left his job at Dymo Industries to focus on his own company full-time. He moved his family to Benicia, California and set up shop in Benicia Industrial Park. A few years later, he outgrew that building and moved to Industrial Way. 
Dunlop products now range from capos and picks to slides, strings, fret wire, strap retainers, and a variety of electronic effects, including the original Cry Baby wah-wah pedal, the Uni-Vibe phaser, Heil Talk Box, and the MXR and Way Huge lines of stompboxes. 
Tortex is this company's brand name for acetal based plectra. The overall feeling of the picks is meant to mimic the feeling of a pick made from the shell of a tortoise. 
7,500 residents of Bundaberg and patients at the Bundaberg Hospital were evacuated. Houses were completely washed away and parts of Bundaberg's sewage network were destroyed. Cuts to transport links including damage to numerous bridges, communication interruptions, electrical blackouts and water supply problems were experienced across wide areas.  Several swiftwater rescues had to be undertaken. 
As a precautionary measure, on 25 January Queensland Premier Campbell Newman ordered the pre-emptive release of water from Wivenhoe Dam to increase the dam's flood mitigation capacity. Releases from North Pine Dam were also made. 
In Mundubbera the Burnett River peaked at 22.9 m at 1 am on 28 January. 100 homes and businesses were inundated in the town with about the same number flooded in the surrounding area. In Gayndah, 60 homes and 12 businesses were flooded. A landslide severed the Burnett Highway between Gayndah and Mundubbera. 
In many affected areas the flooding would have been worse had the weather prior to the heavy rains not been so dry. In the 24 hours to 5 am on 27 January the Queensland State Emergency Service logged more than 800 requests for assistance. An exclusion zone was set up by police in Bundaberg North because damaged buildings and infrastructure posed significant safety risks. It wasn't until 2 February before limited access was granted for around 1,000 residents. 
By 28 January, nearly a quarter of households in South East Queensland (around 300,000 homes and businesses) experienced power interruptions including 88,000 in Brisbane, 32,000 on the Sunshine Coast, 28,000 in Moreton Bay area and 28,000 on the Gold Coast. About 2,000 powerlines were brought down by storms. More premises lost power in this storm event than in the January 2011 floods. By 9pm 31 January approximately 5,300 premises were still without power. 
The rail network in South East Queensland was heavily impacted by the storms, with inner city Brisbane lines particularly affected. The Bruce Highway, Bruxner Highway, Carnarvon Highway and Pacific Highway were all closed for some time.  The Gwydir Highway was cut because of a landslide west of Grafton. 
Some coal production in Central Queensland had been impacted because of transport disruptions.  The Port of Gladstone suspended ship loading on 26 January due to poor weather, however loading resumed the following day. Alumina and liquified natural gas production in the state experienced minor impacts with operations returning to normal levels shortly after the wild weather had passed. 
Water over the Beaudesert-Beenleigh Road at Wolffdene near Beenleigh, due to the flooding of the Albert River. 
Sand that has been blown in from the beach due to gale-force wind is being removed from Main Beach Parade on 29 January 2013. 
In February, when the flooding resumed, the water level of Coles Creek nearly reached the water level of Maguires Lane, Cooran. 
Government of Queensland disaster assistance was being offered in 21 local government areas shortly after the floods. The new Community Recovery Minister is David Crisafulli whose local government responsibilities were expanded to deal with flood recovery. Plans for relocation rather than re-building as well as the construction of new dams and levees were put forward soon after the floods. 
In February 2013, more flash flooding occurred throughout Queensland and New South Wales, further impacting the damage already created from Cyclone Oswald the previous month, resulting in one death, and the need for some evacuations. 
Peter Goodwin is a British academic who is chairman of the department of Journalism and Mass Communication at the University of Westminster. 
His areas of expertise are political economy of the media; media policy; media and politics; the television industry; and the social and economic impact of new media technologies. 
He is cited by Brunel University in London, describing himself as "an international expert in digital media policy and economics". 
This biography article of a United Kingdom academic is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This Glacier County, Montana state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Besides its use on Wikimedia sites, MediaWiki has been used as a knowledge management and content management system on many thousands of websites, public and private, including the websites Fandom, wikiHow, and major internal installations like Intellipedia and Diplopedia. 
MediaWiki is developed on a continuous integration development model, which software changes are pushed live to Wikimedia sites on regular basis. 
MediaWiki also has a public bug tracker, phabricator.wikimedia.org, which runs Phabricator. The site is also used for feature and enhancement requests. 
Increasing usage soon caused load problems to arise again, and soon after, another rewrite of the software began; this time being done by Lee Daniel Crocker, which became known as "phase III". This new software was also written in PHP, with a MySQL back-end, and kept the basic interface of the phase II software, but with the added functionality of a wider scalability. The "phase III" software went live on Wikipedia in July 2002. 
The Wikimedia Foundation was announced on June 20, 2003. In July, Wikipedia contributor Daniel Mayer suggested the name "MediaWiki" for the software, as a play on "Wikimedia". The MediaWiki name was gradually phased in, beginning in August 2003. The name has frequently caused confusion due to its (intentional) similarity to the "Wikimedia" name (which itself is similar to "Wikipedia"). 
Later, Brion Vibber, the Chief Technical Officer of the Wikimedia Foundation, took up the role of Release Manager, and the most active Developer. 
Major milestones in MediaWiki's development have included: the categorization system (2004); Parser Functions, (2006); Flagged Revisions, (2008); the "ResourceLoader", a delivery system for CSS and JavaScript (2011); and the VisualEditor, a "what you see is what you get" (WYSIWYG) editing platform (2013). 
The contest of designing a new logo was initiated on June 22, 2020, as the old logo was a bitmap image and had "high details", leading to problems when rendering at high and low resolutions, respectively. After two rounds of voting, the new and current MediaWiki logo designed by Serhio Magpie was selected on October 24, 2020, and officially adopted on April 1, 2021. 
MediaWiki's most famous use has been in Wikipedia and, to a lesser degree, the Wikimedia Foundation's other projects. Fandom, a wiki hosting service formerly known as Wikia, runs on MediaWiki. Other public wikis that run on MediaWiki include wikiHow and SNPedia. WikiLeaks began as a MediaWiki-based site, but is no longer a wiki. 
A number of alternative wiki encyclopedias to Wikipedia run on MediaWiki, including Citizendium, Metapedia, Scholarpedia